and get married to you.This is what King Drupad wants.
I derive great satisfactionfrom it, beloved.
solely belong to Arjun?Certainly not.
to give birth to only one gem?King of Anga, Karna, is also
in the competitionthen he shall certainly win it.
is no less either.Then who am I
Is competencethe sole virtue, Govind?
not correct?Wishing for joy in a marriage...
One who knows joy, gets it.If you figure out
Why do you never givea definite answer, Govind?
to have the answersis called life.
Neverthelessas you are going
Lord Shiva himself.He is the Lord of Death
gives a definite answer.If you are to get your answer
Greetings.Greetings.
for a few days.All the inns are full.
Are you travellers?- Yes.
We wish to go to Naimisharanya.Are you 'Brahmins?
Yesbecause I never lie.
You are correct.If I utter half the truth
Did the lady have something?Come inside.
But you mustallow us to serve you.
not accept the alms.I am a potter.
to dig up the soil.You are young.
a place to rest and dine.Then we shall serve you first.
We need to dig up the soilto make pots
a small amount of soil.Any amount of soil you dig up
a 'swayamvar' for our Princess.We have guests over
are required in great numbers.The 'swayamvar
of the fire sacrificehave blessed our King
Her 'swayamvar' will begintomorrow at dawn.
I require soil from behindthe Shiva temple.
from Mahadev.Brother Bheem
You are correct.Brahmins,' do have
has been held outside.Why? - Princess Draupadi is
Let us have something first.This is not alms but a banquet.
We should leave.Brother Bheem, let's go!
- W-What?Go and dig up the soil.
soil from behind the temple.Let me go get it.
I can do it, brother.- No... Let me do it.
I shall go get it.I shall be back soon.
It seems, King Vrikodar wasunable to suppress his appetite.
Will I get my answer, My Lord?Stop, Princess.
asked us to return soon.Brother Balaram!*
Greetings, Bahrain!Bless you.
Arjun!Don't stop Rukmi.
Welcome!Welcome, brother-in-law Rukmi
You scoundrel! Rukmini wasto marry Prince Shishupal!
Goddess Lakshmi blessespeople with property
Go back and conveyto the King of Vidarbha
Rukmini!I order you to
all the roads of my lifelead to Dwaraka.
If you don't come along with me,I will take your corpse with me!
Listen to your sister, Rukmi.Go back.
because of that man.But he shall not
Do remember! You shallcertainly get separated!
while uttering such harshwords about your sister?
certainly punish him.Greetings, Madhav.
are to be married.We shall get married there
will be re-established in Indiaunrighteous people will be slain
That's it.And will your marriage
just accomplish it, friend.But you should be
can change because of you.If I weren't your mother
Who gave birth to me?Who gave me birth?
you were found by us.Just like an offering
If he mentioned a nameit must be the truth, son.
supreme minister.Forgive me, Krishna.
But it became the reasonfor such grave insult of you.
Attempting to avoiddebt, disease and war
I made an attempt.But as to who shall suffer
The war is on the horizon.We must soon
for battle.Mother.
And it has also beenthe biggest pleasure of my life.
shall arrive to seekyour blessings.
So, I do not worry about them.If you ever feel worried
to chose the side of justice.Everyone invokes the clouds.
upon by a peacock or a cuckoo.Farewell!
Adirath and mother Radha.You are the son of
give you birth, son?Wasn't I the one
of the Sun God himself.You are the son of
is as good as your brother.Son?
everyone shall be faced withtheir courage and their lives!
your death shall surely occurat my hands!
I have heard thateven Krishna has two mothers.
and is then told that the otheris a reflection of his own
shall suffer as wellhow can that person
I struggled all my lifeto attain respect
for any of it, Vrushali.There was no need
Whom...Whom are you talking about?
personification of my insults.I told myself repeatedly
on that daythat even the son of charioteer
But Arjun...Arjun is my brother, Vrushali.
against Arjun.How can I offer
by Krishna?When it was the time to get over
Those are my brothers, Vrushali!Those are my brothers!
How can I do it?How can I wield a weapon against
my younger brothers?My dear!
My dear! Please...Please approach Queen Kunti
If you stand quietly this wayI shall deduce that you haven't
any beggar or a wretched one...Is anybody there
Karna my son.I am a beggar
I have come herehoping for charity.
Bless you, Arjun!I have no interest in your city.
Hastinapurwere allowed to migrate
That is why,she is your subject.
And what arrangements have youmade for your safety King?
has been imprisoned?Not only mother
The subjects have not beenimprisoned, Prince Sahadev.
such a restriction has beenimposed on them for a while.
work towards the interestof all his subjects.
Do not argue, Nakul.The shadow of a container
its shadow should be cast.All its life
How would the King of Anga knowwhat the truth is
brother Duryodhan says.I have renounced the kingdom
Let us decide right awaywho is superior amongst us!
we will certainlyengage in a battle.
And the Pandavas will notdraw their weapons on a guest.
I am protectedby Lord Surya himself.
but to deliver theirmother's message to them.
right after the reverenceof the city.
she will not enter this city.Are you the only one who knows
your beloved friend?I am a friend of the
Until all of you hadnot heard this message
to protect my friendthe first one
Wonderful, Maharathi Karna.This is what
to her father.Listen, maiden.
does not exist in this world.Before the distance between
you may go after him.Maharathi Karna!
empty-handed, Maharathi Karna.Can I get something
give you as charity, Vrushali.Both the kingdom
The last few coins lefthad been strewn by me
the royal treasurywhat remains with you
your companionshipas charity, Radheya?
With youeven a difficult life
Only if you guide mewill I let you.
and not a spy.King Karna of Anga
are togetherthe maiden will be safe.
Maharathi Karnawill be safe, friend.
The Pandavas have decidedto perform the Rajsuya 'Yajna
but we can fight them.Then we shall fight!
then that sinwill be our cross to bear.
promised each otherthat they will
to this, uncle?When a river floods
the Pandavascan perform the Rajsuya 'Yajna
we can certainly stopthe reverence of the city.
we muststop them,
The Serpent King Takshak.Serpent King
for the reverence of the city.If you wish to have your revenge
you should steal themSerpent King Takshak.
He fled northward with ourone lakh cows, My Lord!
What about the soldiers?- He bit all of them!
But without the cowshow can the reverence
has come upwith a splendid plan.
Employ the serpents of the cityto draw the venom
arrangements to guard the city.With us busy
to attack the city!Let me go get my bow.
is in Panchali's chamber!Apart from brother Yudhishthir,
for the rest of us.For an entire year,
to only one of you.During that period
to whom she givesthe right to do so.
Then...Then I must
I know, Sahadev.In order to protect the cows
after completing my penance.But at the moment
My child.Till the end of this day.
Once we find a chance.We need to kill lady Shikhandini.
The entire Kaurava armywill attempt to keep you
will be to kill you.I and the whole Pandava army...
They'll have to defeat all of us.Warriors!
We must aid Shikhandinito get to grandsire by all means.
Today, we must lift our effort manifold.In order to protect her.
lay down his weapon by all means.Hail Mahadev.
My dead is essential for my liberation.
Though you are presenton the battlefield,
A walls made of bamboo,can stop the wind
This is mandatory to stopArjuna and Vasudev, friend.
reach grandsire.The only person who can
him in warfare.Arjuna, accept this gesture.
- Master!Not even Lord Indra can stop me.
Today, you'll have to satisfy yourself,with the pride of your teaching.
You ought to accept your defeat by my hands.Nobody can stop me from getting to
Ashwathama is fighting a duel with Lady Shikandini.
Direct the launchers towards Bheem.Crush Bheem's army.
Master's son, Ashwathama.My sword is desperate to get
But I am not as kind as him.Death's the only punishment 
Dusshasan should also get a chance.To use his spear to fight.
you are a warrior.What is the situation, Sanjay?
Lady Shikhandini is wounded.And is trying to progress towards Grandsire,
Lady Shikhandini should be unsuccessfulin all attempts.
Yes.Where is Lady Shikhandini?
You still battle like a woman!my lady.
with blood.Your breath seeks permission
My Lady.I shall allow you to leave 
of this birth of mine.Remembering it is the 
However, to ensure His Excellency Bhishma's life,
off till sundown.After which, neither will you be
of the Pandavas.His Excellency is looking constantly 
to move forth, Your Highness.Prince Nakula is battling
Prince Bheem, Your Highness.All the Pandavas are miles away from 
of Shikhandi, Sanjay.If Shikhandi is away from this armour.
It's impossible.In other words...
by Mahadev himself.You cannot render it futile,
you will have to be born again, My Lady.
Your Highness."He has lost a lot of blood.
Splendid.Splendid, Sanjay.
if Shikhandi is injuredthen he will not be able to battle.
impossible.Mother Draupadi!
he has lost a lot of blood.Take her over there.
to camp at once.Only their special
Friendthe sun is about to set.
Shikandi is merely the cause.Your weapons shall be of use in this.
At the moment,it is your duty
his breathing is irregular!Why are my lords Nakul and Sahadev
do something!No!
sister!Get up!
Try to recall, sister...Try to recall
sister.Try to recall
Get up, sister!Get up, sister!
Today,you must take to arms!
borne by a God, sister.You are Indra's "vajra"!
Get up!You are the basis of victory
Sister,you must get up!
sister.I'll give you whatever
you the guru-donationI will not use the skills
you will give methe thumb of your right hand.
Just check.You will be very pleased.
having an innocent'sthumb chopped off?
Go and ask the masterwho to make you an expert archer
So that better archers than youcan't even fire arrows now.
You should be ashamed of makingallegations at the master.
To prove your superiorityyou make one suffer thus?
Take a look atthe chopped thumb.
His future has been chopped offjust because of you!
and your respect has beenlaid to waste too.
Superiority attained incharity has no value.
to never touch the bow.Right now!
about me, master?Can't I become the best
you believe in your master.Have you assumed that
other students?The clouds shower more
can be rightfully decidedonly by a master.
I knowthat the sons of Dhritarashtra
the future generations wouldalso accuse me of being biased.
Can the boundaries of a kingdomcontrol knowledge, master?
the knowledgeis bounded by his oath
given by the Kuru kingdom.So my loyalty is only towards
But...But the allegations
be cleared, master?There is one solution, dear.
Why just Ekalavya?Even Bhishma can't be
Prove it.If you do that
We, the sons of Dhritarashtra,are leaving the seminary.
But we are surewe will not attain anything
can you attain anythingwhen Arjun is here?
You look a bit ill.Father, I want the weapon
Lord Brahma's weapon?Son, to attain the weapon, you
enough?Before you give Brahma's
Son, I haven't taught Arjunabout Brahma's weapon yet.
Why are you so partial to Arjun?Thanks to the partiality
Due to the partiality,the seminary will be shut soon.
If you are displeased,I am sure
But stillI have to clear the doubts in
hurt and displeased ever.Never.
Dronacharya willtake a bath in the river
Everyone should assembleat the river bank.
Go bring my weapon Dushashan!So?
You can surely go.You have my permissions.
from a streamone needs a bigger vessel.
one needs to havea broader mind.
If you leave from here todayyou will surely be very
it is possiblethat you may develop a
Arjun is the best studentof the seminary.
All students are seenlistening to the master
kind of knowledge.Have you ever thought as to why
the real meaning of dedication.By offering flowers on
master's ordersis dedication
Dedicationis achieved indeed when
A student should finish the taskeven before a master instructs.
Until a student doesn'tsee the forms of Lord Brahma, Vishnu and Mahesh*
until then his dedicationisn't true.
Dedication is the feelingof our heart
Isn't our ignoranceonly because our mind
Servant!Bring that maid Draupadi
what's the news?It's a sad news, Your Highness.
has no end to herpain and insult.
you've been ordered at once tobe present at the royal court.
without permission!Fool!
of Emperor Duryodhan.Please come along to abide by
merely the game of gamblingnot his life!
But the slaves don't have rightsto order, Your Highness.
along with you.Now you are
Go and tell Duryodhanthat Empress Draupadi refuses
The already cut down treecan neither grow
If Yudhishthirahad already lost himself
Gotell Duryodhan.
Your Highness.If Yudhishthira had already
to stake his wife.That means
not vice versa.The husband
A wife,certified by the scriptures
as her husband's property.Therefore, the moment
That means, neitherYudhishthira lost Draupadi
Is that whatall of you want to prove?
in this royal court.None of you has a right
Master Drona.You won't get answer to such a
the most righteous personfor this answer.
will be taken as falsity.Tell me.
Please remain mum, brother.Please don't mind committing
Speak up, slave Yudhishthira.Was staking Draupadi right
What have you done, brother!Did you pay heed, Master Drona?
in the royal court.If that egoistic lady
and bring over here, dragging.Dushasan!
Keep quiet!Just keep quiet, slave!
I have attainedthat slave Draupadi
Don't forget, Duryodhanthat God lies in 'Shivlinga'*
it yields the sparks!I will burn you to ashes!
If you want to committhe wrong
how you insultyour elder brother Yudhishthira.
the limit set by him.Tell him
Take your weaponsand leave this royal court!
Dushasan, go.Bring that handmaid
Prince Dushasanis entering your room.
in the royal court!Don't cross your limit, Prince!
will burn to ashes!Shut up, slave Draupadi!
by Emperor Duryodhan.Come!
for which you're beingcalled to the court.
How dare you insult me?If you have the guts
in the presenceof the empress.
No!Come!
Your freedom!Your honour!
Leave me, you wicked man...Dushasana! 
VidurI will not be returning to
you cannot take sucha big decision.
My endeavours havebeen completed.
Now because of methere will be no void
In Ved Vyas' seminaryI shall spend the rest
and return toHastinapur.
This...is the orderof the Queen Mother.
one last order.I had come here
And you...You are taking Kuru empire's
your responsibilitythat Hastinapur's throne
Go, Vidur.Citizens!
can never beforgotten.
ordersthat the one month long
Hence, in the entireKuru empire
and blissful occasionscan begin all
His Highness has announcedthe first celebration.
enthronement asthe Crown Prince
The public hasbeen ordered
the entire Kuru empiremay have festivities.
King Dhritarashtra!Hail King Pandu!
It's 'Long live King Pandu'.Long live King Pandu.
It's twelve again...- Kind attention!
Disperse!Greetings, grandsire.
I have heardthat a game of dice
Peace!Definitely, Your Excellency.
any trouble.My shoulders have been
Your Excellency?By the orders
can be reduced to cinders by mejust by my gaze.
the permissionof His Highness!
Please...Please have a seat.
BecausePrince
Your scores aren't sufficient,Your Excellency.
A minimum ofsix points,
Indeed, I do,Your Excellency.
away, Your Excellencyhence King Dhritarashtra is
the Emperor.Two.
Three.His Highness has complete
His Highness' ordersfor you, are tantamount
Five.People's associations
of the Chief Minister.Six.
Duryodhan's enthronementas the Crown Prince.
Prince Shakuni.One.
being consultedeven the king can't
Pandu has passed away.But Queen Mother is still alive.
Whether it's Dhritarashtra'sson becoming the king
But Kuru empire's traditionshan't be broken either.
that Dhritarashtra isheavily influenced by you.
the coronation ofthe Crown Prince shan't happen.
Or else, do remember,Prince Shakuni.
I have a request.If it's regarding Duryodhan's
How could you decide withoutconsulting the Chief Minister?
He is never unjust...You could trust him,
born sightlessrather you've just
My distrust is my wealthand my power!
- Indeed, Your Highness.But does His Highness distrust
Your Highness.It's the hearsay of the subjects
as the Crown Prince.Or if His Highness was so weak
Is Vidur the de jure king?Your Highness, my heart
have less witand more power. What can
Your Highness. A mere fool.Whilst worrying about
a path leading to sorrows.Forgive me, Your Highness.
are like the stench of garbage.They ride the winds
Your Highnessthat in a packed assembly
But, Your Highness,the question still stays
make this announcement.If Vidur refuses
I am a kingnot a puppet to be
I'm not able to understandwhy you changed your colours.
My intentions aren'tany such, dear Gandhari.
The king to the throneof Hastinapur
Any at all.Don't go, Karna.
what could youpossibly achieve by that?
I have promised you, mother.I will return soon
No, son.Now you will never return,
any Suta warrior.But, my lord...
He wishes to master archery.So he must give it a try.
What use is success,unless people accept it?
Tradition being the pretense todestroy my skill, isn't a right
only for a short while.I am not giving up
Kuru province.One among the skill centres
This is my solemn oath.That means, you will clash
by puffing out its cheeksthat it may clash with a bull.
Am I a toad or a Taurus?Even if I waste a lifetime in
Bless me, mother.Father
and return soon.And I will live right here,
Son...The head that bows before others
unrighteousness any longer!King Dhritarashtra,
makes even the smallestof birds shudder.
did your heartnot quiver even once?
but He certainly hasgiven you ears.
Great Guru Drona?The rules of this game
King Dhritarashtrayou are indeed unable to see
so grieved to be blindwhich you would
Great Guru Dronaotherwise I shall take revenge
but Ihave a request.
I cannot live the lifeof a servant!
FatherI am standing by my friend.
I bet my friend Ashwatthamain the game.
Great Guru Dronayou have been ordered
As my son has beenbet in this game
this court, Great Guru Drona.I too shall forget
that henceforthyou will never leave
I promise you.Then do be seated, Guru Drona.
then he may betanother brother of his.
No, brother Arjun.It is crucial for brother Bheem
this foreboding feelingthat I have.
will happen in this court today.Please stop that.
Do play.King Ashwatthama of Kampilya
the son of Lady Madri, Sahadevneeds to be bet by you.
within yourselfthen stop this game
I am merely an embankmentmade of sand, Kunti.
has assumed the form of a flood.I will crumble
You are bound to crumble,Your Highness.
you will indeed crumble.I am the Empress
shall be given by me.Gatekeeper
Women of royaltyare not allowed in this court!
for an Empress.Stop this game,
This game is unrighteous!Do not play this game.
Break that promise!When an ironsmith gets entangled
of Prince Arjun is on your sideand even the mace
Dear Yudhishthirlest you lose your throne
but now,these very rules
Get up, dear.Get up, dear Yudhishthir.
brother Yudhishthir.Do get up.
May the Emperor have happiness!Your Highness, despite being
to honour my promises.I cannot order you
towards the Aryan regionand all the Kings who
carry out that duty?Arjun
You might as welldisregard that duty.
Nakulwhy are you kneeling down there?
Why should youaccept its result?
your righteous ways.Do play,
I have bet Ashwatthamaand you need to bet Sahadev.
my husband instead.Is this what you call
Do play.Stop!
of women of royaltythis game shall not be played.
I am not bound to take ordersfrom anyone else
Splendid,Your Highness.
climbing up a mountain slipshe ends up straight
even the smallestof an unrighteous deed
Now, you shouldorder the Empress
we shall leave.My darling
what happened?What happened in the court?
for the both of you to leave.I require some solitude.
honouring righteousness there.Vishnu, who blesses
Accept me as your son, mother.I am taking my son to Gokul.
of my friend Nand.- But...
A battalion of soldiersis standing outside.
must have flooded.Under such circumstances,
to Gokul?No, Your Highness. No!
Bless your son.What a terrible night,
It is the most terrible nightof my life
You are not asking me for it,Vasudev.
Before the sun risesevery night seems
My wife Yashodahas given birth
and hand your son over,under my protection.
your daughter.In that case,
Here, Vasudev.Take her with you.
Your Highness, a boyhas been born.
your eight offspring?Your son. My nemesis!
I have given birthto a daughter.
to a daughter.Daughter!
your son will bethe cause of my death.
to a daughter?How is this possible?
Your Highness.God wants to show you
was not bornand the eighth child
Devaki.No, brother!
possibly do to you?Spare the life of at least
Foolish Devakihad I not promised Vasudev
I can't spare the lifeof your eighth child.
Brother, let her go.- You are my nemesis.
Let me go! No!Now, the prophecy
Brother... Let my daughter go.Let her go!
Let my daughter go.Let her go! No!
Enemy of the Yadav clan, Kansyour wickedness has crossed
The moon does get eclipsed.But the eclipse doesn't last
he will slay you.The boy who will punish you
he will slay you.Did Yogmaya* once again merge with Vishnu, uncle?
To establish lawfulness,Lord Vishnu's Yogmaya
sometimes, devotionand sometimes,
this miracle take placeas soon as you were born, uncle?
cannot perform miracles.One who is born
of a mortal body.He cannot escape
But a miracledid take place, uncle.
was performed by God.When every person heartily feels
a lawful society...When sin crosses
God performs miraclesto protect morality.
gives up his selfishnessand attachment
with miracles.Because of the sacrifices
a miracle took placein that prison, dear.
his last iota of powerGod performs miracles
the Pandavas were subjectedto a lot of injustice.
Even after so much humiliation,pain and oppression
this creation and Godthen first of all
and learn to fightagainst the circumstances!
this palace is madewith dried grass,
everything will get burntwithin six hours.
from the kitchen.You have my permission.
all the food, My Lord.Be quiet.
But I do not understand,brother Yudhishthir.
an entire forest fireusing a single 'Varunastra'.*
thought about it.He did.
The mouse diedupon eating the 'kheer'.
You may have it.Besides, a mother eats only when
to feed you some 'kheer'.Alright.
When you feed me,I feel satiated.
That is impossible,my Vrikodar.
And I have committed no sinthat the Almighty will
Open your mouth.That 'kheer' has been
The mouse died upon eating it.Mother, get up. This palace
were all part of a scheme!That way, everyone would think
to talk, brother Bheem.We must first catch
take him to Hastinapur.Let's go.
Never did I imaginethat brother Duryodhan
such a thing, Sahadev?Then your power of imagination
He had poisoned me.But we were children back then.
How could he do it now?- I will crush Duryodhan's head
when death approachesa deer makes its way
the feet of us 100 brothers.Right now!
of a place is this?No one seems happy
we are refugees hereand have no right
This is a big kingdom.You can ask for food
a father must have taught you.Yudhishthir
From whom did yourcharacterless mother
the reason of your worrywill come to an end,
the feet of us 100 brothers.Right now!
-...we are refugees here...Mother, what kind
This is a big kingdom.You can ask for food
a father must have taught you.Very soon,
brother Bheem.Brother Bheem is correct,
our weapons even nowwe will be termed
brother Yudhishthir!I await it!
What are you saying, mother?How can we calm down?
He schemed to burn you,our mother!
is not an option any longer.The gates of that kingdom
Why should we not go there?It is our home.
A place filled with enemiesis not a home
Anger pervades such a place.Doubt infests
in such a place, son.We cannot live
is the Crown Princeand he has the right
We do not want any throne!Your father had
Did you forget that?You were even born
where sages would meditate.There was no misery.
We had gone thereasking for a family.
If we do not haveany right to their love
Yudhishthirif Duryodhan wants polity
like an erupting volcano!I would be a disgrace if I
give Duryodhan?When Bheem was poisoned
King Dhritarashtra hasforgotten at the moment
Right now, he is just a fatherof his 100 sons.
He will receive no punishment.The one to be punished
All of you are capable.You can revolt
then my husband's soulwill grieve in heaven.
then we will have to livewith such conspiracies.
The only property I have with meare the five sons of mine.
any of you dying will be likegoing through hell to me.
in every momentof the rest of my life?
Duryodhan needs to succeedjust once, son.
succeed, mother!Never!
If you stay there, you willlose your peace of mind!
He will extinguishyour righteousness!
But, Iwill lose in both the cases.
will award me misery for lifeor righteousness dying within
have all of you chosen for me?Answer me.
such a big world.Why would we choose a place
nor be contented?Why would we
If it is your orderthen we shall certainly
Did they eat all the 'laddoos'?Not all, but most of them.
Wait.I had kept this 'laddoo
as well.I don't know why, mother.
I am satiated instantly.Because I'm content at heart and
in feeding all five of my sonswith my own hands.
I shall only bear misfortune.Your son shall be
of my sons?King Shantanu may have just
the royal palace with his son.Or the pleasure of living with
My father shall haveboth these pleasures
swear uponthe sanctity of my mother.
I swear to a life of celibacy.On these banks of yours,
stopped him then.If you had stopped him then
Why didn't you stop him?Why?
They take various oathsand make many promises.
It isn't my dutyto hinder one's oaths.
*One of the two headstreams of the Ganges.For twenty five years you have
of being a king.But when he renounced royalty,
Every human who visits my banksis my son.
Therefore, isn't Bheeshmasignificant to you?
But that significancelies in his heart.
The bad state that Hastinapurand the Kuru clan is in today
Because your vision has the giftof foresight, nof mine.
Every moment, the fear of deathtorments the human heart.
protection.So, did you find protection?
And humiliation at this old age?Curses and distrust
of water, is your decision.But once you take a decision it
It was my fault indeed.But, I didn't possess the power
consequence of his deference.I know.
to do it, Ganga.Please, show me the path.
You hadn't sought anyone'sadvice.
You have to decide by yourself,Satyavati.
To have a happy and safe future.To take such decisions today is
Aren't most of your decisionsbacked by thoughts for future?
their life simple and happy.But no one knows the future.
decisions of lifebased on imagination.
Think about it.The basis of all pleasures
is result of selfishnessor out of your sense of duty?
Salutations, Queen Mother!Salutations, Queen Mother!
Fortunately, it didn't hinder memy entire life.
What do you mean, Queen Mother?Vidur.
the respect you truly deserve.But I never did so.
But today...Today I have realized
I am here to take you along,on my journey.
I shall bring Pandu backto manage the throne
What ritual have you organized,elder brother?
Have a seat.- No, brother.
I shall not participatein the ritual.
my husband and my children.The descendants of
Then it is a dispute between youand your spouse.
the throne of Hastinapurand that's acceptable to you
Why would that happen, Shakuni?My successor can be none other
They will see to it thatno injustice is done.
to another pond.A stork said...
Sit within my beak'.Did you understand anything,
why did Queen Motherremember Pandu all of a sudden?
Indeed!I have been thinking of the same
Queen Mother indeed embarkedupon this journey, why did
to help King Panducomplete his penance,
Have a seat.Let us take a pledge.
To break the Kuru dynastyinto pieces?
to be divided?Why would I violate
His Highness's offspringbe called 'Kaurav'.
father?It can be shot all the way
with my hands.What is the need of a bow
brother Bheem.It's a matter of piercing
father?The strength of a bow
son.A weapon is only as handy
beneficial as one's will power.I do not understand, father.
speed, it can uproot trees.The tree that get uprooted,
blooms new leaves and flowersafter a certain time.
Even when the odds areagainst him
a tree, some trees die.But there are some trees,
from withinthen he should not give in
against unfavourablecircumstances outside.
Queen Mother.Arrangements for your meals
upon that river bank.I have no need for rest, Vidur.
For many yearsI have lived
You had enthroned King Pandueven before this, Queen Mother.
It isn't the fault of fate.If my decisions were
But the reasons behindmy decisions
within my mind.But I had restrained that
It flows between the banks...But its water...
trees within that forest.A Queen Mother's life is
But if her affection and respectdoes not reach across the nation
So, will brother Pandu heedyour words, Queen Mother?
Pandu will surely heed my words.I shall convince him.
these leaves, the bark of trees,the excitement of the birds...
that if we wish such a spring tobloom within our subjects' lives
In the spring, even Lord Shiva'spenance was broken for a moment.
Mother!Mother!
I don't know why, mother.But my heart is quivering.
I am nothing.But I am also everything.
as well.When you reflect on your own being.
And then, like me,you'll find that you are also within the avatar
it is important for you to wholly submit to me.
It is a state of mindwhere one surrenders all one's desires.
for anyone according towhat is requested from him.
to someone.That commitment is called submission.
A student committed to his teacher.Isn't all these submissions the same?
or questions.Commitment to someone evil,
is no better than a harlot.And because of
he will get punishment in this war.Is that so?
That's why, Arjuna,it is important to commit oneself 
loyalty to friends, they are butsome forms of loyalty.
But is dedication to Godmust be fulfilled with "sankhya yoga" 
human knows that they are only souls.
from the bind.And that's because through dedication
and knows about the Almighty.A human is in the circle of life and death.
and becomes the Almighty.Just like water falls into a river,
that this human body has no value, Madhav?
and learnings from the previous life,the soul becomes part of a new body.
a human body.But, Madhav, by killing people that 
chance of liberation?Your enemies have gone past the limits 
Liberation for them is not possible.Sinners only given chance
but it becomes necessary to punish him,for his 100th offence.
Righteousness is stopping them committing sins.
corrupted with evils.And become part of a new human body.
If you fight this war with this logic,it would be justifed.
they will meet their souls.This is the relation between 'kshetra'* and 'kshetragna'.*
When one knows,that one's body is like this dirt,
and standing on top of it is 'kshetragna'.Then through his body,
the 3 righteousness,annihilates darkness,
it becomes one with the Almighty.But the worshipper
That is the first step to dedication.In reality, dedication is not a duty.
to purify its soul.Through prayers, repentaces,
And remain devoted to the Almighty.Devoting all his actions,
to the Almighty.If dedication is only a state of mind,
to be repeatedly reminded of the Almighty.That's why it is important
One needs to remind oneself, all the time,
what's important is that you dive in it.There's only one dedication in 'bhakti yoga',
one will keep one's dedication to the Almighty,
Violence without reason or necessity, is not right, Arjuna.
refrain from anger, sacrifice,peace of mind, refrain from mocking,
greatness, compassion, patience,do not indulge in self praise, not egoistic,
Only with help from these, a human becomes my true worshiper.
I know if my soul (atma),is eternal.
one attains peace of mind and happiness in life.
submittance to you.But, Madhav, you say
or all place,but
I want to have a glimpse of your true being, Madhav.
divine form. I want to see it, Madhav.
to quash all doubts in my heart.Show your self, Madhav.
Through that discipline (karma yoga), one attains spirituality.
This form is the base of all knowledge and sciences.
This form I manifested for you, Arjuna.I reside in each and every particle 
galaxy, and constellations reside in me.I did not get the opportunity
Look.Those prints got washed away
does not meanthat the ones who made them
the Pandavas are alive?I do not know
But why do you not answer mewhether they are alive or not?
that it is time forthe entire society to change.
But what do they get in return?They get hunger, poverty
and Emperors get wealthier.Have you ever seen a King who is
for their happiness.A King who is concerned
And this is what Godcalls unrighteousness.
in order to salvage the world,God gives birth to people
Until things changeuntil subjects of a kingdom
do not die, Rukmini.I have complete faith
in Panchal.Why in Panchal?
because there in the mudof unrighteousness
Such a power is aboutto be born there
And I have to go thereto protect this power.
Panchal- the City of Kampilya.
giving him water, Shikhandini?If they do not get water,
of killing a sage, father.Fool!
but a charlatan!All of them are charlatans!
it is best for that riverto dry up.
then whyshould I allow you to live?
Your Highness.You shall not have a son.
by killing these sagesyou are paving your way to hell.
and Upayaja,**Two sage brothers that lived on the banks of the Ganga.
performing a 'yajna' for me.Are you scared now
but for that ofthousands of sages.
you are going to performa charade of a 'yajna?
you wish to perform the 'yajnagreat sage Yaja?
And when youaccept your daughter
And when youaccept your daughter
- Daughter!I have got nothing
the honour of her father!She cannot take revenge
At the time of her birth,everyone had said
He had insulted my father!She was supposed to
my father passed away!But she did nothing.
then so be it!She can stay in a corner
want a son.Your words reflect ignorance,
that life sprang in all spheres.King Drupad
for the re-establishmentof righteousness.
our meal, Arjun.Come on.
a palace from mebut not my teeth and stomach.
but as long as I can eatnothing can pain me.
Do begin.Stop, mother.
When we were diningfor the first time in Hastinapur
nor bow our heads before anyone.But all of us must take turns
How dare you, Vidur?!Divide the Kuru Kingdom!
But in a situation like thisthis is the only solution
have struggled a lotand have sacrificed many things
in the entire world!Just look at our ancestors.
My revered father Shantanumade this kingdom powerful.
and you wishto break it, Vidur?!
the kingdom to be dividedthen he must have
He thought of our happiness.To keep internal conflicts
But how can the divisionof our motherland
that we must ask for our rights.Not for us but the subjects
equate to dividingthe kingdom, Bheem?
get divided.Uncle
in the same container.They can never mix.
Uncleif we wish to make happiness
is the sole solution.Impossible!
This is my kingdom.This is my kingdom!
No one can even dare to thinkof dividing this kingdom.
of Pandu alive in Kampilyathen... - Then what would
have always bound youin the name of righteousness.
That is why,after declaring
to tell you about it.Father
Grandsire and the Ministerare here to serve you.
And wheneverit concerns my rights
status and positionthen why would anyone else?
Grandsire will bedeeply anguished.
But brother YudhishthirMadhav had said that we
be correct?Subjects can also be served
Just to gain hold of politywe cannot have
and step downas the Crown Prince.
but he is so only becauseof Bhishma and the Minister.
are the armour and weaponsof His Highness.
it does not know defeat.However, if the tortoise
You seem to be forgetting themight of us 100 brothers, uncle!
and that of King Karna of Anga...When he is backed
need to be afraid?!You should demonstrate
my sons?What do I do?!
It was an insult to you.We have a splendid opportunity
Just think aboutmy suggestion, uncle.
and I am certain of it.But if amber is covered
Hence, he is unableto think righteously.
that Dhritarashtrawill heed my advice.
Great BhishmaI bring an exceedingly
the Pandavasto be taken into custody.
to take all of you into custody.Greetings, great Bhishma.
a 'yajna,' sire.He has given the order
has come to meet him.I have something important
is in a crisisone cannot earn merit
- As you say, sire.Soldier!
You cannot be bound even byiron shackles, Prince Vrikodar
Even I am bound by them!An order is far stronger
on this planetwhich can imprison
spend our lives in prison.Following a King's order
then how can the subjectsof a kingdom?
It broke.Soldier!
Bring about ten ropes which areused to bind an elephant.
preventing brother from breakingthe rope while having 'laddoos.
There is only one solution,Panchali.
Even mother willsuggest the same.
I do not covet any land,My Lord.
then I am ready to do so.But...
do you think, we shouldnot apologize to the King?
then face the punishment.But if not, then protest
How can I dispenseadvice to you?
if one apologizes to someoneinferior to him
is stronger than youthen apologizing to him
Panchali.Do not worry.
Panchaliif we will be imprisoned
You should get readyto leave for Kampilya.
We must take a different path.This way!
Those cowards haveset it ablaze on all sides.
The 'Varunastra'...No!
The walls are starting to melt,eldest brother!
If you bathe,recounting this tale
Lord Krishna had narrated to me,the tale of Goddess Saraswati.
Even we must find a waythrough the ground.
Make haste!Mother!
Brother Bheem!Brother Bheem!
Eldest brother! Take motheraway to a safe place.
We will wait for you, Arjun!We cannot go without you!
Arjun!Take mother away from here!
the flames are rising!No, Arjun!
Take mother to a safe place.Go!
- No!Brother, we won't leave
- We will all wait, mother!We lived together.
Before any flameeven touches mother
Arjun!My dear Arjun!
imprison my sons, uncle?What... What crime
to find out exactly that.Do hurry, uncle.
reeks of onion.Same is the case with the
If this news spreads acrossthe Aryan region then...
Dhritarashtra!A 'yajna' is performed
One needs to bathe in the Gangesto wash away one's sins.
Great BhishmaWhy such anger?!
He has imprisoned the Pandavas!People who dare to take
You had told me that the culpritwho does not get punished
Yes, I did say that.That is the exact reason
You cannot imprisonthe Pandavas!
I had told you before.If I see Hastinapur
against itand that will not
punishment to Arjun, My Lordbut what are you
My Lord.Your Highness
No, grandsire.The order of His Highness
Dhritarashtra!So, is this your
Now, I shall take my decision.Great Bhishma...
Great Bhishma!That was utter foolishness!
I am going back on my words.Politics is just like gambling,
beloved Duryodhan?Just like the Almighty
Do you wish to see this,beloved Duryodhan?
The Pandavas will notretaliate against you
retaliate against youbecause I am bound by my oath.
Grandsire, because of usyou cannot revolt against
as your oath.Dear Yudhishthir
Soldierspick up your weapons!
If that old manis not on your side
Even if the Pandavasleave Hastinapur
will attack Hastinapur.That old man's absence
Kailash** so.*, ** An anthropomorphic deity who was one of Shivas two door-keepers of Kailash.
Tell His Highnessto apologize
Uncle.Minister
does not declareYudhishthir King
Grandsireplease calm down.
That is not adequate.This kingdom has always
Unclegive me the opportunity
for the crime of takingto arms in the court
to fast for a dayas punishment.
To all of you.Will you not pardon
pardon uncle, King of Gandhar.He pardoned us
Crown Prince.Your Excellency
wishes to apologize to you.If you come by his chamber
Go on.I will be there.
Goodbye, Minister.You were correct, Vidur.
Dividing this beloved landof our ancestors
It would be betterif we leave Hastinapur.
but only as a Kingand not a hermit.
mother Satyavati has ordered meto declare you King.
butby helping you get half of it
then uncle will have to declarebrother Yudhishthir the King.
will get tainted as well.This is what I fear.
We know whatrighteousness is, grandsire.
what the desired action is?Dear
In other wordsin Yudhishthir's kingdom.
; http://www.aegisub.org/Title: mhbr season 001 dvd 001
Scroll Position: 144Active Line: 168
[V4 Styles]Format: Name, Fontname, Fontsize, PrimaryColour, SecondaryColour, TertiaryColour, BackColour, Bold, Italic, BorderStyle, Outline, Shadow, Alignment, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, AlphaLevel, Encoding
Format: Marked, Start, End, Style, Name, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, Effect, TextDialogue: Marked=0,0:00:05.96,0:00:08.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your son is expecting
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:20.07,0:00:23.08,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Taking a vow of purity of my mother.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:24.14,0:00:28.11,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I promise to love and\Nmy father's belief in Satyavati.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:39.08,0:01:41.08,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vowing never ending!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:44.12,0:01:46.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Such a great help!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:55.07,0:01:56.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But it serves as a punishment?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:57.00,0:01:58.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Do not say that.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:32.10,0:02:35.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My son, give me a\Nopportunity to return the favor.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:35.07,0:02:36.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Have a liking to me.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:20.02,0:03:22.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And when you're expecting to die.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:22.99,0:03:26.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Only with such and be like that.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:40.87,0:03:43.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And call as Bheeshma!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:07.86,0:05:10.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,(Panchal, 35 years later)\N"Laws him, oh my lord!"
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:15.87,0:05:18.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,- Law of him!\N- Law of him, O my lord!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:23.07,0:05:25.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,People Panchal!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:32.08,0:05:35.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Heir apparent of the kingdom of Kuru!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:36.99,0:05:39.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Prince Vichitravirya!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:58.94,0:06:01.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,By entering in a drunken stateDialogue: Marked=0,0:06:01.05,0:06:04.08,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He has dared to enter the limits of our kingdom!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:09.99,0:06:11.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,By burning the fields of our farm.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:11.99,0:06:14.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,It is a more serious crimes\Nof the killing of a human being!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:22.90,0:06:26.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Death!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:26.97,0:06:28.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Execute him!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:43.09,0:06:45.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,To protect me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:51.03,0:06:54.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,God of death has taken\NShantanu father's life.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:36.88,0:07:38.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Destroy him!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:38.88,0:07:43.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Legal die! Execute him!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:53.05,0:08:55.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If he has made a mistake,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:55.95,0:08:57.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He will regret his actions.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:02.06,0:09:06.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Prince has made a mistake\Nto enter the territory Panchal!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:07.00,0:09:11.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,We just take\Nadvantage of this opportunity.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:54.04,0:10:58.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Bheeshma! You must accept the result\Nof humiliation does.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:58.04,0:11:02.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Someone will be born here,\Nthe soil of the kingdom Panchal!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:41.09,0:11:43.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,We can not continue\Ntravel farther.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:43.05,0:11:44.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The road ahead has in the block.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:49.95,0:13:53.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Amba, the warriors told me that\NYou will not be able to do so.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:53.92,0:13:54.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But I know you can.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:59.99,0:14:02.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,King, if something happens between us,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:03.90,0:14:06.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will make the whole world is on fire.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:33.89,0:14:35.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Grab your gun, prince.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:35.93,0:14:37.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,- Do not, my brother! No.\N- Get the gun!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:07.96,0:15:10.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Such as swords, sticks,\Nbow arrows, and spears.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:10.90,0:15:15.07,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But you only learn how to hold\Na glass of alcohol in your hand.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:22.14,0:15:24.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But as a weak king,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:24.98,0:15:28.11,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Can not hold the throne\Nof the kingdom of Hastinapur.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:33.99,0:15:36.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,- Get the gun, prince.\N- No, brother, Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:36.95,0:15:38.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Get the gun!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:11.12,0:16:14.10,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Highness, Prince inappropriate\Nto get a penalty.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:14.86,0:16:16.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,- He has...\N- What did he do?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:28.07,0:16:32.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,His Majesty, the Prince had never\Nwon the battle on the battlefield.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:32.94,0:16:38.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The main task of a king is\Nknow their strengths and weaknesses.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:45.96,0:16:49.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vichitravirya know his ability.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:51.06,0:16:53.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You are my strength, Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:58.90,0:17:03.11,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,They do not have the right to do the\Ninappropriate in a prince or a king.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:09.08,0:17:10.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And Bheeshma,
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:36.07,0:17:38.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,It will be pure and noble.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:43.11,0:17:44.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Majesty, I
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:41.91,0:18:46.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And their actions will give\Nan identity in the world.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:47.11,0:18:53.15,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What other things are more valuable\Nof the things to think about their future?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:18.14,0:19:23.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Good or bad value has been\Ninstilled by the parents,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:23.88,0:19:26.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Adequate or inadequate\Nlessons taught by them,
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:36.99,0:19:41.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This means, the way parents\Nchildren develop their character.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:42.90,0:19:46.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Its future will be much like\Nthey have taught.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:59.92,0:20:03.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,So parents are worried\Nabout the future of their children,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:20:04.02,0:20:07.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Their children were never\Nbeneficial of any case.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:20:14.03,0:20:17.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The whole world will praise the children like it.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:20:18.94,0:20:21.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You have to think about it.
Father, I have to gowelcome them! - You are a fool.
You wished to please him?Do you think competing against
than any 'Kshatriya'.Upon knowing this, will it
so many times.The son of a charioteer
please the kingbut your dedication towards
affectionate look.Just like mother Radha.
Karna, no.Look at that, your Highness.
They must have welcomed you so.Long live King Pandu!
Four.One, two, three, four.
but the one who knowshow to overcome them
cannot be overcome, Shakuni.Those are like shackles of fate.
Some obstacles are likeshackles of fate.
the obstacle you face?If the dice roll...
In other words, the dice canliberate you from the shackles.
Befriend them!I am not talking about
- Life!Life!
It is all in our heads.We have memories.
but wemistake him a for a human being,
Shakuni?Prince Pandu
To me, welcoming him is likerolling the dice right.
Sukta said thatDhritarashtra does not
But the new bride must bewelcomed by Gandhari, sister.
by Kripacharya's wife.It was so for there was
But if there is a married womanin the family
wouldn't that be an ill omen,Queen Mother?
Greetings, sister-in-law.- Greetings.
the Queen of Hastinapur.Sister-in-law
Do bless her.What do I bless you with, Kunti?
a long live and welfare...You have already been
her wishes will come trueand that she will
You are correct,mother Ambalika.
Where is brother Dhritarashtra?Is he still angry?
install their familydeities in this temple.
for the consecrationritual of the idol.
butneither did I get the
In the journey from the kingdomof Kunti to Hastinapur
His valour, his generosityhis fondness towards my Lord...
blesses meI would not require blessings
whether or not I have the rightto say this.
what I heard in Kuntinagaris making me a little restless.
is not good.There is no thorn
has a very big heart.To say it cannot house
If you have heard that there'sa conflict between them
started this rumour.Your brother-in-law has
compete against each otherlove always triumphs.
A warrior engages in a battle,Shakuni
Battle.Deceit is like a battle,
Do not consider deceitto be bad, your Highness.
call it deceitand the ones who benefit from it
Prince Pandu rolled thedice perfectly
nothing but hatredtowards King Pandu.
keep our minds calmcontrol our anger
Attention!King Pandu is
Congratulations, your Highness.Upon hearing that you
that his younger brothercan never lose.
He kept saying thatyou would have reached
round of the game.Then he was free to go.
Love!Love!
Two dutiful wives.Brother...
If you allow me thenmay I go and get her?
No, we should go and greet her.It is the right of a new bride
Your Highness...I request you
tomorrow morning.Besides, he does not have
the Queen of Hastinapur.Alright.
your blessings, brother.Certainly.
certainly bless themwas good thinking
is finally makingsome sense to you.
of our futuredepends upon our decisions
of someone else's adviceand someone else's suggestion?
in the same situation.A devotee in a temple
that given an opportunityhe would steal
dispenses righteous adviceand a depraved heart
propels man towards happiness.But accepting such advice
In other words, before acceptingsomeone's suggestion or advice
not important?Think about it.
But if one hides the truthto escape from harm
And till the time you havethis thread on your wrist
about my past.In the journey
to tell him about it.We hardly had any privacy.
the first thing I will dois tell him about my past.
would have learnedthat he is the
turned to anger, Radha.You are well aware, Radha
and not become warriors.But why, father?
is always commended.Do not argue with me, Karna.
Is this what you aretrying to say?
The warriors of the kingdomwill see him as a rival.
I feel, the King will be pleasedand will give me a reward.
the best in a societyis a true king.
I already said that thisconcerns our family's safety!
but also of the entire society!Yet you insist
You may do so.Here is an arrow.
can defeat warriorshas been born in
your mother and I.We will brave it.
May fortune always residein this abode of yours.
of their righteousness.Bless you, daughter!
And I shall always pray foryour safety, Dhrishtadyumna.
and that of a wifein her patience.
a husband must be patientand a wife must display valour.
the entire Kuru dynastywill get cleansed and purified.
I look forwardto meeting you, Madhav.
But do remember something.Yato Dharma Tato Jaya.
This is a difficult pathbut it is my fate.
I seek your permission...Vasudev
Five?The Pandavas are not five
of the same powerlike the five faced Panchamukhi* Hanuman.
is in the best interestof everyone.
There is no place for any doubt,Minister Vidur.
to brave all challenges.Granted that their life
that it shall indeedbe successful.
to safeguard the throneof Hastinapur, Minister.
and the throne of Hastinapurwill be at the centre.
from where you are standing?51 steps.
my destinationhas always been this throne.
My son!My heir
need not wait to be anointed.Father may have
is a right he does not have.Then what is the meaning
the greatness of the kingdommany Kings have
not give up your kingdom,father?
with this insult.Today, this sword will
My Lord.Do you know
51 steps, My Lord.No.
And...And those seven steps
While making one's wayto the throne
Today, Isaw the seventh hell, Gandhari
My...My own...
The fault mustcertainly be mine, My Lord.
And a father is his son's ideal.So, is it the fault
it out, Gandhari.You
I cannot do, Gandhari.That is something I cannot do.
no son has ever revoltedagainst his father.
that he will break traditionsand revolt against his father
He will revolt.He will revolt.
people ask for the thronefor their sons
Duryodhan is certainly my heirbut...
He will certainly take to armsagainst me, Gandhari.
also runs through his veins.The plants that grow
Gandhari.Tomorrow
I shall indeed do so.Kripacharya
Pardon me, Your Highnessbut I request you
in his absencewill be incorrect.
Stop!Prince Uttar.
Pandu's son?Are you Arjun himself?
Today, Arjun will fight,not Brihannala!
the laws of the battlefield.This surely is
Yes, prince Duryodhan!This indeed is Arjun.
seems to instillterror in your heart.
from this bow?You were very eager
Before commencing the battleI convey my greetings
I, Arjun, the son of Panduowing to the archery skills
Prince Duryodhan!I have waited days and nights
the laws of the battlefield!Arjun!
Because your exilehas rendered to be a failure.
Look towards the sun!The duration of my exile
If you act immorallyI shall crush you!
shall dispense justice!Friend Karna.
my arrows, Grandsire?Grandsire Bheeshma, does Arjun
barrier you conjured, Grandsire!Please clear the way yourself!
Grandsire Bheeshma!Such partiality!
an ongoing battle?Grandsire, this is
Let this battle commence!Duryodhan, you fool!
Or elseArjun shall obliterate you all!
then get out of the way!I do not need
O' armoured one!My heart does need protection.
Cease this battle for today.Do not sabotage your Grandsire's
my own kin is shedwon't the heart of your
of this terrible sight.I have the boon
to crave for death, O' lad.Do not say that, Grandsire.
I shall experience damnationall though my life.
how can I raise my armagainst that person?
Please respect yourGrandsire's word.
But you must give me your word.If in future
you shall not stop me!Promise me, Grandsire!
shall never arise.Because you shall dwell
The chance for battlehas arisen, Prince Duryodhan!
it faces death that very moment!All the deer is left with
Prince Duryodhan!Soon, the five Pandavas
guised as your death!Come!
Come!The way, in the courtroom
the entire Arya clanthe same way,
does not make a woman pristine.How could such a woman
with five men at once?Such women are harlots!
to shed tears.Only blood shall be shed now.
Do you think I thirst for blood,my love?
That scene fromthe filled courtroom
Now I just yearn for warday and night.
The determinationto cleanse the society
it develops medicinal qualities.Therefore, Lord Krishna
but a craving for justice.Arjun is right, Panchali.
the sons of Dhritarashtrashall be announced.
the Arya clan's heiress.The punishment of
The Pandavasare still bound to dwell the
When Arjun had enteredthe battlefield with his bow
the sons of Panduhave to accept
Even now he must be planningsomething new for sure.
gets a chance to reignwe have to punish him.
more than strength.But
before launching the attack?In order to retaliate
enters the battlefield?What do we do then?
He knows who is just.But Grandsire's duty
Greetings, teacher.May you be victorious.
This is the first battleof your life.
I can trust no onebut you, Arjun.
And I am tryingto figure it out.
any of the Princes die.Take all of them in
come hereto die at your hands.
All hail Mahadev!Greetings, teacher.
there's quite the responsibilityon your shoulders
but defeat belongsonly to the King.
brother Yudhishthir!You must have understood
not being fought onlyto pay our teacher his fee.
and King Drupad.It is between you and me.
weighed in terms of your feedid you have no knowledge then
The test of your capabilitieswas not devised by me, Prince.
But I do not wishto discuss this with you.
then you cannot object to it.What do you mean?
the help of you or your brotherswill not be required by me.
How can that be?If only the Kauravas
to prove his capability.There is no other alternative,
cannot participatein this battle.
the fruits of our valourand you five
Arjun, Nakul, Sahadevcan participate in the battle.
shall be attributed to me.We cannot accept that.
our teacher his feebelong to all the disciples.
by defeating Drupad.But the participance
he explicitly mentioned.And what if we
We Kuru Princes areon the borders of Panchal
This is an insult to ourdynasty and kingdom.
Go on.May you be victorious!
If we do not evenparticipate in the battle
Sahadev, why don't yousay something?
Order the first unit of cavalryto march forth!
They are to be taken inonly as prisoners.
I want all the Princes alive!Soldiers!
Attack!Dusshasan, Vikarna
but a horde of rats!Hastinapur has defeated them
just look at Drupad's army!It is easier to defeat them than
No one can defeat us!Keep attacking.
of his army.Soldiers, change your positions!
A 'Sharvyooh' can help navigatethrough any type of labyrinth!
And keep your weaponsfacing outward!
Open the second gateand close the first one!
and we have surroundedthe enemy on all the sides.
King Drupad's labyrinth!They will be caught in it
Close all the gates one by one!Our strategy was a success,
as prisoners!None of the Princes
brother Duryodhan?We were winning the battle
such a labyrinth.Even I do not know how to
brother Duryodhan?I must now make
if I have to employthe Five Gems of mine
I will not let that happen,father.
Will you fight me?Does Panchal now
might, King Drupad?What were you thinking when
with just one blow.And because of her, even you
that I am the King of PanchalDrupad?
Or am I the realKing of Panchal, Drupad?
You will sit right hereand mourn, sire.
N-No...No, Vidura.
Vidura...Gandhari.
G-Gandhari!Gandhari...
burdened today.What kind of a strange
for which grandsire himselfhas prepared us.
the head was unableto bear it, mother.
is experiencing pain.One can overcome fear
of the pain, son.Mother-in-law
from performing their duties.This battle is our duty.
We'll mourn their deathstogether
But nowis not the time to mourn,
If a warriormourns his troubles all night
he does not havethe courage to even stand.
for tomorrow.So that our patience
holding on to his breath.We will serve grandsire
day and night.Turn by turn, each of us
give me food and waterfor grandsire.
some medicines for you.Some food and water too.
But, grandsire, if yourpain is reduced
You may have ordered usto go fight the battle
then how will we getthe strength to fight?
remain disease freewith medicines?
Medicines only lend supportYou are right, Arjun.
medicines any more.My body does not
*"Uttara" (North) and "ayana" (movement), the northward movement of the Sun on the celestial sphere, between January 14 and July 16.I will hold on
than this, Arjun.Have some water at least.
to quench my thirst, son.Every part of me
is destined to be immersed.You have the strength
Butthis battlefield of Kurukshetra
it drank.And harshness, be it
Make enough place in this landso that my mother
That is more than enough for me.Forgive me, mother.
able tostand to bow down
with such respect, son.A mother feels real
and take care of my son.You're free of this
because of his agony.Fortunate are those
to be a child once more.Go
Though I am your sonI have committed grave crimes.
You are able to distinguishwhat is righteous
who cannot see righteousnesscannot have their minds
on yourself your whole life, son.Any person who is hard
towards others, son.You were never bound
blinded by attachmentswere only punished, by you.
Yes, mother.If I had been able to accept
found a solution for it.This is my error.
I have not passed downany unholiness or weakness
it is necessary forsome weakness to exist
with his weaknesscan impart knowledge
in this world, mother.Then how
How so, mother?You are not unholy, Devavrata.
Then whydo I not receive salvation,
very purpose, son.Your tasks in life that
with these droplets of bloodfrom your body.
engulf you in my tides.Till that moment
on earthI shall wait for
Todaythe thirst of my life
Oh, great warriors!Grandsire Bhishma's defeat
The Pandavashave not defeated him.
jointly bear the weightof the sky.
would not let the sky collapse.Grandsire Bhishma was
other undefeated warriorsas him.
He has immense powerand owns divine weapons.
of Lord Parashuram.Oh, great warriors!
Karna, the king of Anga.Oh, great Karna!
Dear friend, Karna.I have complete faith in you.
towards the Pandavas.Neither are you related
Dear, Karna.You and only you
Grandsire.I do not approve of this war.
Nothing can be more unfortunatethan war, my lad.
A clever human is the onewho always strives to ensure
in Virat's yardin future,
there shall be an epic battle.Grandsire Bheeshma.
Hastinapur,Lord of Gandhar?
Grandsire Bheeshma.You had arrived to Gandhar.
with a promisethat you shall make her
will be the rulersof Hastinapur.
How badly could the promisemade by you fail
comes into a crocodile's graspit causes a huge dilemma
It can neither devourthe colossal elephant
Grandsire Bheeshma.Either crown my dear lad
Bahika'.**Madra was a part of the Bahika/Vahika or Madra was Vahika country, at current central parts of Punjab  between river Chenab and Ravi.
- Your Majesty!Even I will participate.
If I feel I am losing the battleI shall send you a message.
My Lord, someone has to stay todefend the fortress from within.
elder brother?Bheem is right, Arjun.
But...Arjun. If Duryodhan sees
Let us go, My Lord.My brothers and I
Please come.Soldiers!
Please give our forcesthe orders to charge
of defence,King of Gandhar.
But the preliminary attackon the fortresses has begun
without my ordersking of Gandhar?
takes orders from youMy Lord.
*Modern Kangra district, the territory around the three rivers of Satluj, Beas, and Ravi.Please give the orders
Greetings My Queen.A vast army led by Hastinapur
But there is no one inthe fortress who can defend it.
Forgive me, My Queen.But Prince Uttar
to retaliate to this attack.Yes!
Uttar is still very young.He has no experience in battle.
into the battle.Excuse me, My Queen.
I do not wish to be exempted,either.
Brihannala is neither a man,nor a woman.
My Queen.There is no need
of Prince Arjun's chariot.And has faced many battles.
chariot.Before any weapon
This is my promise.I shall instill the son of
and not cowardice.But will a woman
all shall mock me.But when your weapons
laughing at them, Prince.Come.
is at the forefront.What if he comes to know
Grandsire Bheeshma.And Prince Duryodhan
for my exile to come to an end.Where are the Pandavas, uncle?
We do not have much time, uncle!Did I not tell you, my lad?
but cannot commit it.Look over there!
Look at this!The prince of Virat is here
Yet he has arrived for battle.But those five Pandavas
They must be hidingas a rat hides in a burrow.
inside Virat.Arjun!
and protect your honour.Even Karna must be arriving
With your bow, the 'Gandiva'!Prince Uttar, pick up your bow!
happen to you.Pick up your bow!
Shoot, Prince Uttar!Shoot the arrow, Prince Uttar!
maybe those five Pandavasshall show themselves.
Very well, my lad.Grandsire Bheeshma!
king of Gandhar.Only when a warrior arrives
Prepare for battle, prince!Only a few moments remain.
of the likes of prince Arjunfirst learn to stand your ground
shoot an arrow!You say Arjun is
come forth to protect us.Protection is acquired by those
Go' prince!Go!
Before the sun setssend the Pandavas
Why did you bringthe chariot here?
Oh Fire God!Today, it shall be a year
Arjun from Brihannala.But today my mettle
this devotee of yoursis incomplete.
it feels as thoughsomething very bad has happened.
be seen around, mother.I seem to be having
I had seen brother Bhimgoing with brother Duryodhan.
If he is with Duryodhanthen you need not be afraid.
with the two of them.Sahadev, ask Arjun to go look
- Alright, mother.Uncle!
Beloved Duryodhan, in orderto secure your place as the king
Now, dump his dead bodyin the river Ganges.
go straight to heaven.This is a popular belief.
Why are you gettingso scared, dear?
A kingdom always thrivesupon a heap of dead bodies.
Every person makes an effortto create a state of his own.
or only limited to one's family.Man always makes an effort
the real form of polity?Have we ever thought about it?
and is able to curtailthe freedom of many
influence over another's life.But is real influence
and righteousness?When man uses cruelty and
revolt in the hearts of others.And the result...
Yes.He may find himself influential
This is the reasonwhy sages like Bhrigu
and Hiranyakashipu.Do certainly give it a thought.
the ground, King Dhritarashtrait is mixed with
comes to a teacherthe love of his parents
and stubbornnessas the impurities to be in him.
This smokeis due to the burning
are reduced to nothingand when dedication
become a disciple.Only then does he accept
only knowledge to a studentbut a guru
makes him successful.I am here to become
from youthe Princes of the Kuru dynasty
one expectation from youthat you must teach only
Butthere is just one condition.
Becausea son learns constantly
conveniences will be built.You may reside there
to the Princes of Kuru.Pardon me, Chief Minister.
Because a honey bee thatdoes not leave its nest behind
I do not accept this condition,sire.
and get their education.Then accepting them
Your Highness.Before making a decision,
is something the entire kingdomof Arya is familiar with.
that can give you shelter?My Past, my weight
the wish of seeking shelter.I am in search of worthy princes
in the world.That of knowledge.
more than my knowledgethen I must go someplace else
Your Highness,with your permission
He is my guest.- Permission granted.
for another teacher at once.The Princes of Kuru dynasty
They merely need to be moulded.Stop, Dronacharya.
a golden opportunity again.Tell this to your king.
but to earn money for my sisterand her son is your duty.
be considered as milk andconsumed by my nephew?
Kripacharya.You need not remind me of it.
And very soon, I shall acquireimmense wealth as well.
In order to climb the stepsof the palace of Hastinapur
The one who can fearlesslydescend these steps
You need not worrybecause a guru
Brother Bhim?Brother Bhim?
Search for Prince Bhimat the cost of your lives!
Where is he, Maha Kaal?**The destroyer of one who destroys i.e annihilator (Shiva).
the entire universe.My son...
always protect my son.He is a part of you.
Brother-in-lawI accept your request.
and go anywhere.My darling
Now, you may do anythingbut the sons of Pandu
always...Always be there for my sons.
advice to them.How can I ever give them
and experience,mother-in-law.
thinks of the happinessof her sons.
of her husband, a wifealso thinks of his honour.
for my sons to havetheir share of honour
to make their ancestors proudmaybe...
may obstruct their path.A decision taken by fate
No, mother.This decision of fate
How will we find our way...What uncle did was unjust!
How can a motherever go away
Brother-in-law is correct.I can either live here
Until I am alivethere is no other place
This is not the timefor such things, son.
you face in your lifeall of you must accept the
You should go now, sons.I will...
all the hurdlesthat come in your path.
Under your guidance,we five brothers
I have firm faith,Yudhishthir
be augmented by you.That you will never go astray
dearthat greed is the basis
but do not ever covet it.You may indeed earn wealth
of someone else's wealth.And
can strengthenyour righteousness.
Time is a prominentform of a 'yajna.
In that 'yajnaall of us are required to offer
helps in the establishmentof righteousness in this world.
Now, it is time for meto be the sacrifice.
For this very reason, dear.For exactly this reason.
then maybe you would notaccept the new kingdom.
was far more important.Grandsire
a lot from us.No, dear.
of one's competence.So must I.
you had, Dhritarashtrahas challenged your competence.
in Khandavprasthawill forever act as
But who will livewith us, grandsire?
to stay with their Kingdenotes the King's success.
By leaving Hastinapur emptywe cannot establish
Hastinapur will become emptyanyway, Your Highness.
We will do what you ask us to.She...
She will be a handmaidento Her Highness.
Vrushali.Hastinapur can only be your
Hastinapur will attack Dwaraka!We are outside the borders
after which you can takethe reins of the chariot.
understood by me.If your head cannot aid you
your heart to that person.I must look for a 'Brahmin
may come and take you away.Marriage!
I will not get marriedin the woods.
How can I build a 'mandapin these woods?
You are still not wellacquainted with my brother.
brother pointed to it and saidSubhadra, look.
So, I will certainlyget married there.
Something major troubles meat the moment.
make Hastinapur and Dwarakafight each other.
I too shall be orderedto fight Madhav with my Gandiva.
but also that of Indraprasthashall take part in this battle!
my beloved sister is yourdaughter-in-law now.
but I am certain that you willnot punish my sister for it.
if Hastinapur does notwelcome Arjun's wife
and deem Dwarakaa part of family
you must welcome Arjun.My darling
I will crush the Yadavaseven if the entire Aryan region
gold ores into pure gold.Similarly
I am very proud of you, son.When a mother has the capability
powerful, mother.While deciding not to
Do not worry for me, son.In order to find a pearl
We will not let that happen.We will not.
and Indraprasthashall be sanctified
Krishna has said that yourpenance is now over.
and perform the Rajsuya 'Yajna.Indraprastha awaits you, son.
So, I too shall spend this yearengrossed in a penance.
He knows this quite welland hence, has sent
He has made this himself.He has said that if black gram
I will not be able to understandhis culinary skills.
and take awaythis bowl of 'kheer.
Her Highness?Yes.
must also have beendoing the same for years.
I am going to marry again.With this marriage,
I promise you this.I hope I have
have your love and protection.Give us your blessings, uncle.
welcome to the Kuru dynasty.Now, you and Arjun need not
You may go to Indraprastha.On behalf of the
in Indraprastha.Let's go, Gandhari
Greetings, grandsire.Stop, dear.
give you my blessings.A blessing is an expression
his hand in a reservoiris bound to get water.
Similarlypeople who seek the
A reservoir that has dried upno longer yields
unrighteous deedmy heart too has dried up.
The Kuru dynasty has beeninsulted in this 'mandap' today!
in this manner is incorrect.A human being can trust another
they taste bitter.After a while,
who like the sour tasteaccept them readily.
They begin to reek,Your Excellency.
And in the end, all thatis left are the dried up pits
traditions, Your Excellencybut when they become
sorrow instead of joythey should be
to newer ones.Who gets to decide
Notime will decide that
For the entire Aryan regionthis is the time of 'sankranti.'*
his course in a 'sankrantisimilarly
Old traditions will breakold empires will crumble to dust
and a new era will be ushered,Maharathi Bhishma!
on which side you wish to bebecause everyone will be caught
will establish the new era.This is pre-decided.
What message have youbrought, Ayurvati?
How is that possible,Ayurvati?
And Gandhari has beenpregnant for 15 months now.
Disperse all!Gandhari
question to Lord Shiva.Like the future
One can only wait forthe sun to rise
we have to wait for thehappiness fated...
I need a son.I need my heir.
Or I'll have to get a son fromanother woman, Gandhari.
is the foremost responsibilityof a princess.
And if you cannot bear a sonthen this marriage is a
me, Gandhariif the Lord has even given
you marriedyour father spread this
if the wife cannotbear a son
Because to give the kingdomits heir
perform rituals!For this!
in order to get this boon.Go through a more strenuous
overhearing us!Let him know too
love can existonly when that love
Lord!There is a message from
always send a riddleinstead of a message?
such language is used.Lord, only you can
What happened, Lord?Is it any troubling news?
Did you give me a boon ora curse to have 100 sons?
give me the light?If You have given me the path
I'll keep meditating.Lord, is it true that the love
Why such a question, Kunti?I am worried for
she got brother-in-law's love.What if... - You are getting
Not the reason to fall in love.I can't give you and Madri
love reduced for me?No, Lord.
about sister-in-law.This is an unfortunate time
certainly pass away.The shedding of the leaves is
in new leaves, Kunti.Kunti, God would have
Lord, you are so patientand tolerant.
such unfortunate timeeven before.
there was no successor.Then grandsire
for surrogacy.What does that mean, Lord?
without any selfishnessonly for the welfare
the process is called 'Niyoga'.The baby that's born
by which you can callupon any God
the same God.The power of mantra
a portion of my aurawill stay with you as a son.
because he's born withthe power of mantras.
as to why didn't Itell this to you before.
that wishing for a sonand becoming a mother
upon youis my foremost responsibility.
LordSage Durvasa had blessed me
by which I couldinvoke any God
Is that really so, Kunti?Yes, Lord.
And LordI... - You are a beholder of such
on my good fortune!On our good fortune!
Through you,the struggle of Kuru lineage
Beget such a sonwho is a scholar
future of the Kuru kingdomthe one who can be enthroned as
fruit of our marriage, Kunti.The one, whom the entire world
all over.Invoke the God of righteousness,
in the form of a son for me.I'll enquire a saint,
and be right back.What is the prediction according
Why isn't Gandharigoing into labour?
that it's time for Hastinapurto be blessed shortly
a believer of justice.On one side, you say that a son
you're not able to give a reasonof why Gandhari's
then please tell methe reason of this incidence.
on his feetbut his speed and direction are
and movement of humans' livesare controlled by the Almighty.
then the child wouldbear demonic traits.
of Hastinapur!Kunti
You have invoked meby chanting this mantra
who shall be determinedin righteousness
who can be a reason of gladnessfor my ancestors.
and justice from patience.In all the battles, struggles
can have righteousnessin his heart.
My son!My son!
My son will symbolisethe God of righteousness.
The first stage of our planwas successful.
My dear!My beloved nephew!
only he can play a beenand manipulate her.
to go to Varnavrat in her.Varnavrat is just wonderful,
Prince Panduused to visit Varnavrat
of us subjects.He was very benevolent
I indeed remember, My Lord.After he passed away, God seems
to the Varnavrat Shiv templeto have them conduct
I have hada beautiful palace constructed
And you will faceno inconvenience there.
but going to Varnavratand living there
the Prince just recently.He has many responsibilities.
have gone out of the kingdomto manage the border issues.
I will have you informed.Your sons have made
to Varnavrat, Purochan.Is that true, Crown Prince?
I am certainthat if you perform
will be contented.We are also certain
the subjects of Varnavratwill be given money as charity
announced as well.As you say, Crown Prince.
Why did you decideto go to Varnavrat
or situationstaying near them makes one
makes one realize their merits.I wish to test the merits
Purochan.Greetings, King of Gandhar.
but Crown Prince Yudhishthirhas given the answer,
proceed to Varnavrat.Splendid!
into the fire themselves.We merely have to start a fire.
entirely on you, Purochan.If you succeed,
engage in labourfor I will make you
then your future generationswon't be able to engage in
for Prince Duryodhan.Place it there.
When the time is right,my messenger will come
As you say, King of Gandhar.Goodbye.
A veneration isbeing held in Varnavrat
important for us to go therebut also appropriate.
Duryodhan's unpleasant deedswill your going away from
Duryodhan will hatcha new scheme.
When you shall returnhe will begin scheming again.
contaminated with soilstirring the water
settles down on its own.I am absolutely certain
settle down with time.- Just think about it.
think of brother Pandu?Before this, no veneration
in his lifetimeis also not something
But acting heartlesslywith my cousins
North-West, North,North-East, East.
Do not step on that.Do not step on
in the Netherworld.You dance quite well.
Be careful.I have dug holes in the ground
to strengthen one's memory.But, apart from
Do you still doubtbrother Krishna?
butnow, I doubt myself.
from Hastinapur.Where is Madhav?
So, are you going backto Hastinapur?
to proceed to Varnavrat at once.But you hardly stayed
where there is Krishna,there is Dwaraka.
If you see it from this angle,Dwaraka is right here.
I must follow brotherYudhishthir's order and leave.
I have heard the newsthat very soon Arjun
*Young (yuv) king imperial burning sacrifice.Yuvrajasuya Yajna?
he conducts a 'Rajasuya Yajna,King of Anga.
as the Crown Prince.Hence, he will conduct
In Varnavrat, Purochan hasconstructed a palace
but laccotton
*House of lac.This is 'Lakshagraha.
And in that 'yajnathat palace will be used
will burn to ashesin that 'yajna!
is unworthyof becoming the king.
only then does the eldest sonhave this right, Queen Mother.
I said, avoid!Right now, I am not in a state
to blindfold my eyesseems worth it.
is unworthy to be looked at.Pardon me, Prince.
that they will..- Coronate Pandu as the king.
and for a servant,his duties are his ornaments.
I can take his sidenot his place.
of words on it is politics.I had no idea
Then grandsire must have saidthat keeping the pain
and carrying out one's dutiesis the duty of every prince.
A person can never begreater than the throne
Dhritarashtra as the kingthen we would have
Dhritarashtra willnever be able to see.
of the entire Kingdom of Kuruthe responsibility
Will Pandu place them onthe throne and sit at its base?
exiled for 14 yearsbut in my case
A lifelong exile.He is not Bharat.
Neither will hegive it up for me
will be furthered by Pandu.Now, the future
In darkness.I have been tied
That Pandu hastied me to it forever.
I too was thinkingof this, mother.
It is the order of my father.We must leave.
Now, Gandhari'ssilent sacrifice..
My dice refuse to budge.Why are you joking, Shakuni?
I am not joking, Your Highness.I explained it
but these two..Shame is keeping them
of our ancestral kingdomPurushpura, father?
return to Gandhar withsuch an insult to our chivalry
Shall we callthe 'land of men
fellows here say, father.This is what they say.
This was Gandhari's fate.- Fate!
a gamble, fatherthen I will not side with fate
At least before theyfall to the ground
in the hands of that Bhishma,father.
treated so poorly.Gandhari has met with
and this truth ispiercing my heart
like a dagger!Shakuni!
How can anyone stab oneselfwith a dagger, son?
this wound will remind meof the great injustice
I shall stay right herein Hastinapur.
the Queen of the Kuru dynastythe Kuru dynasty will not
I won't allow it.They won't experience
When one deemsan incident to be unjust
The entire world seemslike an enemy to him.
the greater is the protest doneby the heart of man.
And this is apt.In reality, any form
of a person.But
ought to renew faithin his heart about society.
But an unrighteous personrenounces justice and
with violence.The one who experienced agony
And while walking downthis path, the oppressed
Your Highness!Give me this sword.
between youand Prince Pandu.
But Prince Pandu's swordwounds people
I could not recogniseyour footfalls today.
changed my way of walking.Change your path along with your
I have left Gandhar behind me,Your Highness.
That is why I have changedmy way of walking too.
My path has been obstructedforever.
to me as the king, Shakuni.The king of Hastinapur
When it is day,the sun rises for sure.
had always been yoursis yours and will always be so.
And how is that?I do not know right now
with opportunitiesand the one who makes
Will you teach me deception now?That too against my own family?
The familythat snatched your right
Your Highness.You are very generous
broken into bits by you.Now you may chop my body
Just once.When you had returned dejected
dejection and ragemy beloved Gandhari
But my beloved sister'slove and dedication
Only with herwill you find both happiness
How can a womanbestow me with strength?
Ravan had only 20 armsand with them he had
can give you 200 arms.200 arms.
but alsothe entire region of Arya.
Who has committed the of fenceis also significant
in that, grandsire?It's enough to know
Tell me!What's the punishment
to save a person's lifethe physician amputates
an enemy.He is not punished.
at the entrancewas correct.
I've heard the discussionsamongst the subjects
with the mother queen.Father, now
about it, son?The king's duty is not to spread
his subjectsfrom all their fear in life.
This means, even Hastinapurwill now be ruled
Then how does divisionof kingdoms hold good?
to be rightly punished.That would be sheer foolishness,
their mother's insult.Do you wish to see a war?
They don't have the libertyto fight a battle.
Only Hastinapur's flagwill fly high.
please take the decision.I...
the decision, Your Ladyship.I have only one boon
the time of my death.I don't have any other boon,
Grandsire, please don'tspeak sorrowfully.
But, Gandhari,it's also necessary
from settingtowards Indraprastha.
but even the royal familyshall not take part
Inform Kuntiregarding the same.
you cannot be unjust.A mother lives with only
obtain happiness and success.Today when Kunti's sons
how can we snatch awaythis opportunity to witness
I'm extremely contriteabout it.
has to remain hidden as it isthe base of those pearls.
by the royal family first.Because it is the base
go to Indraprastha.This is my firm decision.
I give alms only becausemy father has said
Giving alms purifies the soul.Unfortunately
that makes my soul impure.God bless you!
Accept my apology,Your Majesty.
There was a time when my housewas adjacent to yours.
- Yes, continue.What is it?
The crown prince is your friend,isn't he?
with Queen Mother?The king has prohibited
She can't attend the inauguralceremony of Indraprastha.
The crown prince can'tbe so immoral.
Very soon.This is my promise to you.
Welcome, dear friend.You've displayed
I'm extremely elated.If I weren't the reason
Unrighteousness?What's the reason behind
has taken place today?To hold someone's mother
is unrighteousness, my friend.To hold someone's mother
is unrighteousness, my friend.That unrighteousness
the immoralitythat was inflicted upon me?
with the entire world for that.But, friend, even when the king
not on its head.The elephant's head
your predicament, friend.But this is politics.
Consider Lady Kuntias one of the castles, friend.
A mother's heart weeps.And the fire that arises
Fortunately, she was alive.Now
My friendwhy are you advocating
is sustained with warriors.May the woman, child, cow
Causing harm to themis considered unacceptable.
made you the king of Anga?When you were being insulted
P rote ct!Is this how you
from being wrongful, friend.I sense unfaithfulness
that even you wish to residein Indraprastha now.
your glory in the worldwith his support.
Since you have doubtson my intentions
pertains to beI shall never plead
from captivity.Impossible!
Dear King!A kingdom can't be ruled
You're a king.You must support
be unrighteous at times.If that's how it is...
this crown, Prince.Prince, today I feel
by committingthis act of immorality.
then, perhapsit's the greed for this crown
I'll not be able to surviveunder this burden.
the king of Anga.I want to become
Are you giving me thisin return of my favours?
my friend.I shall forever be your armour.
a hundred deaths.But to serve you
I'm not contendedwith your answer.
My dear,if Karna doesn't wish
Not the king of Angabut the great charioteer, Karna.
You're free from the burdenof ruling the kingdom.
King of Gandhar.May I make a request
the great charioteer Karna!Kindly allow Vrushali
depending on my friendship.And that promise would certainly
charioteer.I shall take the king's fury.
- Greetings!Uncle!
before the battle.Everyday,
that it will breakduring the battle.
he shall very soonlose his capability as well.
Return their powers to them.That will be sufficient.
and the kingdom of the Pandavasright at this moment.
away my property, father.Duryodhan...
Have mercy on Hastinapur.Stay quiet.
Let us assumethat the entire game
You must also admitthat you have quietly
Even you admit that all of youare to blame as much as I am.
The rules of this gamewere drafted
had adhered to the rules.If the game
are the culprits.If not, then even
and deceit?Is there any such person?
Is no one still doubtfulabout their conscience?
Remember this,knowledgeable ones...
But before thatall the people
for staying silent.This is a curse
Look around yourself.Look at all of history.
Men indulge in battlebut the women of the defeated
while drinking and gambling.And women?
by their priderestrict women's freedom,
at the hands of lifeand give up their families.
to feedtheir small children.
It will be very apparentthat compared to men,
have we created?Wherein, one half of mankind
And those exploited womengive birth to the next
Those seeds which give birthto new plants
by colour and perfume.The place where the future
only by beauty, happinesscontentment and respect.
the society makesthe future generations suffer.
how can women give birthto happy and healthy progeny?
is humiliatedexploited
in some form or the otherthe seed of a battle is sown.
begins.Judge for yourselves.
your decision to returnthe Pandavas' property
and their freedomto them, is right.
Thus,I propose a compromise.
Well?Tell me quickly.
for 13 years, Duryodhancan claim ownership
the Pandavas will spend 13 yearsin exile, in the forest.
I am right, my child.I am right!
sentence the Pandavasto 12 years of exile
are recognised in the last yearthen once again
and 1 year of hiding.Now
I accept this solution.If the Pandavas 
then once againthey will have to go through
Nowdo not be too greedy,
Wonderful!What's the opinion
are still my slaves.My decision will be
Duryodhan.The curse of a tormented soul
grandsire...You are going to be punished
Father!I will not free my slaves
I am ready to acceptthe compromise
they can't become the alliesof any king
At the end of the exile,all of them
If, in that one yearI see any of the five Pandavas
they will haveto live in exile
What is your decision?Forgive me, sons of Pandu.
who lost yourselvesto Duryodhan.
I have to acceptDuryodhan's proposal.
along with your wife Draupadiwill have to go through
You have to accept it.As you wish, uncle.
to meet our subjectsand make certain arrangements.
to all of you, uncle.We're taking your leave
when the Pandavas returnwe'll snatch
Before I leave,hear my oath, everyone.
The death of all the sonsof King Dhritarashtra
King Dhritarashtra.In this court
Rivers will turn red with bloodthere will be mountains
There will be a great battle.The greatest battle
Govind was correct.Mahadev always gives
that competitionshall await you.
We have disguised as 'Brahmins.No one will await us there.
tonight itself.You shall indeed come
That is why, Govind had saidthat fate does not
The Crown Princeof Vidarbha, Rukmi
Listen all!King Karna of Anga
The King of Gandhar,esteemed Brahmin
Listen all!The Prince of Hastinapur,
What happens when springgraces a desert, King of Anga?
King of Gandhar.But if an enemy is praiseworthy
I deem victory to be bravery,King of Anga.
is our friend.Until proven one's enemy
is a fool.And until proven one's friend
is intelligent, my dear!Drupad is still our enemy.
befriend Hastinapurthen he will have
DraupadiGuru Mother is here to have
to tie the hair?Princess
Only women who havelost their husbands
applying this special oil.Then your husband will
Pray for such a personto win the 'swayamvar
This place is empty, mother.And it is also safe.
Very far.Do go inside and rest.
We shall not be able to restproperly for days then.
Between this placeand Naimisharanya
No, Bheem.We must ask for alms
must stay with mother.The three of us
If the five of you go togetherthen you will be able
you will be alone here.What should I fear, son?
In which direction should weproceed, brother Yudhishthir?
We cannot proceed that way.We should proceed
this way.But will anyone be here?
was also made by him.And the subjects also wish
Princess is so beautifulthat upon seeing her,
have gone there thenwith the hope
All hail King Drupad!All hail King Drupad!
All hail King Drupad!All hail King Drupad!
and Princes present here.All of you must know
was given a divine presentby the Gods.
as fire and bearingdivine beauty
the pinnacle of a templeor at the zenith of a palace!
Draupadias his wife would be the fortune
I ask the 'KshatriyaKings and
I welcome the guestspresent here!
which cannot be conqueredby an ordinary warrior.
then for him,the weight of this bow
This bow can be stringedonly by a person
Its eye is your goal.The fish shown here was made
in the waterthe archer needs to
only one arrow.And the person
to my beloved sister.My dear, can you do it?
have to bear insult.My dear
with Panchal is important.You know quite well
and even Ashwatthama'shalf of Panchal
also comes to our sidethen very soon
I cannot do it, uncle!No one can win this competition.
all the Kings.If they were truly looking
organized a fight with macesand the ones involving
of the Aryan regioncan win this competition?
a part of a 'swayamvarI would have achieved this feat.
No, King of Gandhar.The rank of the son-in-law
Crown Prince Duryodhanand I cannot permit it.
to your friend, King of Anga.You must win the competition
has done this all his life.If Duryodhan permits you
As you say, friend.I shall take part
is the charioteerand justice and righteousness
Duryodhanwith the might of Lord Hanuman,
Splendid, my darling!Splendid! - Uncle!
Lord Hanumanhas provided him with His might,
I do not!My darling!
brother Duryodhan.And the Pandavas are gathering
will engage in a battleonly when they are successful
of their life of anonymitythe Pandavas
send them back on an exile.Uncle, why would the Pandavas
Just a day beforetheir life of anonymity begins
The method to healthe wounds of our army quickly
And not only that.They also taught us how
to a halt at sunsetthe soldiers who are wounded
We shall heal themby the crack of dawn.
will acquire the Pashupatastrawe will never get defeated
and guestshave left after having a meal.
There is sufficientfood for me, My Lord.
Panchaliyou should begin
Yes, Panchali.Let me serve
If it is too much for you,you may give me some.
who can give a meal to us sagesor has the entire world
Greetings!Welcome.
My disciples and I shallhave a meal at your residence.
and youmust tell your wife
great sage.Bheem, Sahadev, arrange for
plantain leaves for the meal.Let me go aid Panchali.
Vasudev made us take a vowto ensure that sages
Upon hearing of this vowof ours, great sage Durvasa
has already beenserved by me, My Lord.
meal which was intended for us?That amount would not have
accompanied the great sage.You must prepare something.
of leaving discontented.No one can ever make the tester
the wrath of great sage Durvasa.If he is not contented
to give him a satisfactory meal?Prince!
that after being seatedfor a meal, great sage Durvasa
Tell her to serveour meaIs this instant
Do not interrupt me,impudent man!
is not contentedthen the future of the Pandavas
What do I offergreat sage Durvasa now?
has the power to turn all ourplans upside down, My Lord.
I do not think we will geta meal from this residence.
Brother Yudhishthir,the great sage is very angry.
The duties of a householder havebeen tarnished by Pandu's sons!
Just a little while longer,great sage.
Insolent men!Do you not know
become weakerwith the passage of time!
done reciting the Gayatri Mantra101 times and
Why is he testing usin this manner?
In order to help usknow our limits
I have realized whatmy limits are, My Lord.
and apologize for this.Stop, Panchali.
then it would be a defeatfor us five brothers.
- Stop, Sahadev.Panchali lacking grains
You need not worry,Panchali.
is the duty of a householder.It is my defeat
apologize to the great sage.Whenever one undergoes a test
How do I succeed in this?How are you,
Govind!How do you do it,
Whenever I come visit all of youyou always make me do
Great sage Durvasaand his disciples
in any of the vessels.Let me think of a way
This is a grave problem.A grain of rice
grain of ricewould not leave
reciting the mantra as well.Govind, I will have to serve him
In such a situationsaving this single grain
Om Bhur Bhuvah...Prince Bheem!
is inside your hut.Pardon me,
great sage?Why have I done,
Vasudevbut the person
and there is no doubt about it.And
feeling contented.You have
You are too kind,great sage.
burped as thoughthey had just eaten.
can reside onlywithin you, Vasudev.
Lord Hanumanwas pleased by brother Bheem.
because of somethingthat brother Bheem did.
Indeedbut
If I meet you at home, I would'veasked for your blessings.
Who are you, lad?Where did you get your ability
Great-grandsire?No, child.
learning knowledgeinstead you have to
shines.That's what my dream is.
I feel that our family will soon perish.I feel my whole life is a waste, child.
He doesn't punish them.You are my great-grandson.
Go, child. Go away.I, your great-grandson, do not 
I admit my defeat, child.Even the fact that I have 
deep guilts.If only I were not under my oath,
and become a hermit.Go, child.
Your great-grandfather commands youto go from here.
you are my enemy.I can't follow your orders.
Everyone's engaged.Now. We have to go to Yudishthira.
Charioteer, let's go.I ask you, dear.
Dushasana, brother Yudishthira holds a spear.The rule of war is clear.
Either you raise a spear,or brother Yudishthira has to use a mace.
that we have broken the rule.Your character is such that
Unfortunately, Dushasana do not evenworried about his name.
one opponents,is this not violating the rule, uncle?
But it's not about that.We are now worried about
For our various unrighteous actions,brother Yudishthira
Won't you heed an old manrequest, dear?
Protecting uncle Yudishthira is my duty.So why do you
When you rule over all Aryan region,I will be the proudest watcher from heaven.
We have to kill Yudishthira.Attack him.
To help Duryodhana emerges victorious,is you duty.
Attack him!Tomorrow's war
Tomorrow's waris the result of
Hastinapurhad covered my
That dayI promised myself
my sister a presentfor her sacrifice
Getting a present andpaying dearly for a sacrifice!
certainly experiences agony.It is such a strange thing!
into a business dealingby you.
of exacting revengeyou wished to have opulence
a sacrificedo not deceive yourself,
Deception!Am I deceiving people
By calling this wara righteous one
In the entire worldif there is someone
you, Vasudev.I have firm faith
you will indeed use deceitto justify
To establish righteousness,unrighteousness shall be used.
will be told.To champion life,
the oldshall be annihilated.
in the competenceof the Pandavas?
in youand your deception.
have arisen and youhave been bound
every deception of yourswill benefit only the Pandavas.
you must now engage in deceptiononly after meditating over it.
every treachery of yoursand every unrighteous deed
You need to rememberVasudev
in this war.I have taken an oath
However,my might
the might of righteousness.That is my weapon
the armour of yourbeloved Pandavas.
in a river of blood.There will be so much
will remain red for eternity.And I promise
will indeed realize whatrighteousness is at the end.
and till the end of timeit shall be known as Mahabharat,
what have you done?You gave away your armour
friend Karna.How could you chop off a part
asked you for your right armwould you have
so foolishly, friend?Why did you act so foolishly?
discharging it, might, futurehope and even life
to be sacrificed, friend...Pardon me,
Had I broken one oath of mineI would have had the thought
in the battlefieldI would not have been able
shall heal soon,friend.
The healerwill take care
my darling!His righteousness is his limit!
in his righteousness!Do you remember what your guru,
and pride come togetherman meets with loss.
to go on an exilewhile he wishes
why King Karna of Anganever had my complete trust.
of King Karna of Anga.And now,
my darling!The holy armour
At a time like thisit is important to augment
an addition oftwo 'akshauhini' armies
- My Lord! - Son!Healer
His condition is critical.Upon cutting out
on King Karna of Angaare not healing
But healer,my son is in great agony.
Karna will indeed get better.Have faith.
You?!The mother of the people who
Be quiet,Radha.
I will not be quiet today.What kind of an enmity made them
In order to securethe victory of your children
in no such treachery.Then why did
of my Radheya?Did he think that just because
with him?!My son was born to be
grew up deeming the lap of hisimpoverished father a throne.
the greatest of Kingsbut his childhood
For safeguardingthe lives of your sons
But you have murdered my son!You have murdered my son...
Karna...Karna is my son.
he would never have metwith such treachery!
then please save his life.Your sons,
by the Ashwini Kumaras.I request you
Alleviate it...Queen Mother
heal My Lord,their elder brother...
and heal him?No, Vrushali.
And who can ever savethe life of one's enemy?
that if the entire armygets annihilated
then the King must surrender.The King cannot even challenge
in the battlefieldwe require a large army.
while our enemies have nine.We must acquire an additional
Ruler of Madra,King Shalya
Nakul hasrequested him to aid us.
as the Narayani Army.Very soon, uncle Shalya
our armywill be as big and mighty
for them to rest on the waybrother Yudhishthir.
Motheris there a problem?
Our mother is residingin the enemy camp.
Now,she has come to us.
What is the matter,mother?
after such a long timeare you not happy?
and it is time to wipe awaythe tears of that mother.
What agony?- Son
If...If he does not receive
Then finding a remedy to hisagony will become impossible.
if the soldiers of the Kauravaarmy get injured in the war
Then there is no pointin waging a war.
it is our duty to protectthe life of an injured person.
Had there been kindnessor righteousness in his heart
to grave humiliation duringthe game of dice, mother.
Early in the morningget Rukmini to the temple
I will be waiting for you.Hold on!
I haven't seen you here before.This means
It is not respectable fora soldier. - Don't argue.
I havebrought Maharishi Durvasa's
have this sacramentshe will never
You cannot go.Okay, soldier, tell me
Then I'll get married to him.This sacrament is very powerful.
Stop!This isn't a sacrament
Tomorrow morning the weddingceremony will be completed.
Prince Sishupal will get upset.That is why I had told you...
the wedding.Don't act foolish, Rukmini.
My Lord Krishna will protect youfrom the monarch of Magadh.
What are you saying!There
This time, your deathwill surely get averted.
a dam on falling rains.Chanting Krishna's name
to his house.This is impossible, Rukmini.
Krishna everywhere.Krishna everywhere.
Krishna everywhere.Krishna everywhere.
I will get closerto my Lord.
to prince Sishupal.You will now leave
wedding booth.Until it's the auspicious time
this chamber.Who are you?
You seem to be out ofyour senses, prince.
but your palace too.I had completely forgotten
I used to thinkthat they look beautiful because
Andhow did you enter...
You...Who I am
that you will wait for himat Goddess Parvati's temple.
when you go there.Please come.
has to be consumedby the princess
Maharishi Durvasaalready knew
Hencehe has
goes to GoddessParvati's temple
she is supposed to.Believe me, princess.
Even I'll come along with you.No...
I will not go.Only you can convince her now.
she shall forgetto protest.
I don't want to go.I don't...
Detain him!- What do we do now?
opportunity to runone should run.
be spared alive!Catch him!
I'll handle them.The Gods have showered their
they have blessed youwith a son.
which is a part of your destiny.For the birth of your daughter
I am not a fool, great sage.I wanted a son
to sacrifice anything.Let's go, son.
from this 'yajnais the fate of the Aryan region!
a person's fate, great sage.A father never obtains
from one's daughter!One obtains righteousness
that a son bestows onlyhis family with righteousness!
and the entire worldwith righteousness!
a daughter, Drupad!The wrath of the Gods
Come back for the 'yajna!Stop, Drupad!
the entire world through me?!Then I
I ask for pain!What are you asking for,
for your own daughter?!Why not?
May her character be as pure and fair as this 'abeer.'**A dye (dry powder) from flower extracts.
Yet the worldmust deem her pure!
Like this wheat,may she have the strength
Can the Gods give mesuch a daughter?!
May she havesuch steadfast valour.
*Powder used for social and religious markings--made from turmeric or saffron.Just like this 'kumkum,
in this world!And may she reflect
such a daughter?!These flowers here...
May she face injusticetime and again!
is why this maidenhas been born, Drupad!
precious like her beforeand neither will you ever have!
the future of the Aryan region.She will create a new history!
*One of darker complexion.Since she is born from a 'yajna
by her name!She shall be called Draupadi!
of fire on the facewith the heat of fire
in the heart was bornyour daughter, father.
Goodbye, Your Majesty.Bless you.
Goodbye, father.May you be victorious, son.
Bless you.- Goodbye, teacher.
will seem scant in this battlebecause your opponent
the great sage BharadwajDrupad learnt the same art
Me and my son Ashwatthamawill not take part
that if I am proud of my artthen I needed
And I haveaccepted his challenge.
of your teacher.If anyone is fearful
from the dutyof Paying my fee.
We have faith, teacher!Splendid.
But the sons of Dhritarashtramust go back.
It is not partiality.It is not partiality at all!
in his own capabilitycannot be accepted by me
from such a person, Ashwatthama.If I had to defeat Drupad
the King of Hastinapuras a trader intent on
and waited all these years.But we have
one is accompanied by a warriorwho is not my disciple
And even if you winbecause of him
North, North-East,East, South-East
Vidarbh, Kunti,Hastinapur.
City of Kampilya.Is Drupad really that illusory
do not trust their eyesighttheir vision cannot be
to gain victoryover one's senses.
One who does not seekany happiness in his life
a 'laddoo,' brother Bheem?Laddoo!
Could I have it?This is my brother
Dusshasanyou shall lead
mine in the southern direction.Vikarna
and will attackfrom that direction.
the 'Sharvyooh'* is the most efficient one.*Chakravyuh or Padmavyuh, is a multi-tier defensive formation that looks like a blooming lotus (padma, ) or disc (chakra, ).
Ineed to reach him.
No one is immortal.But Drupad's General cannot die.
And until he fulfills ithe won't die.
No matter how many timesthe enemies kill him
their enemies run awayout of fright.
then defeating Drupadwill not be impossible.
I do know, brotherbut I have no faith in me.
is to be defeated, friend.Do remember, Dusshasan.
only at my hands.This is mandatory.
Yudhishthir is the eldest.He will also be
according to his strategies.In other words,
Did you hear, General?Drona is arriving here
but you havetwo limitless armies with you.
the kingdom of Hastinapur.I am here as the representative
of Prince Vichitraviryato ask for the hands
present here disagree with methen that King has the right
can never pass upan opportunity for a combat,
as my husband with my heart.That I'll choose King Shalv as
son of Ganga, Bhishma!But this is not possible.
And I am here to breakthat very vow, Bhishma.
and if I am guiltythen only one person
Lord Parashuram.Until the solution
must continue this battle.My Lord,
or more a noble deedwhen you wish
the reason of his demise.Then I do not wish to live
after 25 years.This girl will take revenge
called Shikhandini.And when your soul
the purpose of killing you.Bhishma!
will come to you to askfor your ear-rings and armour.
it makes me immortal.Your holy armour is
more important to me, friend.Greetings,
I have been travelling to seeksomething, King of Anga
It is both livingand also the cause of life.
It is both pure and impure.My armour and ear-rings.
As long as they arejoined to my body
separated from my bodythey will become
to ask for theseLord Indra?
Tomorrow at dawnI am going to ask you
have no competenceto retaliate against me?
Looking for ways to ensurethe protection of one's son
nothing to do with this!However
are certainlyassociated with it.
The enmity between people islimited solely to their deaths.
it would be a disgrace to them.Even the waves of the ocean
act partially towards any wave.Do you not have faith
will you not be ableto confront Arjun?
Lord Indra.I have firm faith
who the true brave one is.But the question here is
of my friend.I have taken an oath
By taking my armour awayyou are being
- The decision is yours!If you do not wish to engage
the courage to refuse methen offering Surya Dev
You need to decide which oathis more important to you
at dawn with the intentof seeking charity from you.
will come to you to askfor your ear-rings and armour.
Without them,the weapons of Arjun
Tomorrow at dawnI am going to ask you
in your armourbut in your armour
I shall wait at the river-bankat dawn with the intent
Madhavbut Surya Dev refuses
solely in battlefields.Sometimes
Where there is attachmentthere is struggle.
the hope of victory.There is the hope of success.
success can be hadonly with the aid
patienceand courage.
Without opportunityrighteousness remains latent
Bless you, Arjun,son of Pandu.
taken in the form of this warjust fills my heart
fight from your side in this warwill be exceedingly fortunate.
to bear any weapon.However,
to this great undertaking.You are too kind,
a wardemands the shedding of blood.
contribute, Arjun, son of Kunti.But is blood not shed
By acquiring knowledgeman creates opportunities
In order to be ableto shed blood in a war
Vasudev.And this would be
For the benefitof one son of yours
Once, the son of Pavan Dev* had hidden you in His mouth.*Pavana (the Purifier), other name of Vayu, the god of the winds.
I request you,father.
At some point of time in lifeevery person is robbed of
in order to aid the creationgenerate new life.
so that no one is able to saythat I gained victory
Instead of living inthe darkness of a tainted life
I request you,father.
I am preparedto give your son an opportunity
does not lessen the sun's power.The son of Lord Surya
What is it that youwish to seek from me?
that will becomean opportunity for me?
Without opportunity,righteousness remains latent
This is what he had said.Righteousness
if it is lostbefore achieving success.
What he said was correct,friend.
What can he gives methat will become an opportunity
weak in a waris also called an opportunity,
no armour is safefrom your arrows.
When a mother criesbecause of her son
gets tainted by it, mother.Look.
Today, you have made mevery happy, son.
Today, even grandfather Bhishmawas deeply hurt because of me.
You decided to forge an enmitywith Anga Pradesh?
Prince Arjunyou must wash the feet
Pardon me, King of Anga.Greetings, grandfather.
I am here to apologizeto you, grandfather.
What Dhritarashtra didwas inappropriate.
and to colour it with politicswas utterly inappropriate.
I am not angry with eitheryou or uncle, grandfather.
the ants crawling over italso receive the greetings.
If an undeserving personis the king of a place
can never be appropriatein totality.
takes an inappropriate decisionthen the Kuru kingdom
if you allow usthen at any given point
coronated as the King.All of you are indeed
against Hastinapurthen I shall stop you
himself aids youyou cannot defeat me.
Pray to the Almighty, Arjun.Pray to Him.
is to take one's apprehensions,one's worries
and place them atthe feet of the Almighty.
Is this not praying?But is understanding
Those plans always culminateinto the results of our actions.
can it be termed as praying?The truth is,
from coveting resultsis praying truly.
You seem very happy, son.Yes, father.
that you will make me King.But father
And how is that, son?Father, when my friend
in protecting my kingdom.I made him promise me today.
to make promises.What do you think, father?
He will not.The Prince will be crowned
is in the best interest ofthe Kuru kingdom and Hastinapur.
Fatherhow can you question
I am questioning my own rights.You will not understand.
the coronation ceremonyof its Prince!
that the other idolslook smaller in comparison
and most powerful King of India.But Prince, to make
The idol of a new Kingcannot be taller than
Why should we breaktradition unnecessarily?
it can be at an elevated place.That was a splendid suggestion,
be kept beneath this idol?Have my idol placed
mounted on my shoulders.That cannot be.
And I stand on the shouldersof my enemies.
Why base them on five humans?Those idols can also be
will be a donkey, friend.With a bow and arrows
Gandhari.What is this, brother?
And which ungratified spiritis offered iron, brother?
Today, my nephewwill become the crowned
Hastinapurwill transform into Gandhar!
the crowned Princeyou wish to destroy
beloved Gandhari.I will not destroy
the kingdom of Kurubut it will become
will be based upon Gandhar'srules and principles.
you cannot protest to thisbecause I am not doing anything
My fight had alwaysbeen with the
he had arrived in Gandharwill be blown into pieces today.
Forever!Today, in Hastinapur
King Dhritarashtrais making his entrance!
All hail King Dhritarashtra!All hail King Dhritarashtra!
Ministers and peoplein the court
blesses the Princesthen the education of
Certainly.Uncle shall address the court.
what else can he say, uncle?Listening to one's enemy
but also the ones who don't,repent as well.
Where are you going?Gandhar awaits me, my darling.
What are you saying, uncle?You would leave for Gandhar
Anointed...You cannot get anointed,
I have tried to make you Kingbut now, I have
Seeing that the Pandavasare alive?
If they havethe strength of Panchal
Do not make such a mistake,my darling.
Sugriv had become the King.When Bali returned
have to leave the citybut also the kingdom
Crown Prince is aliveno one will deem you
King of Gandhar.I will use my competence
a river nourishes the fieldsbut when it floods them
But uncle, my friend Karna...I do not doubt him, beloved!
deciding between the twois exceedingly difficult
killed Bheem and Arjunhad righteousness and generosity
Such deep thinking!After such deep thinking
No, King of Gandhar.I had thought only of my duty.
to either strive for his victoryor
decision based on righteousnessthe decision is always correct.
that when Yudhishthirwill return to Hastinapur
my darling.When Yudhishthir
will never let you become King.Uncle
There is a way out, my darling.But this time,
Do I have your word?You have my word, uncle.
but before this news spreadsto the people of Hastinapur
Butyour father's heart
That is whyuntil you get anointed
that the five of them are alive.Yudhishthir has
thenYudhishthir's right
the Princess of Panchalwill not benefit him
Before the marriageceremony begins
than a funeral pyre.You have deemed it righteous
but will the world?Will she get happiness from
But this isan atypical marriage.
be dedicated to a single person.We five brothers dedicate
We shall acceptall her decisions.
will be wife to only one of you.During that period
I am askingfor this difficult vow.
not remembrance, My Lord?Then after a year,
the joys and sorrows?She will get crushed
an austere meditationbefore the holy fire.
I shall purify my soul.My Lord
shall perform such a meditationevery year.
My Lord.For various reasons,
If the Pandavasbring their other wives
People do notfulfill their duties
This question relatesonly to me, My Lord.
that I shall never bringmy first wife
We take an oath thatwe shall fulfill our vows
with righteousness.Priest
of darkness.This is an oath
on the verge of success.The more difficult
This is myduty as a woman.
I must fulfill.My heart will remain steadfast
The evening sky isa shade of vermillion.
of genesis.My heart must remain steadfast
My heart will remain steadfastand this is why
and this is a vowI must fulfill.
I have been born.My heart must remain steadfast
My heart will remain steadfastand this is why
will remainsteadfast.
Even though I cannot goto Indraprastha
to ensure that youget your freedom.
I plead to sister-in-lawwill be the last day of my life.
The promise I made youcannot be broken by me.
seeks permission to enter.Allow him to enter.
Vrushali.I shall take you to the borders
Pardon me.But
yourself with it.Why?
I have travelledwith the royalty once.
When a predicament approachesit is the subjects that suffer.
I have renounced the kingdom.Now, I am just like you.
Vrushali.Maharathi Karna
Could you kindlydeliver this message
but I have not yetrenounced her.
- But think oncebefore telling me what
my friendship.Undying dedication to my friend
that whatever you dowill be in accordance
that a true kingdomis an independent one.
of unrighteousness.That is why,
kingdom at the earliest.Only when your kingdom
then I, son of AdhirathaKarna, request him
I will be very grateful.Revered 'Brahmins
We cannot accept charityfrom you, Radheya.
But yesterday, you had acceptedcharity from this very 'Shudra
you were a King, Radheya.Being a King is regardless
That if you did notaccept charity from me
out of this fear?Think what you may
unrighteous deed now?We cannot accept the charity
renounced my kingdom.I have not yet
I accept your charity,Maharathi.
Water stored only in abaked pot is worth consuming.
And worthlessis the person
would you clarifya doubt of mine?
engage in religious deeds?The deeds of one's past life
he must havehurt people immensely.
But what aboutthe pain you are afflicting
in your next lives,revered 'Brahmins?
revered 'Brahmins?Brother Yudhishthir,
Not even the royal family.Not even mother.
The truth is, the entirekingdom of Hastinapur
Does mother-in-law requirepermission to take part
that even for thereverence of a city
Fortunately,His Highness
are independent to takea decision on your own.
All I know is thatif someone loves you
And the one who is your enemydeserves to die at your hands!
brother Bheem.What do you suggest,
that attacking Hastinapurwould be committing treason.
applies only to the Kingand
Madhav.How can I speak clearly, friend?
the weapons are yoursand the duty...
What can we do in such asituation, brother Yudhishthir?
the army of Indraprastha.But
if all of you go to Hastinapurto request to His Highness
then I cannot stop youfrom doing so either.
is the first one to attackthen I shall
*Great charioteer, great hero/warrior, name of Shiva.Maharathi Karna
For what?I spoke ill of you
you had left far behindhas caught up...
Vrushali.The dilemma is
but my competence propelled metowards unrighteousness.
my eyes, Vrushali.How can someone else's behaviour
I am indebted to you.You are so benevolent
understanding of life's truthsis something I was unaware of.
has been shown to meby you so effortlessly.
never lose his way.Sister-in-law!
What happened in Hastinapur?!Sister-in-law...
Do not embrace me,Subhadra!
a fire back thenbut now, a fire
No one!Sister-in-law.
she wishes to see no one.I made numerous attempts but
open the door!Give me the opportunity
set herself on fire.Brother Yudhishthir,
Impossible!I can even break stone castles
this wooden door, brother?Panchali's resolution has
of a heart in agonyis way more difficult
brother.Open the door,
Only Madhav canhave it opened now.
I cannot accept your greetingsat the moment, Prince Arjun.
I cannot pardon you either.Where is my friend?
and came to Indraprasthaall by herself
She has closed the doorsof her heart, Subhadra.
Panchalifriends are those
I too have a share to theagony of your heart, friend.
Go away,Govind.
will also become dirty.Have faith
A person bathingin the river gets cleansed
Govind!Why, Govind?
Such a grave insult!What sins did I commit,
of your actionsnor did you reap the fruits
an unexpected event.The Kauravas reaped the fruits
such a grave misdeed.Friend, this is the meaning
The life of a personwho commits misdeeds
But I am experiencingthe agony, Govind.
But I am experiencingthe agony, Govind.
transform the forthcoming eventswill certainly be
their misdeedsmake you go through hell?
Calm your heart down.A river takes all the filth
She cleanses herself this way.You too
The Almighty is always preparedto absorb the agonies
I must pardon the Kuruspresent in the court?
otherwise revengeshall consume you.
What is the difference,Govind?
in such a horrendous mannerwhat will they do to the
into a struggle.Do understand this,
own sorrow consume oneselfbecomes weak.
one's own sorrowis a misdeed.
is a good deed.Yes, friend.
and pardon him.That will be the first step
You must fight for the welfareof the weak men and women
for humanitarianismthere will be a lot of bloodshed
Will you be able to do this?Yes, Govind.
but you have lit the lampof knowledge within it.
using computer graphics.Panchali
which reduced my brothersto the status of servants
Come hereand burn my hands.
your hands burnt.I pardon you.
otherwise it will beimpossible for me to live.
Burn my hands.I can see that my friend
Only one with a rightto have a temper can be angry.
other than friendship.I am not the throne, Arjun
My name is Vasudev Krishna.He who claims his rights
the rights.Subhadra's wedding
of this, Madhav?His Highness Shakuni
and Yadav clansneed to have an alliance
such a noble thought?It's a conspiracy.
The royal familywith which an alliance is forged
has to be defeated.That's when the Rajsuya Yajna
to defeat Dwarka.Parth*
Indraprasthathen you'll have to be
We'll have to surrender ourweapons in front of you
politically, Arjun.But about
about me.I will be happy
Because of me,my sister eyes
me from this problem, Parth.Me?
Brother.Tell me.
where are uncleand Dushashan?
by a chariot.She has been pledged
Rukmini too was pledgedto Sishupal.
And there were onlytwo choices then.
or any four of you would'verenounced the world.
My friend has donea lot of favours
to take up armsagainst Duryodhan.
breaking your heart?Call the bride to
against you.That's true, Parth.
situation.Subhadra
abduct your friend.Abduct me!
by a girl...This has never happened before.
There's a problem though.You'll be mocked at.
What is your command?In this world, it is valour that
that if love abducts valourthen the world can be
is yours, Parth.At your behest I had taken up
Subhadrayou know driving a chariot.
If the future of the entireAryan lineage didn't depend
through with this fabrication.Balram
I'll send the maids,Your Highness.
uncle!Where is she going
That was Arjun, you fool!Vasudev Krishna!
of this fabrication, Vasudev.We will have to get
for the wedding ritual.Get Princess Subhadra to
away from Dwarka.And unfortunately,
opposite to Dwarka.King Shakuni!
Dushashan and Ihave seen it ourselves
the chariot wasn't in control.But now, Prince Balram,
or is Princess Subhadranot in control?
waiting at the wedding podiumshe has renounced Dwarka
But why will Subhadrado such a thing?
from your younger brotherVasudev Krishna.
I'm right here, brother.Ask him, Prince Balram.
at this time,is Princess Subhadra
I have to admitwith great regret
She isn't in Dwarka!What do you mean?
Forgive me, Your Highness.It's a very disgraceful
and apologise to youbut my sister Subhadra
She will return afterher marriage!
is your responsibility.You're right, Prince Duryodhan.
to attack yet?I'll get the army ready
Who will we fight?The one who abducted
The warrior who is armedis the one who
Who has abducted whom?Reveal this to everyone here
of fabrications.I have committed only
to my dear sisterso that she could abduct
has chosen as her husbandYour Highness?
has chosen as her husbandYour Highness?
because of your playsI'll have to hide myself
And the place toois certain.
You had given your wordthat Duryodhan
In a certain sense,she had been married
Forgive me, Your Excellency.If pledging means marriage
Pledging means,the approval of the parents
then what is the significanceof giving away the daughter
falls in the seaand then the tree renounces its
and which land it choosesto grow as a new tree,
During the giving away ceremonythe parents
But who she wants to givethe rights on her
also took this decisionand I accepted her decision
with Hastinapur, Vasudev.Very soon, Hastinapur's army
I, Sage Durvasa, grantyou a mantra
and summon him to you.You would be able to beget
I haven't been married yet.How can I beget a son?
Sage Durvasa's cursehas no remedy
As soon as I disappear,a portion of my energy
I can't stop it fromhappening, Kunti.
He would be equally defamed.It would be widely known
could beget a sonbefore being married
that it was all due to a boon.I understand
is a result of a boon.I also give you another boon
you will stay a maiden.Your character will
Tu bhi so jaa laal mere(You are asleep as well, my child)
So jaa mere laal re(Sleep, my light)
Hmmhmm...laa...laa...Tu hriday ka mere, tukraa hai
(My dear, you are my child)Godi meri, mamtaa tarpe
(Sleep, my child)Surya dev so gaye chhaya andhera
(Sleep, my child)Please forgive me, son.
I can't let my fatherbe ridiculed by all.
please protect your son.Don't worry about my son, Kunti.
a divine armour and earrings.No power in the universe
will shatter the darkness of hislife and be a guiding beacon.
Reminiscing the pastwill cause dark clouds akin to
How do I just forget,Priyamvada?
My son...My son still lives
breathhe is my present.
But from whom?From the one who
But, Princessafter knowing of this truth,
There must be someonefor whom
There must be someonewho will
There must be someone.Greetings, sister-in-law.
You weren't disturbed, were you?Before setting out for
seek your blessings.May you always be victorious,
have no limits.May you be successful
just as Pandu, sister-in-law?Addressing a king by his name
coming from youpierces me like
with a feeling of guilt!This throne belonged
- No!Had the throne been
Since it wasn't so, it clearlymeans, the throne is yours.
worthy of the throne.You had come here to become
the wife of your elder brotherand that I am.
tantamount to a motherYour Highness.
should get everything.That he should achieve
Else, you'd consider me a sonand call me by my name.
by her name too.Now, make haste to
I have not laid eyes on youbut I can affirm that no
to be your wife.Your blessings adorn my luck
brother's blessingsI never start on any task.
His heart is stillin a state of turmoil.
I believe that, sister-in-law.My adoration for him
my wife and Iwould always serve
May you be victorious!My respects to you,
The kings and princesof the Arya region
you have indeed addedto my honour.
that a maidenis given the paramount right
that the decisionof my daughter Kunti
enemies or allies.You would offer the newlyweds
be choosing your fate.Father, before taking a decision
My decisionwill be based on the answer
The one whose answerwill be deemed most fit by her
I hope no one has any objection.Prince Ashwakumar may have one,
laid out for a 'swayamvar'.A test of strength isn't
Who are you?- I am Hastinapur's Emperor
I beseech you bothto please return to your seats.
My question goes thus...Sage Gautam's wife Ahilya
Sage Gautam had punishedhis wife.
By forgiving her mistake,didn't Lord Ram
The answer to thisis very simple.
He can forgiveany sinner.
That's discrimination.Then why don't you answer
Every punishment hasits extremes.
that it was timeAhilya was freed.
would have repentedfor her sins.
had appeared before Ahilyain the guise
Ahilya establishedwas only due to the knowledge
her in a fit of ragebut Lord Ram
announcing a sentencehas to mandatorily know
If the intentions aren't wrongor the nous is pure
There's no need for punishment.Thinking the same
If we do not failtheir incognito exile
with you.No, my child.
will come together.There will be horrifying
you will not begreatly benefited.
povertyand struggle is all
is faminenot only does the water
My childI am living with the aspiration
No war.Just deceit. Deceit!
of the Arya dynasty.Find them!
and the most beautifulwoman in the world
into its secret hiding.Now it feels like the incognito
to remain in hidingif all of us are together.
every cornerof the Arya empire.
together.We will have a new identity
keep this new identity in mind.But, brother, if someone
answer be?I cannot lie, Bhima.
Your remaining quit is notsufficient, brother.
Can't you lie for justa year, brother?
Whether lightning strikesa tree once or continuously
the first time.Lie spoken once
by someone's conspiracyand break my vow.
then we'll be exiled again.Another incognito exile.
That's the whole ideabehind incognito exile.
to be victoriousthen why would we
the way.Parth*
names for each other.Even I give you
*Sage Gold.And until someone specifically
beyond Kankyou will introduce yourself
does question youyou will remain quiet.
If Draupadi has given a nameto her husband
In the same manner, I willgive all of you a name
given me a name.What name has he given you?
I don't remember, brother.But Vasudeva said
Now, you will haveto hide your clothes
Lord Agni, this bow was givenby you as a sacrament.
After one yearwe will come back
the Kauravasto destroy them.
*The first month of the year in Hindu calendar.Your Highness, Pandavas
But they weren't there, either.Where are the Pandavas?
*Naga Loka: Naga/serpent Kingdom (Bheem's drowning location).Pandavas are not there either.
even the last spyhas returned.
neighbouring kingdomsthat is for sure.
KashiNaaglok
the Pandavas have their familythey haven't gone
In heaven!My child, if they
look for them?They are hiding
Arya dynasty.But where, uncle?
of the incognito exile.Just 30 days!
for them uncle.No place!
Shakuni!You are very proud
What could he havethought of
What are the thingsthat a human requires
new namenew city
Not occupation.One cannot change
He can only indulgein the occupation
then they wouldn't beable to hide.
other skills?Nakul
Think, my child.Think!
have become the most famous?Sahadeva.
Think, my child.Which kingdom's cows
And, Yudhisthirais a scholar at monarchy.
one yearhas signed a treaty
Think!I have heard
with many kingdomsof the south.
The king has begunwork on making
odourand human behaviour
to find thembut, my child
in Virat.In Virat!
*"Beloved."Please give us a 'ladoo'.
like Bhima.Am I fat?
in the world.Ladoos' give energy
Gain strength.Here, child
You will gain strengthand become powerful.
Cook, I want one too.You!
Run!Listen, child
Who's Tantripal?- There's a man
I'm scared that if he doesn'tget these 'ladoos
Go, child.Go.
Cook 'ladoo' has sentVallabh for you.
ladoo' for you.He himself loves 'ladoo
since childhood?Don't even ask, child.
Child, do one thing.There's a person
*"Astrologer, narrator."Go and give this 'ladoo
Hurry up.Go.
whom my old eyes deemof having the potential
and ushering a righteous era.Welcome, Vasudev Krishna!
He is the only personwhom an intelligent person
the desire to see youin my heart.
You are the uncleof my brother Duryodhan.
No, Vasudev.No.
Why so, uncle?I had salvaged my uncle Kansa.*
Greetings, brother Duryodhan.Bless you, Krishna.
And you...You must certainly be
on your faceanyone can know
Greetings, Vasudev.Meeting you is my good fortune.
Righteousness is such a topic,King Karna of Anga
not everyone can know it.Then you tell us
Righteousness gives respect,King of Anga.
that he did not leada righteous life.
but disrespect since birth...What should he do, Vasudev?
over which he has no right.What do you mean?
of mountainsmust not desire a small river.
ends up breaking.The right to a river
of the river, King of Anga.Hear all!
Yajnaseni,* Princess Draupadi is making her entrance!*Daughter of fire.
when should I playoh childhood?
of bright colours.Fire is my
Such a beautiful womanought to become
Certainly.Truly
if the Princess will bemarried to friend Duryodhan
You are correct.Greetings.
come to the 'swayamvar?I have a feeling, Draupadi
before I do.Splendid!
to receive charity.If you do not get any food
I can even eatthe leaves of a tree
What will become of you, Nakul?Let's proceed to Kampilya then.
No, Sahadev.There must be another village
The son of King VradyakshenSusharma, is making his entrance
We should go ask them.What do you think,
Let me do it.Greetings, sages.
we wish to seek some alms.That is why, we are
has engaged in charitythen why do all of you need to
the city of Kampilya.One will be rid of
Do come with us.Revered ones,
- Let all this beand come with us.
Hear all!The King of Ushneer, Shivi
by two people, Your Highness.The son of Pandu, Arjun
But Vasudevhe is the son of a charioteer.
The right to respectbelongs to every
he is with unrighteous peoplebut
However...if marrying Karna
certainly say no to it.Friend!
using computer graphics.Is the son of a blind man
Dusshasan.Only this fire can extinguish
Please orderbrother-in-law Duryodhan
Duryodhan and the King of Anga.Is the son of a blind man
- Duryodhan and King of Anga.Is the son of a blind...
- To lay down their weapons.Father, brother Duryodhan
Set his room on fire!Why, Dusshasan?!
of the Pandavasbrother had become
at once, father!Let's go, father.
set yourself on fire.You...
Go away,friend Karna!
My heart is burninglike the bed of the ocean!
The fire of the oceandoes not burn itself up, son!
to be patient, Duryodhan.How can I possibly
is not burning here!My respect,
are burning here!That daughter of Drupad
in the court before everyone!The insult a woman feels
Karna...My friend Maharathi Karna
but to sentence usto death instead!
With the intent of insulting usin some way or the other
And despite being disgracedI was a part of that 'yajna.
Apart from killing myselfthose Pandavas have left me
No other alternative...Son, killing oneself is not
this matter calmlybut please,
No!- Karna...
Your HighnessI cannot bear to see
lies solely with you.More than the sons of Pandu
dedication and competenceI have never questioned
to extinguish the firein Duryodhan's heart!
the Pandavas have insultedmy friend, Your Highness!
and annex Indraprasthato Hastinapur!
I give the orderto go ahead and
of setting yourself on fire.Extinguish this fire.
The question is no longer aboutIndraprastha and Hastinapur!
The excruciating painin my heart will subside
go through the same agony!I do not wish to
A tiny sparkon a pillow made of cotton
That fire cannot be extinguisheddespite numerous efforts.
This is the kind of insultthat should set
father!It should set them on fire!
the act of draining that beingcompletely of blood
But you insulted him.That is why,
are you forsaking me?When baby birds
You are capable enough.You can shove me
returning to Gandharis the only alternative.
UncleI had shoved you with this arm
But you cannot leave today.Please pardon me,
towards Hastinapurotherwise...
no effect on me.Uncle
shall be honoured by me.If you tell me
but even if I ask youto serve them your entire life
for youand that would
attempts to outrun itit is bound to fall.
but the wheel does notget another chariot.
UncleI join my hands before you
if I disobey youit will be an invitation
I join my hands before youand take the oath
it will be an invitationto my death.
you will not speak ofengaging in a war.
You know quite wellthat a plan should be such
I am not asking fora war this time.
If you snatch everythingfrom a person
Every year,the winter season
but foolish is the seasonwhich does not
every yearnew leaves grow on the trees.
If you wishto insult the Pandavas
Then take all that anger outnot on the Pandavas
by channelling it towards her.Panchali
When Panchali's respect shattersthe life of the Pandavas
is still resonating in my ears!I wish to obliterate
Sons,King of Anga...
Karna, King of Anga hasshowed the largest examples
part of his own body as a charity.He gave away his shield as a charity.
and not in the camp of treatment.Moreover, a better chance to slay him
he thinks is rightthen he will not be punished for
But brother Yudhishthirwe also need to go to welcome
been hampered?!In order to welcome you, we do not
And in this warif you help us by agreeing to fight
Shiva himselfMajesty.
Nakul and Sahadev?All hail King Shalya!
Majesty, all the princes are busypreparing for war.
- He's in the camp.He has been waiting for you,
All hail King Shalya!All hail King Shalya!
Prince Sahadev,I bow before your knowledge.
We will soon be venerating your corpseKarna, King of Anga.
We must proceed towards our camp.No, sons.
Hastinapur, sons.Mother,
the war.It is not right to trust the enemy
Just like a sonI will protect your mother.
to seek your blessings.Let us go, Nakula.
Uncle,this is not our camp.
He made me to promise to help them,dear nephews.
like that, uncle?!What situation could it be
and their praises left me blind.Unknowingly
dear nephews.And now, I have to fight along with
assume their sibling's childrenequivalent to hundreds of 'Brahmin!
For me, the two of you more than my own children.
my prayers will always be with the Pandavas.
begging outside the temple!And these are the values given 
His blind fatheronly worthy for
by their motherto these devils!
Stay within your limits!Calm, my dear.
using derogatory words like thatfor my brother-in-law and sister
I'm not your loverthat your sour words
And I will slay you, uncle Shalya.I will kill you for this betrayal.
So remember this oath,you will be killed in this war!
Whether King of Madra will bepunished or not
we can not get angry or think about revenge.
great 'akshauhini' army!This problem is more important.
Grandsire BhismaGuru Drona
Susharmaand now
wreak havoc on our troopsthat our soldiers' Maharathis
We will not even get a chance toattack.
anger and fearand fight with all your heart
our army will stand without we even notice it.
and not in the strength of his army.In order to win in this war
is your duty.In order to win in this war
is your duty.His excellency's death?
And more important than lifeis sacrificing it.
or a cupped palm of sacrificethat you have assumed?
Humans, demons, animals, birdsparasites, insects,
How do they die?And what happens after death?
Krishna.Water flows through it
And the blank voids in the bodyconsist of space.
The body is created fromthese five base elements.
are nothing more than earth,water, wind
their identities.All bonds are rooted
If this were truethen why is one's body
neither is one'sidentity from his body
Comprehend that, Arjun!A human life
Yet every human's natureand his deeds
Krishna?Tamas' means darkness.
is said to be 'Tamas' orientedbehaviour.
their bodily cravings.Sattva' means
in every circumstancethinks about justice, truth
Sattva' oriented way of life.Amidst these two
which means, 'Rajas' orientedmindset.
in all of them?Prince Duryodhan
His life revolves aroundarrogance.
He possesses more of 'Rajasand 'Sattva' is totally absent.
He has always obeyedhis elder brother's orders
only 'Tamas'.Look at Grandsire Bhishma
of 'Sattva' and 'Tamas'.He harbours no arrogance.
Even when the need ariseshe cannot break his oath.
He possesses both knowledgeand arrogance.
won't let him attain liberation.But Krishna
is a human's actionspredestined?
and a gazelle is bound tofear a lion.
to be punished?What is the purpose of that?
a human being is!A human isn't just the union
Five 'Gyanendriyas',* five 'Karmendriyas'***Sensory organs: Akshi (The Eyes), Karna (The Ears), Nasika (The Nostrils), Jihwa (The Tongue), Twacha (The Skin). **
of 23 such entities.In order for a human
And energy is termed as 'Chetana'.**Chaitanya: 'consciousness' or 'universal CHUT' or 'spirit' or 'intelligence' or 'sensation'.
No, Arjuna!Along with a human's 'Chetana
Residing in this device calledhuman made of 24 entities
when a fragment of Godresides in one's body as a soul
What is a soul, Krishna?And what is the means
similarly the soul usesthis device called a body.
and sorrows of the body.But the soul is not the body,
na sosayati marutah."A soul can neither be pierced
Nor can water render it weak,nor can the wind dry it.
it is immortal!"Na hanyak: hanyamane sharire."
be killed!A soul is omnipresent,
through my body.Without understanding
Knowing oneselfin the form of a soul
It is clear that the bodyis not what makes a human.
The one who explores withinhimself in this way...
nor the feelings,nor the thoughts
finally understands himselfin the form of a soul.
When the creationwas partitioned
then the man, that is thefragment of God became a soul
That soul was surroundedby desire and darkness, Arjun.
and understanding oneselfas the fragment of God
But Krishna, if every soulis a fragment of God
Just as a jewel lying in dirtdoes not shimmer
creation's 24 entities learnsthat it is the fragment of God.
That they are differentfrom the body itself
etcetera that the body sensesthey assume them
for change.The souIs that do not
committing injusticepunishing them to awaken them
in this battlefieldisn't what you think he is.
they shall continue to be bornand die.
The one who is bornshall surely die.
This great knowledge is called 'Sankya yoga'!**Samkhya philosophy regards the universe as consisting of two realities; Purusa (consciousness) and prakriti (phenomenal realm of matter). Jiva is that state in which purusa is bonded to prakriti through the glue of desire, and the end of this bondage is moksha.
That path is called justice.When a man and knows himself
that creation is Godand God is creation.
The human who comprehends thisisn't cruel and harsh towards
an organ causes painnot just to that organ.
As long as even a single humanis suffering in this world
When upon knowing thisa human mind
When one is under the influenceof 'Tamas' 'Guna
Just for the sake of hisperceived pleasure
towards God.Therefore
Therefore, injustice is anothername for ignorance.
What is the purposeof punishment?
to know the value of knowledgeand is unwilling to even glance
even towards himand towards others as well.
is inevitable!But at times situations arise
and justice in the worldis at the brink of extinction
compassion and truthare both destroyed.
slaying unjust ones todayand re-establishing justice
Arjun!And the duty to establish
won't that destroythe compassion within me?
won't my soul become unjust?The limit of justice
isn't created, Arjun.The difference between
All deeds are actions,but all actions aren't deeds.
it is called 'Nishkaam Karma Yoga'.**Self-less or desireless action: action performed without any expectation of fruits or results, and the central tenet of Karma Yoga path to Liberation.
In reality a man isn'tbound by a deed.
Who is the realKing of Panchal, Drupad?
The 104 brothers of yourshave also been captured!
your grandfatherwill have to come here!
And on the otherthe life of Bhishma!
- As you say.Not from there,
anything about fighting?Come here...
are my enemies.But their horses are my friends.
Enter it, if you can!Arjun, you need to
to our brothers.Do you remember
a big meal after the battle.Brother Bheem
But I did not fall.Then here you go.
must be in theresurrounded by the soldiers.
Must I do this?Do not say that, Sahadev.
Our father can free us.Duryodhan, 105 of us
as a team.We are the Kauravas
Besidesif we could not
figure it out?Besides
then how will the five of youfigure it out?
King Drupad who?Are you certain Kuru Prince
Or maybe I amthe King of Panchal, Drupad!
Or maybe I am.Even I can be him.
Brother Krishna said,if you keep this with you
Only one of the stones hasthe eye right at the center
In other words,he is the real King Drupad.
was fantastic, Your Majesty.However, had you
This task will be exceedinglydifficult for you.
If you wish, you may test me.- Test you?
We will move northward firstand then proceed to the East.
to the palace now.Murli Manohar
the things you do are lovely.Whenever He breaks
*KrishnaWhenever He breaks
Yashoda, his mother.Though He is the
his love for butter.Murli Manohar
the things you do are lovely.When with friends,
can also be very naughty.The one who pesters
chase Girdhar Murari.Murli Manohar
the things you do are lovely.Kanhaiya is kind...
never oblivious to agony.To help man, he is ever ready.
Labour seems to havemagnified my strength, Madhav.
- 'Murli ManoharMohan Murari.
than I had heard of.Indeed, friend.
the palace ofthe King of Vidarbha.
Friend, we havecome here because
the main entrancebecause it will be guarded
you were invited to the wedding.I wasn't invited to be
as the groom.The marriage
the Prince of Chedi, Shishupal.The entire region of Arya
What do you mean?What do I mean?
Srinvatam Te.What is this?
Who wrote it?The Princess of Vidarbha,
The most beautiful in the world!Who, Madhav?
Tan Me Bhavan KhaluVritah Patir Anga Jayam.
Vidarbhan Guptah Sametya.She asks you to come
brought me hereinstead of the main entrance?
for the purpose of marriage.We need to enter
But...If a father has not
against her wishesis always wrong, friend.
on his own termsand it's a God-given right.
And today, this wrong deedis being committed
will shatter the fortressof Vidarbha!
This is what I fear.Rukmini has instructed
should not get hurt.We cannot engage
When eloping is easierwhy engage in violence
secretly and tell herthat as mentioned in the letter
Meet her secretly, Madhav?What disguise will we be in?
Stop!What have you got there?
Sire, I have got it now.That Yadava...
are afraid of us cowherds.It's alright.
and deliver this 'kheer?To Prince Shishupal.
But you need to be back soon.As you say, sire.
Come here!Brihannala!
Her name is Brihannala.She is taller and bigger
is this, Madhav?I had told you, friend
Better get used to it.Who knows when it might just
We should ask him as to whereRukmini's chamber is.
your true identity.Even you don't know
of knowing it.Hold this.
Bless you.Who are you?
As he is busywith another undertaking
So, he has sent this sacramentfor the groom and the bride.
Alright.Deliver it yourself.
She can deliver it to thechamber upstairs after a while.
Besides, who knowswhether in the future,
Was that sacrament really sentby the great sage Durvasa?
His hermitage is veryclose-by to Dwaraka.
Hold this.Friend, I am the groom.
- 'Murli ManoharMohan Murari.
In every form of yoursthe things you do are lovely.
Unclewe five brothers
One womanand five husbands!
Unrighteousness!I was awaiting the advent
have committed this blasphemy,Yudhisthir.
by withered flowers...On that pious place
to be glorified on it?Grandsire...
A side of it hasthe Pandavas' righteousness
and they forgave us.You asked for the first chance
We tried burningthem down in Varnavat
they upheld righteousnessdisplayed exemplary character
today just one misdeedof theirs
In this unrighteous world,maybe God and human
Now you have understood.You thought of my deeds
just have a gander at whoweighs the more in immorality.
If they pretend to be so goodthen surely
some heinous sin.Uncle
What do we have todo indeed, dear?
will be done by that old man.My dears
when is dirtied by the sandis consumed by the ocean itself.
- Hail him!King Duryodhan!
Grandsire.The Pandavas' decision
the other four had tobecome recluses.
What such could bea situation, Vidur
How?How on earth?
why would he resort tounrighteousness or blasphemy?
Duryodhan the king.What difference
them becomes the king?My Hastinapur will surely
be ruined.Vidur
I have struggled incessantlyto ensure righteousness prevails
I was patientbecause a hope lingered
A day would come whenGod shall lend me a hand.
the forest exile of Panduand then...
didn't give up being patient.But now my patience
I didn't expect thisfrom Yudhisthir!
your patience.You are the foundation
can never bring down a palace.Even if this deed of Yudhisthir
Still, grandsiregive a thought to Yudhisthir's
Quell your words!The loosening of a single brick
can never become acceptableto me.
Do you knowthat the throne of the empire
The throne stands for potentialand the flag stands for hope.
of the empire.It doesn't bow
who, upon sighting a challenge,livens up with energy.
stops fluttering in the wind,it means
Accepts unrighteousnessand blasphemy
has been ruined.Today
Now this throneis out of bounds
our deed as blasphemyand ousts us
We hadn't forsakenHastinapur then, brother.
forsaken Hastinapur.Why did we even return
Home is defined by theexistence of rights, brother.
The very way in which this isour home and we have come here
You'd have to acquire the sameonly by seeking.
The deed which appeareda blasphemy to grandsire
In so being, another questionof import is raised, brother.
then it would be provedbefore the world
If we follow any such orderof grandsire
that we have sinnedand so has Draupadi.
That's the quandary I am in.Draupadi
has still got me perplexed,lord.
Orders are also righteous.They are in danger.
with grandsire.Why?
The danger arising out of thatwill have to be averted by you.
on our righteousnessis due to me.
for you since birth.Now, I will always stay with you
I am here to take you home.How did you acquire
a peacock is bound to layeggs that are either
multi-coloured feathers.I am your son.
time that I should learn to killbecause killing my father's
time that I should learn to die.Dying while avenging my aunt's
was a man of intellect.And that your mother
You were born to be immortal.Where is your mother?
while uncle is atthe edifice of combat arts.
What workbrings Prince Duryodhana here?
My mind roves.I see enemies
Kill me!Prince Duryodhana.
I will be honestwith you.
is the darker period of eclipse.My honour, my dreams
have devouredall my happiness, master.
They have been sentencedto an exile
You talk of exile, master?Am I at fault for their exile?
they wouldn't have lost.But, master
heir to my father's empire?Why?
Why?How can Aryavart* be so unjust to me?
on my kingdom's division.The woman I was supposed
Try to recall, masterthat I had to return from Dwarka
mocked me, master.Master.
are turning the entireAryavart against me.
How am I at fault?How have I wronged them, master?
Does that not qualifyas a wrongful act?
punishing her for this act doesnot qualify as a wrongful act.
the punishment seemsexcessively cruel
The Kuru dynasty's entirewealth will be obliterated.
can prevent this warfrom taking place.
contemplate going to war.They cannot.
and the all-conquering Balram.We can only request
taking sides.You should not worry
will never transpire.Prince Duryodhana
of gambling cannot actas a reason for war.
Krishna or any othersoldier of the Yadav army
soldier of the Yadav armywill not pick up a weapon
What kind of a decision is that?How can you consider us at fault
Prince Arjun.I'm not finding fault
what the situation demands.From what I can understand
Both sides agreed to allthe rules of the game.
Upon being defeatedyou cannot start a great war
brother Balaram.Then you should have
by our promise.Only when you know
Prince Arjun!No truth about this situation
I need no informationfrom either you or anyone else,
influenced by the weepingof Crown Prince Duryodhan
believed in only one truthand it is
did not act as unrighteouslyas Prince Yudhishthir.
Prince Yudhishthirdid not quit the game.
was proud of his decisionto bet his brothers
did not do sobecause his righteous ways
In an unrighteous manner.That is why, the promise I made
Madhavplease persuade brother Balaram
How can I persuade him,friend?
always makes one committhe gravest of acts.
of the Pandavaswe cannot fight any longer.
He won!- He has won!
He won...- He lost!
He lost!- He has lost!
He lost!- Enough!
Just lookat all this!
the sole right to you now!No!
and go to someone else!This is what we had decided!
would belong to me!Move away!
you are tarnishingthe name of wrestling!
What loathsomebehaviour is this?!
then the game is no fun.You cannot stop us,
respect we give to the Kingbut you are not the King.
What on earth are yourambling on about?!
This woman was bet in the game!Now, she belongs
you insulted a womanand now,
its consequences, fool?!If you have such strength
the same question.Let him go,
subjects and Ministers later.This is not
then I shall punish him myself.There will be no war!
has uncle taken?When it is a question
do not come into the picture!I shall go and ask uncle
Your father hasnot taken this decision
nothing that brother sayshas one meaning.
*Ranchhodrai, one refused to fight the war and fled to Dwarka for the sake of peace.Sometimes, in order
from the battlefield.He need not take to arms
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun...
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!Greetings, teacher!
I am proud of you.You are nonpareil.
superior among the Kuru Princesbut also no warrior in the world
My discipleand your Prince Arjun
All hail...All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
Sanjay.What is happening here?
Prince Duryodhan from his bond.Now, he is making
Namely, we also have suchbrave men among our subjects.
that this competition isonly between the Kuru Princes?
was between the Kuru PrincesI was silent.
that you challengedthe entire world?
I too am a partof the world, sire.
only among the Kuru Princesor order him
to your teachings.Do you even have
Kripacharya,this is a major crisis.
the dynasty of Kuruhas been insulted.
labelled a weak one, Vidur.What are you pondering, sire?
in your teaching?What are you pondering, sire?
in your teaching?I am Karna.
My father is the charioteerof the great Bhishma.
I know you.Are you not the one
You were fortunate, lad!You were fortunate.
People choose different pathsin order to become great!
Similarly, a warriorengages in battle
it had been made to me.Now, I only await
Before the competition begins,it is crucial to know
of religion and traditionsa king can fight only with
can fight only with anotherprince or a chief minister.
chief minister or a general.In other words, a warrior
or a person who is ofa higher rank than him.
You do not seem like a prince.To which clan of Kshatriya
that question, Kripacharya.A warrior who bears such courage
Telling aboutmy lineage and clan
the great Bhishma's charioteer,Adhirath Sushain's son.
of a charioteer!Despite being the son
to learn the art of weaponry?Yes, I am a charioteer's son!
with complete devotion.I am proud of my mother
Even today, becauseof my mother Radha
I condemn every personwho is ashamed to be associated
The son of a charioteercannot compete with a prince.
Its strength is its identity!No one asks the lotus
that is offered to Lord Shivaas to where it originated.
Why?Pardon him, Kripacharya.
Today, I must provemy capabilities in this arena.
Be quiet, Radhe!And let us leave!
compete in this!Go away, son of a charioteer!
has no capabilities!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
L-Let us go from here.Let us go.
Kripacharya a question.When Ravan, a Brahmin,
a Kshatriya, accept it?When challenged by a descendant
decide to fight him?Because they both were kings.
if this archer were to bethe king of a region
this archer is a king.I declare him king!
Leave Hastinapurat the earliest!
what crime are youpunishing us for?
of the Great Sage KanduMarisha, had married
to Prajapati Daksh, uncle.And that is what led to
one man been a sinthe entire human race
Sins and merits depend uponthe intention behind the deed.
How can such people have theintelligence to understand sins?
putting dirt on its headshould not be deemed
of parasitesit engages in such
where resortingto atypical solutions
has also acceptedthat our deed
from every possible angleand in order to solve
other possible alternativesthey took this decision.
the Great Sage Vyas.This is an unrighteous deed
and the Princess of Panchalare guiltless.
are two different things, uncle!Irrespective of what an esteemed
the ruler of a kingdomonly after considering
ignorant and inferior, uncle!And I am the King of Hastinapur.
Any deed that encourageswrong doers in the future
under any circumstance!Your Highness
before the entire societyto prove our innocence!
that after committing a deedthat seems unrighteous
reach the arenaattempting to kill him
If one continues committingsuch deeds, Your Highness
Your Highness!Your Highness
to give my nephews,my darlings
First, they commit such agrave unrighteous deed
Shame on them!Uncle is correct, father.
relationships with five mencan neither know
- Arjun!Pardon me, Your Highness
can only be a corpse!He cannot be alive.
in the royal courtI sentence you to death, Arjun!
cannot be sentenced to deathby you, Your Highness!
And I accept the challengeto a battle!
the five Pandavas will riseto the occasion, Duryodhan!
Stop!Insulting the dynasty's
keep getting taintedby your sons, Your Highness?!
even a moment longer!Your Highness
that in order to protectthe Kuru dynasty
Human!There's human
I have Lord Indra's blessingswith me.
can establishhis kingdom.
the partitionthen they would be compelled
After a war, Nakul.War is not a better choice
brother Arjun?A distinguished warrior is
his deathbut the loss
for the lives of othersthen make arrangements
Let me first pay my obeisanceto Mother Earth
Mother Earthaccept the prayer of the ones
Bless us so that we performthe veneration
And we don't wantanything beyond our necessities.
who dwell in your shelter.Bless our subjects with
of our weapons.We'll have to protect
with the subjects.Bhima, you and I will
Come on!Vrushali!
Vrushali!Vrushali.
There's no need foryou to attack.
We all are the childrenof Mother Earth.
Father...Father!
Your Highness?So many innocent people died.
the path of religion.Why have they been punished
Your Highness?What enmity does
How can I calm down,Your Highness?
who have to sacrificefor the welfare
that nothat will not happen
she's been proven right.How can a kingdom nurtured
Have patience, Draupadi.They aren't dead yet.
then they all can be saved.So...
What are we waiting for?They are miraculous snakes,
who have bitten themcan remove this poison.
before they succumb to it.Where will we
disappeared long ago.To go and find each one...
But they were notbenefitted at all.
That is the reason behindTakshaka's enmity with humans.
are snatched from themthat's when rebellions like
murdered so many humansis not a sinner?
which is benefitting no one.And the entire snake clan
and not criminals.If we have decided
then the entireclan of snakes
All the snakes are hidingin that forest, brother.
all illusions fail, brother.For that, we have to
You had promisedthat on this land
Today...Today
to claim their rights.Lord Indra!
You forgotyour promise
Takshaka.I have kept this land void
other than youcan reside here.
are divine.The person who attacked
of my blessings.I consider him my son, Takshaka.
have given birthto these five Pandavas.
the circumstances beyou cannot defeat them.
that afterseeing your son
Don't be foolish, Takshaka.Realise the truth.
it makes the place wet.In the same manner
of its own.I bind you
Even if you have tokill your own son
stop them.Okay, Takshaka.
many a times.King Nahusha
If I am defeatedby the Pandavas
You cannot be defeated, Lord.I am
made this forestillusive too.
with Lord Indra's protection.And you're Lord Indra's Godson
You are his Godson.Lord Indra is like
Remove your cart!What is the problem?!
Eating a lot has given youonly a big exterior
one bit for Hastinapur.Very soon, the reason
brother Bheem.Poisoning all of us first
This way, everyone will thinkthat we died in an accident.
Charioteer, remove that fooland his cart from the path.
All of you are frail and infirm!You cannot even remove a cart!
from the chariot now!Friend Duryodhan...
The Crown Prince of Hastinapurto push a cart in
Stop, friend.Revered 'Brahmin
You seem familiar.Who are you?
- Brother Someshwar!**It means "Lord Krishna".
I shall remove this right away.Allow me, revered 'Brahmins.
when the wheelgets stuck in the earth
Be it life or a cartwhen the weight
get stuck in the earth.Brahmins
from Hastinapur.Pardon me, Prince.
Neither do we accept charitynor engage in it.
he would have certainlydied at my hands.
- No!I did not pardon him.
Then what is the pointin pardoning him, brother Bheem?
forgetting the woundsgiven by him
has been raised on milkit will still attack a serpent
You are correct, brother Bheem.Let's go now.
of Princess Draupadi.Will King Drupad have his
A woman decidesher husband in this.
The one that Malini had brought.The painting of Prince Arjun.
why do you requirethat painting?
you will certainly know.I too wish to determine, sister
The truth is,I wish to determine
or not.What do you mean?
Lord Shiva was giving mea sign.
As to who you are to be marriedwill be decided at
had given such a signHe would have alluded
Is the Almighty also boundby the plans of man, sister?
by her oath, Draupadi.Whoever wins
This is your oath.What if
What ifupon seeing that painting,
Princesswhere do we place this painting?
But had brother Bheem'sanger exceeded its limit today
This disguise cancamouflage our look
If our cover is blown,we will be in deep water, Bheem.
and take us back to Hastinapur.The situation
right before our eyes.We must leave Kampilya
at the'swayamvar.Nakul and Sahadev's uncle
And if Krishna and Balaramare also present there
But motherI have heard
hosting a difficult competition.A competition that can be won
In other wordsby brother Arjun.
be awaiting brother Arjun,mother.
was burnt to ashesin Varnavrat, Nakul.
to the Shiva temple nowyou should ask
and Salvation.That is why, He always
then you shall get itonly from Him.
He would have alludedto some King or Prince
O storytellertell us something more about
Along with brother Balramthe frolics of Lord Krishna, in Vrindavan.*
had mesmerised the world.Capers of the naughty
might be hidden here.That day, when I went to deliver
broke my pitcher.Yashoda's son loves butter,
King Kans' fury.Don't worry. Yashoda kept
by tying him to a tree.He will not dare to break
all can Krishna do.Balram, had Krishna been here
But where is he?Let's search for him.
Krishna...Krishna...
Krishna...There you go, again he is
herding cows?Aren't we here to listen
Krishna, those maidens aretaking butter to Mathura.
severely, if we get caught.Two days back, my father
Eat some butter and applysome on your wounds.
*A perennial plant of the ginger family.Come on, Krishna.
One by one, Krishna brokeall their pitchers
He'll be punished.Last time, he stole clothes.
Run!Yashoda!
Krishna has done.He ate away three day's butter!
you should tie him up, at home.- Your kids may be monkeys!
Then keep admiring him, all day.Why is he making our lives
else we'll have to do something.Let me see.
I'll give you a punishment thatyou'll remember all your life.
Smacking the butter on his lips,Krishna was relishing it!
Krishna, you are againbeing mischievous!
Don't you care for your mother?Tell me, you wicked.
When they complain to me.Did you steal butter again?
of butter on his lips.This butter?
he told me to eat some!I said, 'I don't eat
Then Madhumangal, forcibly,fed me this butter.
Now, go away!Hey, but he broke the pitcher!
Mother! I didn't eat the butter!- I know, come on.
farmers give one-fourth of theharvest, as tax.
He keeps half of it and givesthe other half to Magadha.
Magadha's greed andKans' hunger for power
We'll not bear this injusticefor long.
Somebody will surely come.Surely...
Kans will be killed.But before that he will
Yashoda?Why will he kill us?
*A class of clarified butter.Krishna and his friends
Where will they getso much butter from?
Don't you knowwhat Kansa can do?
You can do anything.The cereals meant for the
And you feed the fruitsto the monkeys.
Fatherit's our land, our effort,
from their milk.They are the cereals, fruits
That's not ethical.You are right, my son.
its condition worse.So, rather than
if we relocateto a different place
My friend Vrishbhancan shelter us there.
How are we going to do that?The river is
its right over the Yamuna river.He doesn't allow anyone
How are we going to defeatthis seven headed serpent?
How are we goingto get any relief?
Krishna!- Krishna!
Don't you worry, Madhumangal.Krishna!
- Krishna!Krishna!
- Krishna!Foolish boy...
to this riverwhich is the abode
as soon as possibleelse, you will be punished.
and that of yours.How are you going to
I warn you for the last time.Krishna...
- Krishna!My King, please do something.
now bears my footmarks.That will keep you safe,
harm a living being.My King, please do something.
Krishna...- Krishna! - Krishna!
Vasudev!Were you aware that you
God has blessed mewith special powers.
What kind of special powers?God has blessed me
what it is?The power to put my effort.
courage and devotionnothing is impossible.
You are right, Satsom.Everyone puts an effort
to emerge victorious.The fact is,
blessed me with.God never differentiates
powers that are necessary.But reasons such as
And one who doesn't trycan never be successful,
brother Pandu's son.Hence, I won't be able
It is the King's order.Decide on a punishment.
But I am certain thathis intentions were not wrong.
But judgment should be basedon what is evidently seen.
forgives Prince Arjunthen he needn't be punished.
But Arjun mustfirst wash his feet
order Arjun to do so.Prince Arjun
Pardon me, King of Anga.Let's proceed, Sanjay!
But, Your Majesty...I won't be a part
in the morningat the court,
That you are the right personto be crowned the Prince.
A King too possessesa similar right.
that he can ownthat kingdom forever.
No one gets to rulea kingdom forever.
with the thronegets to be the rightful King.
Isn't he the rightful King then?We will attain our rights
With your own family?With grandfather Bhishma?
or with your cousins?No, Bheem.
We have to abideby what the King says.
only magnifies sadness.Do not cry anymore.
by another son of mine.When a brother insults
for life, Priyamvada.But they don't know how they
themselves as enemies.And enemies insult each other.
his revenge for being insultedand will be contented.
How can I...How can I
writhing in agony.He might find a way
Mother.Arjun.
Your tears of sadnessmake me do the fire bath.
because of me.No, son.
You have taught methat the other name
also loses his strength.That is why...
This is my mistake.And this is the reason...
gets tainted by it, mother.Look.
Stop!Enemies are not premitted
that his grandsonswish to meet him.
and seek his permision.His Excellency,
and they seek your permission to meet you.No,
then tomorrow in the battlefieldthey will not be able to strike at me.
cannot meet the enemies.Stop!
permission to meet me.Grandsire,
you must listen to me.As long as I am alive
the sons of DhristarashtraIt is the duty of all of you
If you needto make a sacrifice
In other wordsslaying me is your duty.
forsakes this dutythen
will become excruciatingly agonizing.Even after listening to all this
- But, grandsire...- I know, dear.
Howeverit is a moment of good fortune for me
is drawing to an end.In my life
it is time for my miseries to end.And
all of you.Until now
you must obey one last orderof your grandsire.
your hands must not tremble![MUSIC]
You are illuminating to usthe path to have the kingdom.
Grandsire.It was your oath.
Did we begin this war.However, after our victory.
Who will test us, grandsire?Grandsire.
But justice?If you leave, then this battlefield
Forever...All of you are correct.
I give you my word.That before I leave this world.
of all your suspicions.And discharge your duties.
He allowed the wife of his grandsons,and his daughter-in-law
All of you should leave.[MUSIC]
Draupadi.Dear, could you wait for a while?
"Duryodhan will indeed be punished for his sins.""But before that every person
"This is the curse of Yajnaseni Draupadi!"That curse of yours
Accept this punishmentof yours, dear.
only after being pardoned.Will you...
is not correct.His age...
You...For this dynasty of mine, you...
Is it true?Will Shikandini, the daughter of Drupad
T-That cannot be.My sons cannot die.
Do something, Vidur.Send a message.
We must stop him, Vidur.In his safety lies
the battlefield, Vidur.Send a message, that is my order...
That's impossible, your highness.It is too late to send a message now.
the war will begin.Your excellency
You are a guruand a guru
get bound to any tie in life.The day I coveted the kingdom
a teacher who educates people.Your excellency
you shall attain liberation.Similarly
That dayit is possible
Today,I am only a teacher.
of service to you today.Your excellency.
Goodbye!I shall meet you again
May your heartfinally attains peace.
will be wiped out in this war.Master, today in the battlefield, I will raise 
Uttarayour brother is the first martyr.
and the first flag raised on it,will be Uttar's, son of 
Pandu's dynasty will be indebted to Uttar, Uttara.
King of Virat.Our enemies will definitely have 
Yudhistira should've been died today, Grandsire.
- Don't worry, my dear.Tomorrow, his excellency Bhisma would certainly 
after seeing our might!Fear?
her youngest child frightful.So why do they have to fear?
Even it was not with your own hands, but by forcing me to do it!
I want to know,winning can lift spirit in war.
Prince Uttar not just saved Brother Yudhistira's life.
From now on, he won't let defeat to fall on us.
don't forget,that in a war without the King's presence,
And in this war,the king's not present, but you are.
other than thinking about victory, think about your ability.
everyone's morals here.Today, grandsire had broken 
Tomorrow, before the sun sets, we will capture Duryodhana.
one had been destroyed by King Yudhistira.
If this is a righteous war, then why did we experience defeat today?
In war, one can't escape neither from winning nor losing.
with his weapon.Winning or losing is in the Almighty's hand.
How can our soldiers retaliate Grandsire Bhisma and Master Drona attacks?
has a role in this war,victory is impossible for us.
If grandsire still takes part in this war,he will destroy all our armies.
These five Brahmans arenone other than
And he's Arjun.The one you dreamt of getting
Disguised as Brahmans?Impossible!
I assure youwelcoming them is your duty.
they should be punishedfor sure, Vasudev!
My daughter put the garlandaround Arjun's neck
Draupadi a reasonto shed tears all her life.
meaning of righteousnessand this is what they did.
It's doesn't matter whether ornot they are innocent.
Because of them, Vasudev.All because of them!
Because of you.What future had you wanted
I ask that my daughter sufferall her life.
but still be considered pure.Can you give me such
time and again.The consequences of the
As you sow so shall you reapKing Drupad.
all her sorrowand find a place among the
be worshipped, Your Highness.Now you should welcome
princess.Draupadi...
How could I have even thoughtof this abomination?
This is immoral, Govind.Absolutely immoral.
What else could I have done?How could I have allowed
The mere thought would havebroken her heart.
How could I be selfishand think only about myself?
on his face.How could I have
princes make such a sacrificefor my happiness?
How could I have disappointedthe whole community?
I couldn't find any other way.After considering the happiness
you arrived at this decision,Draupadi.
a shell in the oceanthe shell turns it
this immoralityinto righteousness.
The gift you gave me.The five stones.
Govind...Do you really consider
Never.I cannot call this righteous
with sorrow.It is immoral.
I don't understand, Govind.The gift of five stones
Righteousness cannotbe demanded.
a place in your heart.Knowledge calms the intellect.
And devotioncalms physical needs
righteousnessare calm and steady
Draupadi.And thus for you
How will I livewith five husbands, Govind?
How will I be able to befair to all of them?
How will I bear the tauntsof society?
as the purifier.It purifies everyone.
all those who come closeto you will be purified.
will come to you.I promise you.
righteousness.The throne of Hastinapur
to crush the heads of my enemiesin a similar way on
understand crushing.Powder!
with anger?Anger?
*A central character in the epic Ramayana. Vayu is the spiritual father of Hanuman.I have taken an oath.
Quiet, Bheem.It isn't appropriate for us to
father's words?Bravery lies in being merciful
to be quiet today.One can forgive his enemies
That's why wooddoesn't submerge in water.
it will be doomsday.And when a family deceives
There's no longer any placefor us in Hastinapur.
to Kuntibhoj.Kunti, don't punish the
her husband's housedoesn't get happiness, comfort
but the entire dynastyis disgraced.
But, sire...I have collected all
The way when a part ofa body is wounded
of this incident.I have decided to find a
please stay back.Believe me, Kunti.
Your majesty, couldn't you hearmy footsteps today?
Your majesty, what were youlistening to with such
I...- You were probably listening to
Or were you hearing thecries of our august
Why are your words so harsh?- Because I had become tough
What is the problemthat makes you... - Problem?
called the justice committee.Justice?
Duryodhana is just a kid.When you had decided to
The love for my sonweakens me.
So apart from my sonI am unable to trust
this world are blind.You are not the first.
The don't plead for mercy.They have made trust
like you have.Please forgive my son.
when the time comeswhoever you think is eligible
one considers it a humiliation.I will be agonized to
If you tell me,I will touch Kunti's feet
to judge Duryodhana.Do not order me
to judge my Duryodhan.Alright.
You have to distanceyourself from him.
don't have the protectionof their father
protecting your sons.At Guru Drona's academic
for twelve years.And in the twelve years
Dear, you will be the one totake the decision
destined to be impoverished.Now...
With the help of these princes.That's surprising!
King Shakuni.Greetings, Sir Bheeshma.
I am not mocking you.Your father
Is father embracing anchorite?Who gave you this information?
to send him a messagethat it's time for him
He will declare his sonwhich means you,
to disobey my orders.Thus, you have finally
do you have any reasonfor being
the reason isthat it's right for a king
are readyto take you to Gandhar.
Dhritarashtra's permission...That isn't needed.
on your behalf.Please come.
out of Hastinapur, Sire?That there's no opportunity
that's what I'm trying to do.Proceed.
A father always prays forthe well being of his child.
Due to thishe always tries to decide
has tread himself...The path whose pitfalls he
sunshine of the pathThat should be the path
of every father.Indeed, it is
we always forget to reflectupon three questions.
Doesn't every pathchange with time?
So, how can experiences froma time gone by
Is every childan image of his parents?
the children by the parents.But, inner capability.
So do you believe the path wherethe father has found success
Third question.Aren't the challenges and
open a portal to a new answer?So does the act of
and challengesqualify as benefiting them
it would be bestto develop a child's character
the path in a child's lifewouldn't empowering them
be more beneficial?Think about it.
you must not reveal your pastto your husband.
that nurses a secret within?And what matrimony is it,
she assigns her husbandthe highest position
of that tradition.I shall adorn your hair
and trust.Handling a woman's mane
the opportunity.I was spellbound by
Swayamvar'.That very moment
Your question was very witty.Even I began praying the moment
with just one questionand acquired it too.
isn't appropriate, my lord.It is imperative that one
such a special heart.Do you not trust my choice?
No, my lord.I...
You have to pass the verdict.A man who tests his wife,
That means, I have toundergo another test.
What is this?Whose message has arrived
The beat of the drumsconveys a message.
You cannot go to the battle,Pandu.
It is my duty to answer it.I shall command the charges
Pandu must display his strengthat the earliest opportunity.
I may be blind.But I know how to wage war.
It is our duty to helpthe kingdom of Madra.
that I'm a new kingand I'm just married.
Have you even thoughtabout Kunti?
What happened, my lord?Is it distressing news?
is perceived to be distressingby the other.
They are one.What is pleasurable to you,
Someone has attackedour ally nation.
Mother and grandfather insistedthat someone else will
the king's duty.Hence, I shall go to the battle
that truly befits a king.If the ruler of Hastinapur
I am aware that a queen wouldbe gratified.
If you are angry upon meyou have every right
has brought us separation.An eclipse always obscures
But that would be myweakness, Kunti.
he is weakened forever.I am here to be your strength,
I am a queen as well.You shall be victorious
Do you wish to saysomething, Kunti?
No, my lord.All that my heart possesses
May you return with a tokenof victory from Madrapur.
Har Har Mahadev!*Hail Lord Shiva!
Har Har Mahadev!Proceed.
is destined for, Kunti.Turn your wait into
Forgive me, sister-in-law.I do not wish to cause all of
That they have no good newsto convey yet.
that there is no bad news too.But my ears
We will get a message.And it shall surely be
Title: mhbr season 001 dvd 001ScriptType: v4.00
Active Line: 175Video Zoom Percent: 1
Format: Name, Fontname, Fontsize, PrimaryColour, SecondaryColour, TertiaryColour, BackColour, Bold, Italic, BorderStyle, Outline, Shadow, Alignment, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, AlphaLevel, EncodingStyle: Default,Arial,20,16777215,65535,0,-2147483640,-1,0,1,3,0,2,10,10,10,0,1
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:07.88,0:00:10.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My competence is\Nnot my own, Lady Amba.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:10.98,0:00:12.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My competence is to\Nserve Hastinapur
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:19.96,0:00:21.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,go to Hastinapur.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:21.99,0:00:26.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,A fisherman catches a fish\Nand someone else devours it.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:37.84,0:00:39.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Princess Amba!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:40.95,0:00:44.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You shall be punished\Nfor your impudence!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:50.96,0:00:52.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Let the princess speak.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:53.99,0:00:56.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Although her accusations\Nare unfounded
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:01.93,0:01:04.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,that my accusations\Nare unfounded?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:05.97,0:01:08.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The offender has\Nbecome the judge.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:21.75,0:01:23.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,To make you the wife\Nof VichitraviryaDialogue: Marked=0,0:01:23.96,0:01:26.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and the queen of Hastinapur
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:37.90,0:01:42.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Now, marriage, husband\Nand children mean nothing to me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:43.84,0:01:45.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Now, I only want justice.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:56.89,0:01:58.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but that is not possible.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:59.83,0:02:01.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I have taken a vow of celibacy.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:13.91,0:02:16.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and I want you to endure that.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:22.95,0:02:26.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You are the cause of all\Nmy agony and disappointment
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:34.83,0:02:37.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,you will have to bear\Nmuch greater agony.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:43.77,0:02:47.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I think, you seek\Nnot for justice but vengeance.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:55.81,0:02:57.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,becomes justice.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:01.89,0:03:04.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I shall not get\Nany justice here.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:08.96,0:03:10.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,doesn't permit\Nyou to commit sin.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:11.83,0:03:14.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I shall approach every\NArya king
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:29.01,0:04:30.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,whether the offender is\Na common man or a kingDialogue: Marked=0,0:04:31.01,0:04:32.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but one ought to listen
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:40.92,0:04:44.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Only then can righteousness\Nprevail in this world.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:45.96,0:04:49.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You should seek the help\Nof my teacher, Parshuram.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:26.89,0:06:29.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I have been looking for you\Nfor days, Lord!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:31.76,0:06:34.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You will have to appear\Nbefore me!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:40.91,0:06:42.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,nor give up.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:44.88,0:06:47.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:17.74,0:10:18.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:24.84,0:10:26.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:47.76,0:11:49.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,On 21 occasions on this earthDialogue: Marked=0,0:11:50.66,0:11:53.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I had put an end to unethical\Nand unjust people
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:00.91,0:12:03.64,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,that inverting a water jarDialogue: Marked=0,0:12:03.84,0:12:07.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,does not expunge\Nthe vacuum within.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:20.86,0:12:22.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,can injustice be expunged.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:25.73,0:12:26.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That is why now
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:37.94,0:12:40.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If you have met\Nwith injustice, ladyDialogue: Marked=0,0:12:41.91,0:12:43.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,then you should\Ngo to Hastinapur.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:49.82,0:12:51.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Devrath Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:53.83,0:12:56.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He will definitely help you\Nget justice.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:06.81,0:13:08.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Bheeshma has done\Ninjustice to me, my lord.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:09.71,0:13:10.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Impossible!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:18.85,0:13:22.62,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but Bheeshma can\Nnever be unjust.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:23.89,0:13:26.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,There can be a tear\Nin the sky
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:44.68,0:13:48.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You will definitely find a flaw\Nin your thinking.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:06.90,0:14:08.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He has done\Ngrave injustice to me.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:34.86,0:14:37.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,So, go back home.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:38.80,0:14:40.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,May the Lord\Nbless you with good sense.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:51.74,0:14:54.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!\NLord Parshuram!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:55.85,0:14:57.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:10.67,0:15:13.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Until he has even an iota\Nof happiness in his lifeDialogue: Marked=0,0:15:14.64,0:15:17.62,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will burn in agony, Lord.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:40.60,0:15:43.64,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,disrupts all the plans\Nof a human beingDialogue: Marked=0,0:15:44.67,0:15:46.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and that person\Nconsiders the distress
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:52.71,0:15:55.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,on the basis of\Nthe plans of human beings?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:57.68,0:15:58.65,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:04.86,0:16:06.60,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,at the foot of the mountain.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:06.66,0:16:09.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But, do these plans actually\Nget him to the peak?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:16.77,0:16:18.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,he comes across new obstaclesDialogue: Marked=0,0:16:19.60,0:16:22.58,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,impediments and difficulties.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:30.75,0:16:33.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,A previous plan might just\Nmake him fall down a chasm.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:36.62,0:16:38.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He is never able to change the\Nmountain according to his will.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:14.59,0:17:18.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is the only path\Nto success and happiness.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:20.60,0:17:21.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Think about it.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:53.72,0:18:56.60,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,you may sit on the throne.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:34.80,0:19:35.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Queen Mother
I am not obligatedto answer any of your questions.
by showing themhow to purify themselves
The sin committedby all of you...
Now, eventhe water I give as an offering
After slippingthrough my fingers
punished for it.Now
I can onlyshow you the path to
Yama will be ableto purify your tainted souls.
such a grave sinit is possible for us
to ask another question?Is the other name of Lord Yama
Then is the righteous pathnot that of Lord Yama?
Had you known righteousnessyou would never have
what righteousness ishow can he follow the path
I wish to seek from you.If a soul gets purified
There must be a wayto follow Lord Yama's path
She had brought backher husband from Lord Yama.
offered to Deathbut had returned from
The principles followed by Yamaare rules on this earth.
This is what rules mean.One must abide by rules
And how could you believethat we chose not to
to make our lives sacred?You may not have faith
But you could have had faithin that of the Kuru dynasty.
However, a desertis devoid of water
is its true test.And my husbands and me
You saythat because of our
But what ifby doubting the purity
an unrighteous deed?If my husbands and me
then do accept this offering.I have a request, grandsire.
Greetings, uncle.Bless you!
in Varnavrat had caught firewe had to flee from there.
And deeming us deadyou decided to coronate
to serve youand the entire kingdom.
is still standinga new building cannot be
the current cropsone cannot sow
I request youto declare brother Duryodhan's
I... - Certainly,brother Yudhishthir.
my coronation as Princebecame null and void on its own.
she is called amoral.In the other kingdoms
If you face this questionin the future
I have another question.In our kingdom
if he is proved to be amoralthen he gets punished!
If the Crown Princeor his wife is amoral
or not?No amoral person is ever given a
is a sacredand stately one.
preside over it be correct?Answer my questions,
you must thenlet justice prevail.
No need to do that, Yudhishthir!I banish you and your family
the King of Gandhar?Purandiri, the King of Gandhar
on fire tonight itself.Then...
If they are alivethey might escape easily when
I gave to you at once.Certainly, My Lord.
What is it, Prince?What are all of you doing?
Y- Yes.It is way past dinner time.
serve the meal right away.Do proceed to
given to you, Purochan.W- What, Prince?
but you have not yetpaid heed to it.
for Nakul's mouseotherwise he will bring it
to have her meal.That's a splendid idea.
Bring a small bowl!We want some 'kheer...
on the 'kheer?Herbs. - Potion...
for digestion, Prince.That is why, it is used
Certainly.Brother Bheem
- What?Certainly.
don't eat the 'kheer' themselvesbut feed it to
What happened?Why do you seem so tense?
No other person can everhave an appetite like yours.
I have such a premonition.Purochan's wife
Who knows what she addsto the meals.
He has constructedsuch a strange palace.
reeks of something.We should ask Purochan about it.
I cannot control myself.Go on. Go and call brother
for three hours.And we end up
Purochan.What is it, Prince? - If you
hung over doorways.Come on. Make haste.
Her Highness are not yet here.They will be here.
How can you begin eatingwithout Her Highness?
But Prince, we have preparedquite a feast today.
Give me that.I will eat not only with her
I am awaiting for all of you!They ought to begin
before the others arrivethe poison will start
Stop him from eating, My Lord.But how do I stop him?
in my presencebut why is it so restless?
Here is some 'kheer' for it.Brother Arjun, mother is
not wait for us?Nakul
the task it came here for.Then we will know why
Let's see where it goes.What is it, brother Arjun?
Lac has been used insteadof bricks in the palace.
You may not know this, Nakulbut lac is extremely flammable.
with dried grass,clarified butter and cotton.
Bless you.Greetings, mother.
and the rest of your brothers?Mother, instead of
a mouse more interesting.Bheem, you may begin eating.
Fatherthe remaining Pandavas
Then I do not wish to live butI shall return in my next life.
I shall come to youas your doom.
Bhishma!Even when a woman takes
belong to you.Numerous young soldiers
Widowed womenwill try to gather what is left
trying to safeguardthe severed heads of their sons
When a crow or vulturewill pluck out the eyes
will drive a stakethrough everyone's heart.
Robbed of their fatherschildren will cry silently
one aged manwill mock their misery
In this very Kurukshetra!Because he deems
Lady Amba.I have never engaged
Neither for affection nor life.It was not my proposal
And this was notmy decision either.
You are wily and treacherous!Did you forget the promise
My lifemy wishes
Just take a look around you.Look, Bhishma!
from the dejection of the womanwho has spent her entire life by
And you are responsiblefor all this, Bhishma.
That too is your misfortune,Bhishma.
Lady Ambayou had said
you will come to me.I am experiencing
these herbsthese pyres...
My soul is dyingto have liberation
this battlefield.I will indeed have
In this very battlefield.But before that, you must
dynasty with your own hands.Upon seeing the Kurus bleed
Bhishma.Your heart will plead
allow you to march.You will be rooted to the ground
Await your liberation!Await your death!
Greetings, father.Bless you.
I require your light, father.Only your duties can dispel
if someone triesto obstruct your path
With this hope, I have cometo seek charity from you, son.
That is the rightof every parent.
how can he askfor something from me?
Henceforth, do not engagein any more charity, son.
that after offering you waterearly in the morning
then I indeed give it away.A river that descends a mountain
father.Besides, when you yourself
for the victoryand success of their sons.
will come to you to askfor your ear-rings and armour.
will come to you to askfor your ear-rings and armour.
These make you immortaland denote
the weapons of Arjunwill be able
be able to reach my body,father?
then it denotesthe divinity of the rock
It lies in my archery, father!For being concerned for my life
However, to memy oath is more important
in the soul of a human being.If Lord Indra does not know this
than my archerythen I shall take my armour
I, Susharma,King of Trigartha
In this war,my army and I
If any of usdisobeys your orders
King Karna of Anga has not yetpledged his loyalty to me.
are independent.That is why,
to anyone they like.Friend Karna says
his loyaltycannot lie with anyone else.
is on me.Tell your friend Karna
his loyalty to me.King Karna of Anga.
Greetings.You have to pledge your loyalty
Is thatan order of the Crown Prince?
of His Excellency Bhishma.But for this war
is quite important.The freedom of my friend
is more important to me,uncle.
Only because he is on our sideis our victory certain.
When the time comes,I will prove
His Excellency Bhishma.In his conquests
Their soldiers have seenhow the armour of my friend
of His Excellency BhishmaI have
Friendthe Pandavas and their army
I know,friend Karna
but in your armourlies my protection.
If the Pandavasattack me with a weapon
friend Karna.Friend Karna
it is impossible to kill me.This armour of yours makes
it makes me immortal.Your holy armour is
of his son, Lord Indrawill come to you to ask for
are with you!Establish justice.
Liberate your Grandsire, Arjun!Put an end to his troubles!
"If you have to makeany sacrifice"
is your duty.""If any of you step back
"You must abide this order of your Grandsire!"
"your hands should not,my lads!"
"Your family shall punish you!""All the sins committed by you"
"You shall writhe in agonylying in an array of arrows!"
What have we done, Grandsire Bheeshma?What sin have I committed?
That I......That I was compelled to raise 
And...And I have strangled 
before doing this?Why didn't my arms break?
Arjun, my lad!I am alright!
The lamp that burnsafter sunrise...
only creates soot.The burning of such a lamp
It is better to extinguishthat lamp!
That lamp...cannot extinguish itself.
Even my life...is futile now, my lad!
Your life is not futile.I am in need of your guidance,
Justice is the path for everyone.And one's mind is his guide.
No one can offer you guidance.You all are capable of knowing
Do not mourn!But, Grandsire.
After your demiseour laughter shall fade.
It is our selfishnessThat we cannot let you die!
Nakul, my lad!Do not bind me now!
You even laid down your weapons yourself!Now there are no restraints upon you!
Because you are adamant upon saving me, Arjun.Your adamancy shall become
Opened my eyes in a moment!Seek his guidance, Arjun!
Grandsire!This is love.
Love binds itself to others.Even saints have the
The agony of restraints!Now you have the chance.
As long as I was alive Inever let injustice happen.
And injustice too!In reality,
Therefore,I never let time performs its function.
woeful Arjun!Is this your justice?
But you severed the very roots of my family.
acquire the throne?Brother Duryodhan!
The sun has set!The sun has set upon the 
Then accept the punishment for this crime!Arjun!
- Eklavya.Are you a tribal?
a different state?And from whom did you learn
teaching you, prince.Guru Drona!
and practice the sameduring the night
No one can call his ordinaryskills as a gift from me
your Guruone has to prove his eligibility
Whatever I have learnt till nowwith your blessings
collide with each other?Both would break.
importance of dedication?Have we ever thought about it?
process of acquiring knowledge.Sometimes a student is jealous
No? Doesn't that happen?Several thoughts
unstable state of mindwe are unable to
only with dedication.Dedication destroys the
jealousy, ambitionit calms the heart and helps
Guru Dattatray**A Hindu deity encompassing the trinity of Brahma, Vishnu and Shiva, collectively known as Trimurti. Teacher of Parashurama.
In other wordswhether it's about
our dedication towardsthe teacher is more important.
I am the son of Nishaad, theking of the forests of Magadha
such extraordinary archery?The one who has been
archery skillsArjun's self confidence
If the boy has becomeso magnificent
then thinkif he stays at the hermitage
the boy from the forestyou seem to be in a dilemma.
What is bothering you?Right now, for me, justice
without rest.Now stop it.
with Guru Drona.Brother, I am sure there is
knowledge like Eklavyauntil then I will not
Come.If Eklavya becomes our friend
Dushasan is right.He can become the commander
Arjun practices all his lifethe sons of Pandu
speak to Eklavya.But how can I stay
Sure. But to help yourfriend for some time
Once I get the kingdomyou can go back to Magadha.
Where is Guru Drona?And if you promise
My father always listens tome, Eklavya.
my son says.You have established me
you as my student.But dear, I have a question.
an offering to youI will not use the skills
You will have to give itimmediately.
the thumb of your right hand.As an offering you will give me
Your dedicationpleases me, dear.
the land of Hastinapurand return to Magadha.
I'm sure Shakuni isconcocting a plot
we go to Hastinapur.The one who is plotting
He would tremble in fear then.Dices can be an answer
to a fight there.But when uncle has
why should we go to Hastinapurand fight with them.
A ruling King can always expresshis helplessness, Yudhisthir.
No, uncle.Uncle Dhritarashtra
When we don't know aboutthe plans of King of Gandhar
Maybe, he wants toreign our kingdom.
Do we give up on our rightsjust because someone's
which we have built aftermuch hard work?
actual rights on this landand we are no exception.
and then exhales it.Neither does it accepts
we go back to the jungle.This kingdom isn't ours
and so is our self-confidence.We can't let go of our pride
It's not just aboutthe kingdom, My King.
we play to protect our honourwe will lose our piousness.
that we have.If we protect our piousness,
all that we lose.Even if we lose this kingdom
But I can't refuseuncle Dhritarashtra's order.
to Hastinapur.And if uncle Dhritashtra
They have entered this placejust the way a fawn
just to have itsquashed by us.
When you make the right moveyou can compel others
Let's go and welcome them.While welcoming the
to be humbleto him.
It's a traditionthat wherever
firstly.So tell me,
your blessings.No, dear.
and used in prayers.In the same way,
is as important asa sovereign king.
Kuru dynasty could getthe title of a sovereign king.
happy and a proud uncle.I seek your blessings, King.
Order brother-in-law Duryodhanto drop his weapons.
is deemeda fitting punishment.
and King of Anga's weapons.I seek your blessings, Queen.
Do we need to spruce upHastinapur's court for you or...
Or?Or
if something lacksin our hospitality?
if you wish to.We have arranged a grand
Shall we, dear?Let's go, uncle.
As you say,Queen mother.
A sacrificial lamb is fed wellbefore it could be sacrificed.
As long as Grand SireBhishma is with us
Let's proceed.What happened, Sahdev?
Today, this court is goingto witness an injustice
Don't worry, Sahdev.Grand Sire, Sir Drona,
Queen mother's hereand so is our mother.
they won't remain silent.Brother Arjun
that everyone's goingto be a silent spectator today.
the rope you holdfor your support
I fearthat everyone's going
Yes, Vidur.I'm worried about the fact
He wantsthe kingdom of Pandavas
is the same, Grand Sire.Grand Sire
until someone sits on it.But Pandavas
And I...I won't let anyone deprive
The final say shouldbe ours today, uncle.
My childrenI'm going to
have a reasonto be proud of themselves
How are we goingto do that, uncle?
That won't suffice, uncle.We will make their wife
weapons in their courtwe are going to unclothe her
I come hereto put a burden on your 
whose shoulder can withstand the weight of this world.
And to have such burdenbrings about joy.
And assuming such duty becomes one's pride.
And assuming that responsibilitybrings one's satisfaction.
is punishment.My shoulder can lift
my heart has no strength to liftthe burden of responsibility anymore.
I have Ganges water,on the one hand,
Both Arjun and Karnabound by their oath.
I made a mistake during my youthand I repent for this.
BecauseKarna and Arjun had taken oath 
is like pushing a stake through my heart.
Please protect them both, uncle.Protecting Karna is not 
ButKarna is also your grandchild, uncle.
are my grandchildren.But before you got married
I understand what's in your mind, Kunti.Suffering is also part of my destiny
you have to stay in the middle of the formation.
will provide securityfor me.
All weapons directed at youwill have to go through me first.
Previously, weapons will only bouncing off of your armour
Do you doubt my competence?- No, King of Anga!
because you gave away your divinity as charity.
if you really concern with the safety of your friend
just to uphold your righteousnessand end up at a loss like this.
Karna, King of Angashould be relieved from the task
own life from enemy's arrowshow can he protect you?
will not end your life.King of Gandhar!
Because of thathe is prohibited to enter the battlefield.
pledged his loyalty to his generalcan not be
I have dreamt to prove my competence in the battlefield.
I have taken an oathto protect my friend.
to smash my dreamcause this is the only way to prove it.
Karna, King of Anga.Uncle!
to the King of Angabecause if he goes to war
Karna, King of Angacan not even protect himself  
to counter it.Sincerity and protection have no 
do not require a suit of armor, uncle.When the time comes
but if one's beaten on the battlefieldthen one's loses one's life!
My friendwill combat on the battlefield tomorrow.
then listen to mine as well.You should resign your position.
Friendto show me such respect
you don't have to argue with his excellency.
This is what grandsire wantsto protect the Pandavas.
never want to kill the Pandavas!It is possible
And imprisoning those five in this war
The very purpose of this war is to
And they will only be killed...only be killed by you, 
the sake of my successis only you.
there's something important for you to see.
in their hearts, friend.Their dedication until death
The war will begin when the sun rise tomorrow, friend.
or his courage.His power rooted in his faith.
that his general would protect his life.
I'm afraidthat if His Excellency Bhishma resigns
Not only that, friend.After His Excellency Bhisma,
Only after their deathwill you to appoint me as general.
If he imprisons Pandavasthen you can give them 
then I will be thereto help you and realize 
killing Arjuna is also your dream.This has always happened 
my competence,fate snatches it away from me.
In other times, fate just left me.To fulfill your dream
Unclethat is Arjun.
They are his brothers.My dear
Today, your fatestands at a very
if the five of usare seen together
only by mother, Sahadevand not us.
You must stay with Arjun.The rest of us shall leave.
On my behalf,you must bless Arjun
Just look at how excitedthe 'Brahmins' are.
Yes, Bheem.That too is one of the fears.
a marriage proposal like you.Bless you.
peck that swan to death.What do you mean?
What kind ofan insult is it, Kings?
be insulted in this mannerin the city of Panchal?!
We are nourishersof the subjects!
will be taken by thatdestitute 'Brahmin?
The elephant!It is the elephant's insult!
to that destitute 'Brahminall the Princesses
How many timesshould we be insulted?!
And put an end to this 'Brahminand his family.
Kill that 'Brahmin!And throw the maiden
Do not fight withArjun today, friend.
The enemy is standingright before us!
When lightning strikeseven Chandra Dev hides behind
If we do not honoursomeone's competence
If you ask me tothen I shall take to arms
Kshatriyaswe must kill this
To fight you and kill you......is our right!
Patukeshwarwhy do you not challenge
Show yourself! I willbehead him this instant!
This way...King of Gandhar!
My deargo and kill Arjun and Bheem.
Do not ponder, my dear.This is your opportunity.
Today, you maysavour your victory.
Let thatBrahmin' know this.
to a ceremonyone must never draw
Crown Prince.Kings, Crown Princes
to bless this young manand the Princess
Now, you too should leave,young 'Brahmin.
and a palanquin for you two.Indeed! Arrange for
Goodbye.Stop...
And you have got that maidenonly because of me.
I must seek the blessingsof my mother.
After all, I was the firstto stand up to protect you.
Someshwarcarry me now.
Allow me to leave, father.You are allowed to leave,
of the 'Brahmin's' motheryou must return soon.
Bless you, friend.The look of joy on your face
are to the right of the stone.Those of love and dedication
Justice is right in the center.These are the fives bases
do I do with them, Govind?There are many instances
to see the path.In order to remind oneself
The decision will alwaysbe yours, Draupadi.
will be easier.Gather your weapons and courage
in Virat for this purpose.In order to harm
what if that wickedand evil Duryodhan
My Lord.We women of the Kuru dynasty
Taking care of the suppliesand tending to the injured
And when you slayDuryodhan and his brothers
I shall slay you,Vasudev!
Is this what you callfriendship?
you had taken his side!You were scared
friend.I am not scared,
I shall die before youand that is an oath of mine.
A message has been sent.We need to proceed
Victory awaits you.My darling
Have faith.You have unparalleled might
awaits you.I, son of Ganga
that I shall never becomethe King of Hastinapur
I shall ensure that your sonsare made the Kings!
will you quit being on the sideof my sons and me.
I shall serve youand Hastinapur as a servant
While fulfilling the promiseI made to my father
Vidur.In order to maintain
However, it got taintedright before my eyes.
did not have my protectionthen Duryodhan would never
discharged your duties.When a strong current
the boat of Hastinapurin the right direction.
I have seen my fatherpreside over that throne
of his righteous governance.During his governance
Righteousness,knowledge
of the Kuru kingdom.And I have firm faith
on that throne.However...
shall not be able to witness it.Today...
Unclewhy will you die?
Dear Viduras long as I have
I have the boon to die at willand now
dear Vidurthat the power which can end me
The army is readyto march now, uncle.
with our respective troops.The General will make
be ordered to march forth.I hope you have appointed
Emperor.No,
the General of Hastinapur.Our General has to be someone
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
father.I am going to pull out
What blessingshould I give my sons?
there is no fear.However,
have morphed into such an oddentity in my heart today, son.
I should give my sons.In the battlefield
in this life of mine.I never knew the value of lamps.
the hundred lamps of mine.Vindhan.
My sons!You must ensure
please pardon me.I took an oath without
I have knownthat knowledge and solutions
Intransigence and oathsare merely the paths to sorrow.
Greetings,Your Excellency.
I asked all of youto gather here
Hence, this place came to beknown as Samanta Panchaka.
and to its southis the River Drishadvati.
has been blessed by theancestors of Lord Parashuram.
Lord Indra hadblessed Emperor Kuru
shall get a place in heaven.For your war of righteousness,
VasudevKurukshetra is a region
appropriate day to gather herewith the intent
already decided upon that day.The day the stars
the Mahabharat.This peace and satisfaction.
The responsibilitiesof the kingdom, war
The debate aboutjustice and injustice.
What more could anyonewish for, Satyavati?
During the time of struggleswe realise
and not peace.The ones who have
only after struggleisn't it, King Shantanu?
Trying to attain pleasure.Let it go, Satyavati.
Really?I'm the daughter of Matysaraj.
You shouldn't try to help me.Leave it, Satyavati.
the fish for you.I cannot wait until then,
should be grabbedonce spotted.
delicate hands were so powerful.King Shantanu, you
kingdom like Hastinapur.You must be aware that
A desire is the strengthof the heart.
desires stay good only inthat measure, Satyavati.
But the same eyeshave the power to see
How can I then humiliate Godby having such humble desires?
are the driving forcesof a human society.
of your identitywhat would be your answer?
and the failure after notachieving something
dying to achievemany things
Desires make themrun around
But in the very wombof these desires
When the desires are unfulfilledand they shatter
the human heart.No.
It isn't a story of any horrificbattue born of ambitions.
from the womb of desires.I
this journeywhich would teach
of a human being.It would teach you the deeds
Mahabharata.A village in Hastinapur.
Protect your subjects!Hastinapur has been cursed!
a 'yajna'* without a wife.* Sacrificial ritual.
is cursed by the Gods.Who will now save the
Who are you, who has daredto challenge demon Hida?!
Dacoits are warned, Hida!Demons like you must
the realm of the Bharat lineage.People of the Bharat lineage
If that is trueI promise you
wouldn't enter intoeach other's lands.
How dare you enter intoShantanu's kingdom, demon?
Stop!These demons have accepted
attack the land of Bharat.And now
What's the power thatgrants you such audacity?
is not deemed a mandate.Not with words
How will you protectthe demons?
There is no waythey could escape.
And the pathway of river Gangawill become their way.
Who are you?How could Ganga answer
can decline His child's pleas.Greetings, mother.
25 years ago when I was takingour child along with me
capable of becoming your heir.Devarath, my son.
Son, you do not knowI was waiting for you
*Rama with the Axe (parashu). The sixth incarnation of Vishnu.I have fulfilled my promise.
I was the unfortunate oneto break the promise
today you would have beenmy wife
that you had tobreak sometime.
the places that are her shores.Mother.
I will appear before you.Leave. Now you should
Your Highness?King Shantanu
Satyavati, my son hasreturned today.
the form of a woman.After our son Devarath was born
that once our son iscapable enough
Why are you staringat me, Satyavati?
along with you.You are right.
as the king very soon.After that
to spend the rest ofmy life happily with you.
Sure, Your Highness.To love someone makes
is her biggest fortune.I am blessed to have achieved
have no other desires,Your Highness.
Your Highness?I wonder if,
of Hastinapurwhat would the countrymen think?
to the throne?Others are considered
in the palace of Hastinapurit's better I choose
Your Highness, I hadn't lovedyou having any expectations.
Because after becoming your wifemy dignity would be
Your Highness?Here, I am the daughter
I will be a stepmotherto the King of Hastinapur.
the state of a stepmotheris worse than a maid.
They would only be servingthe king of Hastinapur.
even grass is absent.I cannot seize Devarath's rights
Devarath has arrived recently.I had not known about
me the Queen of Hastinapurmy sons were already awarded
be helpless, Your Highness.You should coronate your son
only as the Queen.The greed for a golden fish
This greedwould make your heart bleed.
Father.Aren't you keeping well?
- It's nothing.Subjects!
announce my son, Devarathas the prince of Hastinapur!
King, isn't a queen someonewhose son is entitled
as mere maids.Here, I am the daughter
If a son cannot perceive thesorrow on his father's face
of your anguish?After all...
Everyone says thatDevarath is very powerful.
Everyone says that Devarathis very knowledgeable.
Then...Of what use is then the
until I do not find away to make you happy
No, son.You shouldn't take such an oath.
Your son can fulfil all yourwishes, father.
you so bogged down.I will free you of
to get rid of this agony.I just want to learn to
My father be fraughtwith worries all his life
I will surely find the reasonof your grief
Why have you come here?I have come to you for alms.
He is unhappy and bereavedby staying away from you.
bothering both of youthen what is the cause
after smothering my desiresthen my heart will
The one who isn't at peacecan never make others happy.
But no one can situnder the shade that is cast.
My happiness comes with respect.How would I be
given at Hastinapur?What will be my position?
You will be the Royal Mother.Prince, a Royal Mother is
I'll honour you and bestow uponyou the rights of a mother.
side of the light, Prince.No, Prince.
The ones who are looked atby King Shantanu
by attaining the king's love?No, that will not happen.
but my children would beunfortunate also.
What would be the futureof my children?
They have to accept alowly position in the army
they would be destined to diein the war and nothing else.
For 25 yearsI have dreamed about my
love and blessings.And you...
among two joys.Either to stay with his
in this humble home.Both of the joys together
My father will haveboth the joys
this court has beendrowned in darkness
we will fillyour life with darkness!
brother Yudhishthir!Duryodhan!
Brother Yudhishthir,either kill all of us
Duryodhan!The court of Hastinapur
King Dhritarashtra!Open the eyes of your heart!
Crown Prince Duryodhan!No such thing can happen
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
Can a master not punishhis servants and maids?!
not my servants and maid?!Answer me,
We are your servants and maidbut what kind
A kingdom is conqueredwith might, Duryodhan!
not the correct thing to do?!It is incorrect!
I cannot stay in this courteven a moment longer!
that my sons and Iwill never be abandoned by you.
of my motherthat I will not be
as its servant!Until you are
Your Excellency.Say it,
it has been provedthat you...
in our judicial system.But a maid
present in any judicial system.What's the punishment for taking
were we punished accordingto the judicial system?
our weaponswere snatched from us.
Warrior?Had you been a warrior
but no one calls thema lion because of it!
King of Anga.Do not argue.
Uncle!I am correct,
bring them to your sideso that in the future
and pleads with meonly then will I think
plead with me!And you...
but all of usplead with you
GrandsireI had promised to think about it
cannot be pardoned by me.I cannot!
go onand strip maid Draupadi
Brother Duryodhan,listen to me.
the subjects of the Aryan regionwill revolt against you.
and deemed Panduto be your father now?!
he is bound to give uphis weapons
A warrior beingrobbed of his weapons
The daughter of Drupadis the honour
Honour of the dynasty!What are you saying,
The fruits of the Cannabis plantare fruits as well, Vikarna
How can you call such a womanto be honourable?
with five men!Such women are harlots!
makes absolutely no difference!Dusshasan
please do not commitsuch a misdeed!
Be quiet,guru Drona.
And you as wellsons of Pandu.
is out of your league now.The courage to stop
resides with none of you!What good is righteousness
What good is the truthif it does not incinerate
of the person speaking it?What good is the truth
but the courageof the person speaking it?
An earthen lampdoes provide luminance
blackens the hands as well!And the righteousness
That is why,protecting me
to be protected nowthen the Almighty himself
Wait, Shakuni.Wait!
to Duryodhanat the right time, Shakuni.
Gandhar right now. Shakuni!I'd send my confidante,
That will make Duryodhan happy.Hastinapur's throne
I hope you don't have a problemwith this proposal.
Thentheir uncle
escort Sanjay.He shall talk to Pandavas
would talk to themabout politics.
to Hastinapurwith Pandava's proposal.
a thousand times.He feeds me.
I greet the Pandavasa thousand times.
A warfare wizard.I greet all you citizens.
Greetings!Tomorrow Princess Uttara shall
an festive.Singing and dancing.
There'll be charity.How about we welcome
I've been invited to reciteone such tale.
Why are you screaming?Tell me, Yudhishtir. Which tale
Go aboard.Dhundhumali
that I've heardduring childhood.
it's importance until now.Neither has my son, Abhmanyu's
Yes, people!There's just one such tale
have never understoodhis importance
has not just observed himbut understood him as well.
I never think it's enough.The entire Aryan clan
people get rid of agony.He looks like a common man
but he's a hermit.He looks like a warrior
a philosopher and generousyet he is not proud!
It isn't a story of Lord Shivaor Rama.
of Kailash.Not a tale of land of gold.
A tale about the villageGokul.
He possessed a dark demeanour.Stop!
He gave Yadavas a tough time.He troubled his subjects.
Be it the art deceit,treachery or betrayal!
What's the trouble,brother Kans?
to, Vasudev.Haven't you heard the prophecy
And I shall kill Devki.Comrade, pull Devki
Kans,will you kill Devki
Divine propheciesnever go wrong.
Devak*, Sakroor...*Devaka was Devaki's father, the younger brother of King Ugrasena of Mathura.
Before accusing ustake a good look
You torment your clanall the time.
own father captive.An arrogant man
Who'll make me suffer?Who?
Or him!Remember this!
he shall be beheaded.Kans, don't be foolish.
from Yadava clan.My sister Briha
She's been married toHastinapur's ruler, Pandu.
and Kuntibhoj's armyshall attack you.
I'll be killedby Devki's eighth son
can cause me any harm.You can't harm me too.
They can kill allthe Yadava men right here.
Brother, listen to me.You'll not be harmed.
- Kans, wait!If the prophecy's right
what will killingDevki fetch you.
kill you right away.That would bring a stir
that neither Hastinapur,nor Kuntibhoj
Vasudev!Vasudev!
your child, Devki.If marrying Karna
for the competition!Greetings, King Drupad.
This way, King Karna of Anga.Where are you, Prince Arjun?
Greetings, revered one.Greetings.
To seek alms here?Kampilya is like Lord Kuber's* treasury at the moment
to seek alms?It is just like,
the dry earth.We do not wish to go
Naimisharanya shortly.If you can offer us some alms
What can I give you?I am sitting here with the hope
on your shoulders.Pardon us, revered one
I would be grateful for it.Why would all of you serve me
A cripple has no onein this world.
Pardon us, King of Anga!But you cannot be allowed
will have to demonstratehis competence himself.
When it comes tofighting with a mace
Had this competitioninvolved fighting with a mace
have emergedas the superior one.
archer of the worldis our decision.
Prince DuryodhanI have the right to take part
to Crown Prince Duryodhan.That is why,
that of Crown Prince Duryodhan.This is the prevalent tradition
Please go back to your place.This time,
my dear.What will you do now?
the competence of a person,King Drupad!
ask youwhat you intend to do.
then for the Ashvamedha 'Yajna,'* you could have let the horses*Releasing a horse to roam for a year, and if it wanders into neighbouring provinces hostile to the sacrificer, they must be subjugated.
to worry forhis daughter's future
but also his responsibility.That is why, a 'swayamvar
in a 'swayamvar' an insultis not correct.
Snatching the right totake part in the competition
A tree can be nourishedonly by water.
the proof of your competencecannot be given
prove his competence.Friend Karna
Friend Karna pickup that bow
my dear!A splendid decision!
He has every right to take partin this competition.
by two people, Your Highness.The son of Pandu, Arjun
If marrying Karnais not what Draupadi wants
Stop!I will not marry the
Take the cavalry and fortifythe entrance gates.
top of the gateswith fire arrows.
And the cavalry, outsidethe fort, behind the hillock.
are endless in numbers.Their heavy marching is
the soldiers too, your majesty.They seem to have prepared
I couldn't see their banner,your majesty.
It's a chariot of white horseslike that of the
the blazing Sun-God himself.He had an ornate armour
pillars of iron.Eyes, intense as two fireballs.
Your highness, this warrior isnone else but the very son
Bheeshma.Mother, what is happening
Hastinapur has attacked.What shall happen now,
before Hastinapur's forces.Streams of blood shall flow.
your highness.But Gandhar hasn't waged war
Demolishing defeated cities,burning the homeless.
What all the other womendo during battle.
And then..Sister-in-law.
battle alongside father.Gandhari!
as much as darkness does.Sister-in-law, the great
in the battlefield.Fear always roots itself
of losing wealth.Sometimes, the fear
separated from your loved ones.Hence
Have you ever thought?Is it that the situation
of grief?No.
in fact tellsthat being scared does not
of the grief to come.It has no relationship
fear is nothing but imaginationis it difficult to be free from
The white banner of surrenderor the red banner of war!
The army has stoppedmarching, your majesty.
of friendship, your majesty.Open the gates of the fort.
Must be, to flaunt his powerbefore us.
to cause insult to Hastinapur.Hastinapur's throne has been
Emperor Vichitraviryathe kingdom has no king
flaunt power before an ally?Your majesty, Power is flaunted
demands to make.What could a veteran such as
king Subal.Your heroic deeds aren't lesser
But I'm not a king. l'm justa royal servant of Hastinapur.
Although you maynot be a king
Calibre comes into pictureonly during a siege.
To strengthen our friendship.And to play host
Gandhar, son of Ganges.All hail Bheeshma,
the son of Ganges.All hail Bheeshma,
Sister-in-law, Bheeshmahas arrived only to befriend us.
his intentions of warbehind the facade
never lies, princess.I've heard there is none
and composed.Let's see for ourselves.
or is it all just tall tales.- I can't help but wonder
overwhelmed.I hope you have imbued
and daughter-in law tooSon of ganges, What could our
Kuru empire?A future.
Your majesty, you are aware thatno king has attacked you so far.
If the subjects of theKuru empire and Gandhar unite
Gandhar is a mere servantto Hastinapur, son of Ganges.
princess Gandhari.I put forth a wedding proposal
But haven't you sworn yourselfto celibacy, son of ganges?
Not myself.I consider Gandhari to
to this.Who can be a better groom
and prowess are known to all.Dhritarashtra.
crop into the picture?He is the younger son.
Your majesty.I am talking about
A hundred sons can be borneeven by a sculptor's wife.
But, not an entire kingdom.The number of offsprings
is the clan whose virtues andupbringing they imbibe within.
bear a hundred sonsof the Kuru dynasty.
princess in the world.She is well versed
in combat too.But prince Dhritarashtra
is capable in every aspect.And there's no denying it.
many elephants at once.Being crowned as Dhritarashtra's
woman of the Arya race.Where are you off to, princess?
Let her go, Sugdha.lt's expected of her
There's no kingdomin the entire world
I too have heard great talesabout Hastinapur, princess.
That means, flaunting your poweryou are here for a gain.
family of Gandharinto our family,
there is no question of gain.There's only co-operation.
Instead, Gandhar can only gainfrom Hastinapur.
Even our Gandhar isn'tso weak either.
Oh!So our princess is already
In my opinion, the marriageof princess Gandhari
Resolutions and options aregames a mind plays, king Subal.
Only after clearing all yourdoubts should you
So, what have you decided,your majesty?
The subjects of the Kuru empireconsider their princes as Gods
Sister-in-law,what is his name?
Anyway, a wife never uttersher husband's name.
His name is Dhritarashtra.Prince Dhritarashtra.
are you going to put at stake?Impossible!
you can only wager property.You cannot put humans at stake.
Prime Minister.He has himself said
And one always putshis pride at stake
many things, prince.Knowledge acquired.
And one's lineage.But these cannot be
right over it, grandsire.Father, mother, teacher and heir
Anything that you havea right on and you are proud of
This is a pointlessdiscussion, Duryodhan.
but I haven't heard of anyonehaving a right on his siblings.
King Pandu's authorityand you also accept
has the right on hisyounger brother Vikarna
So, Prince Duryodhan,can put his brother Vikarna
he can abide by the rules.So tell me,
- Nakulnot you.
What happened?Hastinapur's Prince has put
meant to be put at stake?Demons and serpents perform
Is Hastinapur too inculcatingthis tradition, Your Highness?
this game of dice.But King Shaka has
immediately.Kunti
then there must bean ethical dilemma involved.
I will resolve this.Maid
are connected to its stemnot to each other.
Go right away and tell him.- As you command, Your Highness.
Brother, it will be appropriatefor you to put me at stake.
and the strength ofbrother Bheem will be with you.
but I won't be ableto get them released.
If you are defeatedthen serving me as a slave
toiling as a slave.Pick up your weapon, Dushasana!
surrendered to you, for waris unrighteousness, son.
I will put my...I'll put my younger brother
but I have no rights over him.I don't have any rights over
like the petals of hibiscusbut through the medium
That's why...This game is over now.
Emperor...Empress came much
got married to her.Were you not brothers
any relationship?Prince Nakul, answer me.
did you give that rightto your wife?
seeing a hibiscus flowerquits the game
And unrighteousness, as well.I put my younger brother Nakul
You just needfour points to reach the fort.
You lost your younger brotherNakul.
lies at the master's feet.Nakul
these slaves.Come here!
Prince Arjun's concern, Emperor!It is only mine.
Slave Nakul, come here!Come and sit among these slaves.
When one's prideis wounded
this imperious woman's face.Your Highness
at Hastinapur'sroyal court?
I am the prestigeof the Kuru dynasty.
Your Highness.And I am being brought here
Grandsireyou're the most glorious one
How can you remain silenton seeing this kind of behaviour
Guru Dronayou're a father figure to me.
Your Highnessyour sons are defiling
Why don't you stop them?A maid
Maid?Am I a maid?
been answered by Yudhisthira.By losing himself in the game
Then how could he putme at stake?
Ask your husband!Slave Yudhisthira
The rights with whichyou put your brothers at stake
Yes, Draupadi.Family members have a right
a mere family member!Wife is the better half.
feels sad.But it's only his wife
share the same relationshipas two pearls woven together
such rights on methat you have
Don't be silent!Minister Vidura
of the brotheris accepted.
on her husband's property.The kingdom's law
as soon as she's married.So, tell me, Minister.
I too had a right on it.Then, why didn't he take
- Maid Draupadiwhen all of you came to
to lose all the property.Now, stop rambling
since I didn't bind my husbandswith any restrictions
Was that a crime?Answer me, Pandavas!
Had Yudhisthira takenyour permission
Did all of yougive the permission?
Answer!You had taken the seven vows
you had vowedto protect me.
For the sakeof your family's happiness...
I have convertedmy whole life into a penance.
such a disgusting reward?Why?
Wenever go against our
give in to Duryodhan's orders.Forgive us.
has abided byrighteousness.
in this manner?Everybody did think about
about my honourMy right
maid Draupadiwhich makes these warriors
and establish a relationshipwith me.
with me.It will give me happiness
Come, maid Draupadibe seated on my lap.
I will give you a death,looking at which
I will break your thighsand take your life!
to the food I have.So that it keeps reminding me
An earthworm!Don't ramble.
of your master.Foolish Duryodhan!
And fire cannever be bound by anything.
because that is notacceptable to me.
in your court, a maidis leaving
Wait, Draupadi!Obey your master's orders.
For the sake of peacewe have tolerated
Your Highness.Let her go.
will be compelled to break.It was decided to keep
gain prominence.Has it not been proved
has the rights on Draupadi?It was, Your Highness, but...
If I give credibility to amaid dishonouring her master
Lord Ram had asked Lady Sitato take up an ordeal.
to obeyall of Duryodhan's orders.
to come back.Independence lies
that one can snatch.You're so arrogant,
your master's orders!Independence cannot
Duryodhan!Stay in your limits!
in darknesssimilarly
with darkness!We will fill it
pour forth the rainsand cleanse themselves.
by leaving the dirt asideas it flows.
Atonementis greater than justice
in whichanything else in life
but I become frail thinkingof Hastinapur's future.
No, grandsire.If one builds his house
into the ditch.If I live amidst this leisure
and get caught in theworldly pleasures.
When after 25 yearsof struggle
who is invariablyincapable?
I know there isn't anyonemore capable than you.
as to what kindof a king was I.
This question of his ishaunting me, grandsire.
stating that he'sincomplete.
have I established?I supplicate before you
Let me fulfil my punishmentand improve my karma.
is important for a human being,Your Highness.
is a good deed.- Stop rambling, Shakuni.
I am not rambling.If I was in the place of
done the same.I would have taken
life doing penance.And I would have
go live in the forest.He is my brother.
makes me shiver.Difficult!
generous, Your Highness.You're generous.
She is very lucky.Just like how
cannot hold on.In the same manner
temptationgreed
Why are you changingthe topic, Shakuni?
dethroned you...The one who
had you humiliated...But yet towards
within you.You instead of
are worried about thepain of your
You are great.Brother Shakuni!
should be used asa medication
But to use those wordsto trigger the pain
Wonderful!After marriage,
advice to her brotheris what I had always heard.
divide my family.I'm not trying to divide,
May Lord Yama claimmy life, if I'm doing so.
You have blindfolded yourself.Your marital commitment
to inform His Highness aboutthe ditches in the path
Brother Shakuni...- Hear me out!
as to what's rightand what's wrong.
shall see your sonas the king.
might be having.So when the time comes
abdicate his authority?Will he do a deed
No.Had he such greatness
of his own willis abdicating
mere humansto disrupt the plot of destiny?
by His Highness.Good bye, Your Highness.
decision of going to exile.Remain silent
What's the situation indeed forus to accept a life in exile?
This is not the punishment ofthe sin, Madri
to get the deer skinI should have given that
and I accept that.Punish me for that
No, Madri. It's not your fault.Asking something to a husband
His Highness'?The attempt of trying to fulfil
I understand.All too well.
and not me.I promise you.
Try to accept that the mistakehas been made. - I do accept.
to be borne by our sonswho have not yet come
I am a princess.That my progeny would
taught since I was a mere child.So I have the right to ponder
it's not rightbut competence that has
competencyand not mine, sister? - You both
I curse youif you ever try to establish
with her then you shall die.This is the reason
You both will stay herein the palace.
to be like a forestbut if the husband is beside one
I still can't understandthe meaning of your decision
and sister is going with youthen I too shall come with you.
then I share the same fate too.I have come to Hastinapur
in your destiny.The crime was done by
we are inand thus will be the atonement
Sorrow, anguish, planningand projection...
Do you see that boat?Even the intense flow
But even if a small holeappears in this very boat
now gapes at uswhilst being in
then Hastinapurwill again become weak.
subjects will talk about it.The rumours will be spread.
And the kingdom where thesubjects are upset and disturbed
I willnot let the throne
as the king.But it's against
not be coronated.He will be a de facto king.
In the future, any childbeing born in the Kuru lineage
Dhritarashtra accede to this?Your Highness!
Your Highness!Your Highness!
Your Highness, forgive me.I have made a big mistake,
Your Highness!Your Highness
offered up just as almswon't be acceptable
I don't acceptanything in charity.
Now I have startedto understand you
The king of Panchal may notbelong to the Bharat lineage
rambling about, Shakuni?I can get you beheaded
sister's womb.He can't be coronated
your own kingdomas a charity.
King Pandu can't have children,Your Highness.
that sage Kindam hascursed your brother.
Your Highness.If you are considering
Attention!His Excellency Bhishma
May you have a long life.Greetings, grandsire.
after Pandu's exilethe throne of Hastinapur
Dear, the council of ministershas decided
the de facto king.For the sake of
this responsibilityDhritarashtra.
at such a desolate place?You will know
Catch them all.Shukra.
So you've brought newsfrom the capital.
Dhritarashtra!Dhritarashtra!
had been to lay siegeon Vidarbha.
Have the Kuru's everattacked anyone?
Greetings, grandfather. - Mayyou live long, Dhritarashtra.
Greetings, grandfather.- Pandu.
my prodigal son?A blessing for a long life
to choose your death at will.A mother always
full of fruit laden treesAnd a derelict throne,
ill fate, Bheeshma.The one who bears the duty
I'd sent you to find the pathto our happiness, Bheeshma.
They couldn't come along.King Subal pleaded with me,
pomp and splendour.He shall bring his entire family
the eve of 'AkshaytritiyaBesides, after so many years
Even we shall have to inviteKings from other kingdoms.
preparations for the weddingof your eldest son,
king Subal arrives herehave a token of ornaments and
mother-in-law.I'm feeling very glad today,
Bheeshma.Now the throne of Hastinapur
father, shall be fulfilled now.Gandhari's hundred sons
Pandu. Convey the good news tothe royal teacher Kripacharya.
On the eve of 'Akshaytritiyaprince Dhritarashtra's wedding
Soon thereafterDhritarashtra
Hastinapur.Long live the king!
- Greetings, elder brother.Do you know how many steps
from where you're standing?No, brother.
four, five.I have measured the distance
within this room.Six, seven, eight..
Because right since birth, I hadbeen heading to this throne.
is wedding.Then I shall be seated there,
shall come true, Pandu.And then, she shall sit there
A token of ornaments and drapeshave arrived from Hastinapur
such beautiful ornaments.Yes, they're very beautiful
of the queen of Hastinapur.When you shall wear this and sit
princess.I'm a royal princess.
with ruling, princess.Then how shall you rule?
affection comes in handy.With my devout affection
Right now, l'm not concerned forHastinapur's subjects.
Winning the subjects' heartis easier, princess.
especially whenhe's a king himself
to choose me.I shall get him so spell bound
shall only look at me.Then through her eyes,
is quiethe says a lot through the
and read the expressionson the faces of the courtiers.
Anyway, you do not trustyour younger brother.
I trust you completely.But, you shall not be
as the commander-in-chief.And sometimes, you shall
stay with me always, brother.Incessantly.
A wife heeds her husbandin transactional matters.
And shows him the pathto redemption.
in transactional matters.That is the foundation
That's all.There is no need
of my wife is just thatshe shall fulfill this
There shall be nothingmore precious than me
The way father consults motherregarding every matter
We shall teach our sons aboutgood values and happiness.
He shall hold my handand walk ahead.
As the eldest brother andhis beloved wife
The foundation of all humanrelationships
life with joy and prosperity.A wife, who is always
and obey.Human being.
who meets his expectations.But expectations are destined
Because expectationsoriginate from the human mind.
In spite of all intentionsto fulfill them
And that is the rootof conflict.
If humans stop buildingtheir relationships
solely for what they arewon't this life be full of
Shukra.Look, Sugdha. We just spoke
a message.So many fireflies?
so much of trouble for me.Just so that my chamber
have surely arrived.Shakuni. Son, we were
mother?Son, control your anger.
And Bheeshma himselfwas supervising them.
Son, your father shallexplain the situation.
Shakuni. A king cannot ignorehis royal obligations.
She's a daughter who gave youso much of love and respect.
It's only yourroyal obligation.
where you need to sacrificethe royal family?
with the aid ofHastinapur?
Answer me.I love my daughter Gandhari
decision with a heavy heart.Because emotions
think about the circumstances.Tomorrow you shall be
you cannot be blindto Gandhar's future.
one must use deception.I shall attack the kingdom
shall be reduced to a rubble.I do not respect
my beloved sister's future.Even if I have to do the
I'm willing to do it.I will gladly accept hell.
worshipping him for once?Abhimanyu, my lad.
the veneration for Lord Indra.But he was being venerated
venerating Lord Indra, lad.Everyone was just venerating
obvious, uncle?No, lad.
You better knowthe consequences of fear.
That is where evil is born.Ought to fear, a human mind
He loses his ability to think.The mind or the soul
is filled with bitterness.His entire life is filled
drifts away from the almighty.[MUSIC]
Prativindh, my lad.No power is so great
that it need not be defeated.Because a minor injustice
Indra's arrogancewhat did Lord Krishna do?
The glorious tales ofLord Krishna are endless.
No, dear clown.After tempting one with food
you cannot deprive onefrom food.
the Lord of Mathura.[MUSIC]
Darkness encroached into Mathuraand nested within Kansa's mind.
Fear gripped his mindand arrogance corrupted him.
Vasudev!Is the head of Gokul's Yadavas
Kansa?His son has lifted
Who is he?Are you suspicious,
But the eight childmy womb bore was a girl.
Your womb had borne an illusionin order to deceive me!
home to safety.No, elder brother!
Yet you did not understand.Firstly, let me tell you
in the seventh monthwas transferred by the Gods
His name is Sankarshan.**Meaning a spirit transferred between two wombs.
[ECHOING][MUSIC]
the serpent Kaliaand has lifted Mt. Govardhan
blinded by arrogance.He shall kill our son!
to kill your sonit would have happened
couldn't defeat him.So how can the King of Mathura
A fool!I shall soon compel
and fetch both those ladsto Mathura.
My death?My death, Akroor?
I shall be protectedby these two.
to Mathura.No, revered Nanda!
Gods dwell within idols.But even the temple yard
is holy.The ones to liberate Yadavas
were raised on this holy land.Son, the king of Mathura,
I am ready, sire.Last night father Nanda
and try to attack you.If the moon hides
If a deer hides behind a bush,does a lion not devour it?
I won't let it be in vain.If I have your permission
Now, in Mathura pleasewatch over him.
I needn't protect him.For the sacrifices you have
forever be in your debt.[MUSIC]
and leave from here?Brindavan shall wither away
- No, mother!My soul dwells within your body.
If the soul leaves your bodyI shall die instead, mother.
My life's sole purposeis to think of
is just the beginning.The end...
I have to wander thisway incessantly for years.
Son.Will you never ever return?
of Brindavan hereas I leave this place.
isn't the one you think he is,mother.
she undergoes a lot of change.She not just purifies earth
She cannot return to Heaven,mother.
known as Devaki's son?Mother Devaki gave me birth.
But I am fully confidentwhen I meet mother Devaki
as the son of Yashoda.And whoever shall know me
of duty and sacrifice.Mother, bless me.
before I leave?Please feed me, mother!
Your majesty. Please removethe blindfold at least for once
his sons, Sugadha.And they shall look as good in
Gandhari! Dear sister.Have all your sons taken birth?
to be born.That shall happen too.
that are important.Brother!
Your daughter is significantonly to you.
Possibility' is another namefor the cycle of creation.
a race to the throneand a race between two chariots,
that victory comes easy.But capability...
is always beneficial,your majesty.
Faster!Faster, faster...
Be quick, charioteer.Is he...
How did that armour andearrings appear on him?
upon all its leaves being shedthat is how our
bereft of glory.Today, only one youth impressed
Sushen's son, Karna.My boy...
has truly pleased me, Karna.I have immense faith
and perform a victory marchon these very grounds.
charioteer Sushen's son, Karnashall be granted a reward of
skills in chariot riding.Karna.
His majesty has protected you,charioteer.
your social status ever.If the root which is bound to
it withers away.Looking at your son's skills
sadness and wonder, Sushen.**Adhiratha and Radha named Karna, Vasusena also known as Radheya (the son of Radha).
shall not forgive him.The 'Kshatriya' soldiers and
*A class of clarified butter.the pot itself absorbs it.
Skills beyond one's statusare of no use.
your majestyto give up his fondness
But I...I assure you, your majesty
No, Sushen.Archery skills are ingrained
You son's archery skills shallsurely surface as well.
respect him for his skills.It will punish him instead.
lay down his bow.In the eastern regions,
are allowed to pick up arms.Tell your son that if he wishes
in Magadha.He must let go of his parents
It is a tradition here, in theKuru' and 'Panchal' regions
And it is true that traditionsmaintain religion.
Think about it.The truth is that as there is
the traditions.There is a sculpture
itself.To bring out the sculpture,
need to be chiselled off.Similarly
If the tradition of Indra'sveneration hadn't been broken
*The day Krishna defeated Indra.the Yadavas wouldn't have found
tradition unchangedshall be deprived of religion.
arising out of knowledge?And without such a wisdom,
a true religion at all.Think about it.
No! Forgive me, prince!Run!
No, prince.Please do not take away
a weapon, Dushasan.**Tough ruler/punisher.
Prince Dushasan,a fisherman's boy
to dispense justice.Step forward, lad.
my fish.I did not lift my sickle.
raising a weaponagainst a prince
Yes, my prince.After all, we fishermen are
from our clan.Please, don't be so harsh.
has no father as well.Bring the boy forward.
Forgive us, prince.Forgive us.
Duryodhan..Dushasan.
insulted us.They have raised their weapons
Soldiers, arrest them all.Duryodhan.
mould myself to become the king.But when I try to do justice,
back there.Does anyone start a war, within
who are powerful.Those who have nothing,
Angry and dissatisfied subjectscan knock a king off his throne.
So do the subjects have a rightto insult a prince?
be diplomatic?You mustn't let arise
insult in the first place.Now, if that old hag
throughout the kingdomthat Duryodhan
Whom do you mean by old hag?That fisherwoman.
the fishermen punished.Uncle!
foolishness.Kripi
Let's go.Drupad
and I was standing right herein this spot.
on your throne.Long live, Your Majesty!
- My friend?It is me, friend.
Seminary', -kula refers to the teacher's domain, comprised of the teacher's home and school, where students are embraced as part of the family.Drona.
this person inotherwise he will allow
A relationship like friendshipcannot be weighed
And my friend Drupadremembers every moment
What are you ramblingon about, Brahmin?
Friendwhat kind of a question is that?
I knowyou were a fellow student
Friend Drupad,you had befriended me.
and I had saved your life byshooting a lion with an arrow?
Try to remember, Drupad.Try to remember that day.
by umeashing your arrogancein the royal court.
That does notmake them my friends!
rajak' grow together.That does not make 'rajak
to be my friend forever.You said, we'd have the right
to each other's lives.And that we'll divide
you forgot everything, Drupad.It wasn't like I asked you
was two cows from you.That's it.
I don't want charity!The son of Bharadwaj
for it is my right.Your love
Insult?Drupad
During the examinations,you'd wait for me outside my hut
Did my friendship not seeminsulting to you then?
from a student in a 'gurukuldoes not establish a friendship
anything special?Regardless,
It was my intellect thatabsorbed all the knowledge!
it is a more grave crimethan murder itself.
because He had promisedto illuminate the earth
And today...Today, the throne that inflates
I will have you removedfrom that throne.
Then hear me!When I come to take over
by drawing any weapon.I will train my disciples
I will train my discipleswho will make you
fulfilled my promise, Drupad.Arjun
will assist Ashwatthamato the throne.
bathed him in milk, Drupad.Yudhishthir,
It has been establishedthat among the Kuru Princes
Arjunyour valour will immortalise you
may return to Hastinapur.Me and my son Ashwatthama
his kingdom's governance.May you live long.
I return half the kingdomconquered to you.
of Panchal in peace.Besides, you have no son.
Go to the city of Kampilyaand rule half the kingdom
And forget everythingand become my friend
Hastinapur.Where did Duryodhan
long back, brother.Maybe they lack the courage
on an empty stomach?That too on a horse.
He can go without sleepfor a month.
Yes, I know.People have conquered kingdoms
Nakul, we shouldrest for a while.
in a battle makes one so hungryI would...
a battle every day.One doesn't feel hungry
between sleeping and waking upthe greater is
Even I know a personwho is the same, irrespective
Bheemquit talking about Duryodhan
trying to calm himwith soothing words
Duryodhan will ever be at peace?Will he ever accept his defeat?
No one can havesuch a weak heart
You've forgotten your brothersand stayed for so long
become your in-laws' place.Brother!
Food tastes bland without you.So, tell me.
I was terrorizedby that demon Kalyavan.
When you are worried,you should meditate, Subhadra.
protector is Arjunone need not worry at all.
Look, Kalyavanis approaching us!
There is not a moment whendeath doesn't approach a person.
one must find time totalk to one's loved ones.
I hope, she is well.My heart yearns
to seek her blessingsthen draw your weapon, Vasudev!
He can be slain only bythe fire of a sage's wrath.
Stop, Krishna! Why are youfleeing like a coward?
Shepherd, stop!Stop and face your death!
The future generationswill call you Ranchhod* and laugh at you!
The future generationswill refer to me by the name
I am grateful to you.Now, quit talking and attack.
is a courageous person.Then why is he running away
brother Krishna, Prince Arjun.He must certainly have
have only one planto defeat the enemy.
Kalyavan.Hey!
Where are you hiding?Krishna!
Where are you hiding?Krishna!
Wake up, coward!Wake up!
the stories of your valour.Who was that
Nothing happens in this worldwithout a reason, great sage.
was his destiny.And in order to
had motivated youto leave your kingdom
Are you happy now, Arjun?Greetings, Vasudev.
because you havea place in my heart.
indeed had a plan.How did you achieve this,
Arjun, do you knowabout King Mandhata
all his lifeand had conquered
in order to rest.Yes, Arjun.
worldliness is labourand meditation
worldliness to be happinessand keep tiring themselves
For yearsgreat sage Muchukund has been
his eyes after all this whilethe first person he would
Kalyavan was destinedto die this way.
That's it.Arjun
about so many things.I have heard so much
from Hastinapur saidthat you had constructed
of your help, Vasudev.The stones that you gifted me
as to who the real Drupad was.The one who didn't
You discovered such deep meaningfrom those stones?
why you sent me those stones?- Not at all.
I liked them and hence,I sent them as a gift.
because what he does and whathe says never mean the same.
and the situation he is inhelps him understand things.
cries.The true meaning
only by an intelligent person.No wonder people
North-West, North,North-East, East.
I have not establishedthis kingdom.
I have merely usedmy intelligence
that you haveestablished Dwaraka.
I am not lying, Arjun.The truth is, I
Won't you cometo the city with us?
Subhadra, I'll be there.You should take Arjun
need to leave to executean exceedingly important task.
a great deal by accompanying me.Just give me the order.
difficult for you.The truth is, this task will be
I am life and I am God!I am prime alphabet!
I am the consciousness in animals! Iam "Kubers ( the Lord of Wealth, the god-king of the semi-divine Yakshas)" among the "Yakshas (benevolent nature-spirits)"!
I am "Summeru (a sacred mountain with five peaks, the center of all universes)" among mountains! AndI am "Brighu (one of the seven great sages)" among saints!
I am the holy "Peepul (Ficus religiosa, sacred fig)" amoong trees!I am the memory of intelligence!
I am glow!I am "Chitrarath (king of gandharvas)" among "Gandharvas (distinct heavenly beings)"!
I am "Uccheshawa" among horses! I am"Airavat (a mythological white elephant who carries the Hindu god Indra)" among elephants!
King among humansand the "Vajra (diamond)" among armours!
I am "Sheshnag (a mythical snake with 5 heads)"! I am "Yamraj (lord of death)"!I am the Rain God and the Wind God
and "Bramha', effect, victory,nutrient
silenceand "Tattva ('thatness', 'principle', 'reality' or 'truth')" knowledge as well.
I stand here as the death of allhumans present here!
Therefore overcome your desireand comprehend your duties!
commence the battle!Engage in battle, Arjun!
*Slayer Of Demon Madhu.Today, all my doubts have been
this knowledge.I indeed feel so!
resiliencehas raised his "Gandiva" bow Your
"Kurukshetra", Sanjay?Continue describing everything to me
its first day of formation.The five Pandavas, are heading east
Pandavas are upon their chariots, Your Majesty!Because they have smaller army 
by which they can penetrate into ourformation
What could be such a formation,Sanjay.
The biggest strength of commanders-in-chief
and to control which is equallydifficult!
The "Vajra" formation!The Pandavas have assumed the
their attack!Soldiers!
Is that weapon in your hand calledas "delusionist" too?
This weapon is called "your death".Grandsire, I hope you remember your
your power.You must destroy their entire army
Duryodhan.But as long as the Pandavas are
Let them get over with theirwreckage.
At your command.Madhav.
army's formation, My King.All five brothers
They shall soon be facing PrinceDuryodhan!
counter attack for protecting my sons, Sanjay?Grandsire Bhishma!
If we do not counter themthey shall soon reach my dear lad
formation to counter them?A crocodile always keeps it's mouth
mouth with confidence!I was awaiting Grandsire's blessings!
we cannot reach Yudishtir!Now, it is time to separate the
The Serpent King Takshakgot defeated
of the city took place!Very soon, they shall perform
Were a success,my darlings!
may have been defeatedbut the victory is ours.
the Rajsuya 'Yajnais finally in our hands,
But unclehow will we stop them?
in the Aryan region.The Yadavas of Dwaraka
The strength of the Pandavasare the Yadavas
Ifthe Yadavas
will never be able to conductthe Rajsuya 'Yajna.
The Pandavaswill never be an ally
we have got the newsthat Arjun and
Uh!And the Serpent King
married to him.In other words,
the King of Manipurand the Serpent King Kauravya
The key element hereare the Yadavas.
They will.The leader of the Yadavas
never disobeyshis elder brother Balaram.
and form an ally with him.Very soon
You must becomeBalaram's disciple.
and become a darling of his.You will be married
In the meantimeArjun will be engrossed
of the Aryan regionand wandering about aimlessly!
but with thatof one's heart, friend.
my heart down, Govind?My Lord is travelling
domestic help nor security.He is not wearing anything
who will take care of his needs?And I cannot stop thinking
form of love, friend.You are worried for Arjun
I feel as though I am...I am being unjust
to my oath, Govind.This is a dreadful situation.
to get the Gandiva Bow.Then Arjun would not have to...
had to leave the city.How would I have been
- No!Staying away from any of my
Staying away fromyour loved ones.
The first deals with distanceand the other with...
Love .In other words
by physical proximitybut by the depth of one's love.
You are not beingunjust to anyone.
You must be patient.When you receive news
that time does not takethe path made by man.
This is called fate.So, will My Lord meet
and understand his nature.The nature of a man
his future to an extent.I do not know if danger
that even in dangerhe will see an opportunity.
You must learnto be patient, friend.
that no matter where any of yourfamily members is travelling
Only still waters canreflect an image, friend.
where Lord Shiva had freedChandra Dev from his curse.
while we deemLord Somnath our Deity.
take place methodicallyand ritualistically.
The veneration of Lord Shivawill be conducted first by you.
High up in the skyin the region of Garuda*
And I had been namedby my revered father
in other wordsa vulture.
Why can you not,King of Gandhar?
the idea of forming an alliancebetween the Kurus and Yadavas
a vulture can now venturein the region of Garuda
will you not pay your respectsto the sages present here?
to Lord Shiva's devoteesmakes Lord Shiva happier.
This is the only manwho spoils all our plans.
though he expressedhis happiness
some planotherwise at such critical time
What game this man is playingis completely beyond me.
Why are you so worriedfor Arjun's presence over here,
my wedding.If he abducts Subhadra
And Arjunwill never raise arms
without knitting the cobweb.Krishna's act without planning...
a very dangerous mind.All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
of this day?Until now, my life was filled
But henceforth, I shall havethe light of the day
And when it comesto fulfilling your dreams
Greetings, father.Bless you, son!
will be fulfilled, son.The blind can only see dreams
I am very happy todayand I feel as though I can see.
Go on.Greetings, grandsire.
and not the worldare called blind.
I have firm faith that you tooshall be blessed with vision.
Greetings, mother.Greetings, brother.
when old clothes are adornedwith new embroidery
That adds beauty to old clothes.You must glorify the memories
People will forgetmy elder brother
All hail Crown Prince Duryodhan!All hail Crown Prince Duryodhan!
It is in the best interestof His Highness
the 'swayamvar' ofthe Princess of Panchal
is awaiting none but you,my darling!
You must be tired from liftingmy weight all this while.
indeed gets tired.You need not worry, mother.
to listen to me.We too must get the opportunity
We shall come across a villageor hermitage on this path soon.
Oh, Lord!May you live long.
Do not take your anger outon all the serpents.
awaiting for a while.Go on.
this forest for three days now.What is your name?
Names are not the only modeto get to know people, Bheem.
I had heard that only youcan ask such questions.
Call them here as well.My disciples have arranged
and leave at dawn.The great sage Vedvyas!
May you live long.Be seated. Lifting the palanquin
that the world deems us dead.My Lord
Man has the delusionthat he takes all decisions
his vision with emotionscannot take a decision
those decisionsare taken by fate.
get your answersin Kampilya,
while proceeding towardsNaimisharanya
Kampilya?Draupadi
every King and Princeof the Aryan region
have come here with theintention of marrying you.
that your marriage holdsgreat political value.
But what is my valuein this marriage?
I feel restless, sister.Despite being served
Will the Princewho wins the competition
I will certainly have107 questions before me
to my questions?Princess...
at what I have brought for you.What is that, Malini?
The city of King DrupadKampilya, lies
Greetings.Greetings.
in every cornerof the Aryan region
to the 'swayamvarso that he comes to the event
And what do you want, Govind?She had stripped us
before the entire court.Empress Draupadi
disrobed by me, uncle!Only then will
within me, uncle!Splendid, my darling!
has no dignity and this truthwill be revealed
The Great Guru Dronais making his entrance.
He has come here to seethe glory and respect
he will get to see somethingwhich has not been
May His Highness have happiness!No, Guru.
A river always flows downwardsfrom its source after all.
cloud your thoughtsand this makes me
that the virtuesof a successful person
but increase it instead.The envy people had
However, the envypeople have towards you
this game of diceis going to be
I am certain that none of youwill resort to unrighteousness
If you see somethingunrighteous happening
then they mightdraw their weapons.
Butthe General of Hastinapur
we will require his permission.Grandsire is subservient
If the Pandavasdo draw their weapons
His Excellency!Listen to me very carefully.
You are awarethat I am a servant
Hastinapur haswillingly accepted the reign of
I am also a servantto the supreme
meets with improper behaviouror is made to face injustice
in order to protect him.I hope
But I am conductingthis ceremony
I had misbehavedwith Empress Draupadi
All I have in my heartfor the Pandavas
That is in the bestinterest of everyone.
my darling.For some reason or the other
about righteousnessbut
May His Highness have happiness!With the permission
to say something.Certainly.
which have unclear rulestend to be bad in general terms.
Your Highnessthat is why,
need to be clarified.Tell me,
one needs to have deep knowledgeof righteousness.
And righteousness,fair-mindedness and experience
His ExcellencyI request you
so that when the game beginsyou have
of His Highness?Certainly.
would be best.Pardon me,
does not honourthe labour and competence
wise people say that somethingorchestrated by the Almighty
Fortune is not somethingthat is unrighteous!
Come up with such rules,grandsire
are again women.That is why,
will be present in the court.How is this correct,
have been madeto honour the Empress after all.
Then this game of dice shallnot be played, Crown Prince.
would appreciate musicmore than a game of dice.
Her Highness has madearrangements for the Empress
Besides, my darling!Apart from their husbands
with anyone else!Your Excellency,
the Emperor would requiresome light meal during the game
to enter the court.This is what I request of you.
maids will have permissionto enter the court.
that both the playersin each of the turns
That sounds fair, grandsire.The third rule will be
those objects or itemsto which
to the entire Aryan region,grandsire.
- In time.And when it is time
But at the momentyou can only bet
But grandsirebecause of this rule,
The game will be overin just a few turns, grandsire.
Crown Prince?Do you not want
Stop the game.Stop the game.
Do you have some sort of a plan,brother Duryodhan
It is our planto please the Emperor
is an obstruction here.Your Highness
Certainly.Your Highness
or the game of diceto a competent person,
For wealth or for an empire?No, King of Gandhar.
and praise from the world.The Emperor is correct.
When man wins, there isan appreciation in his pride
The true property of manis his pride.
You are correct,King of Gandhar.
Your Highnessboth the players
a right, Your Excellency.And along with the right to it,
can be bet in the game.And out of the two players
which he can take pride inthe game will be
what exactly doesbrother Duryodhan possess
We are aware of no such thing.But we are well aware
The Emperor possessesthe entire Aryan region
can have possessionof even a handful of land
Do you approve of these rules?I approve of them.
And why doesunrighteousness win?
is not being defeated.It is merely the impact
in its nature.Uncle
has been lowered!The fear in my heart
No, my darling!No!
it does not imply that yourfear is going away as well.
only then doesthe fear in your heart
spies will follow the Pandavasat my order.
the fear in your heartis alive as well.
And despite losing something,the person
Times will change,Subhadra.
and the flag of righteousnesswill fly once again.
but the beginning of the journeyof victory of the Pandavas.
lead them to victory.A few days later.
Let me go bring some water.There must indeed
not back yet?Let me go check.
Nakul!Brother Nakul!
Brother Nakul!- Nakul!
Brother Nakul...Brother Nakul!
brother Nakul is not breathing.Get up,
Sahadev!Sahadev!
must have befallen them.Let me go check.
go together, My Lord.No, Panchali.
You must stay here.Brother Bheem!
Sahadev!Brother Bheem!
the symptoms of being poisoned.My brothers
I knowthat you can hear me.
my brothers back to lifeotherwise I shall
warn you--No matter who you are...
eunuch, ghoulan illusory being or ogre...
Panchali, had itbeen a human being
I must go.I hope you will be able to use
My Lord.No, Panchali.
If a trouble befallsthe five of you, My Lord
Panchaliin the torch of justice
Before justicereigns supreme again
If none of us brothersreturn alive
the path ahead.Bheem...
Nakul...Nakul!
Arjun...Arjun!
to have killed my brothersfor no reason?
fighting with and whyI will not take to arms.
unintentionally.Please show yourself.
No human being has the rightto take water from this pool!
from this poolthough he had no right!
Son of Panduyour brothers
That is why,I taught the four of them
by slaying them.Neither did you
water can be taken.Then how can you have the right
King of the Yakshas.Then how could you
dictate thatmy brothers must be
it is not possible for meto live any longer, Yaksha King.
That is why,I will use my intelligence
Ask the questions,King of the Yakshas.
Yaksha King, accordingto the Rig Veda...
there was the desire to generatethe creation in the beginning.
and thus were formedthe directions.
Three realms,three qualities
is the Almighty himself, sire.In other words
understands thisthen he can never be angry with
of righteousnessand respects justice.
Yudhishthir?Tell me.
gets connected to another.This tie is called attachment.
while the disintegration ofthe body is deemed to be death.
and only in the heartof the Almighty can it end.
both the travellersare walking down the same path.
is merely the distance thatarises between two human beings.
Then how can onemeet with one's death?
You have given satisfactoryanswers to my questions.
and bring one of your brothersback to life.
The mighty Lord Hanumanwill protect your kingdom!
is the grief housedwithin his heart.
of the world will be alivethen the entire world
King of the Yakshas.When he will find out
three brothers of hishis courage will wither
from his hands forever.If I ask for the life
Now, the second wifeof King Pandu also has the right
My mother Kunti would want thisand I wish for the same as well.
if you wish to bringone of my brothers back to life
Wonderful,dear Yudhishthir!
I had gifted Kunti and Panduwith you as my blessing.
and I am proudof my biological son.
My son is innocent.Had you been confident
in your voice, your majesty!You have to do justice,
the protection of their fatherin the same way
you will not try to contactyour sons in anyway.
What is this I hear?I have been ordered to go
before entering my chambers.Father?
miles away from Hastinapur.There you will concentrate
orders of your Guru.And you will be kind to
me like this?At least tell me the reason.
Your arroganceand to bring your contemptuous
this is the only solutionI have, son.
I always try to fulfillyour wishes.
That someday I should becomethe king of the Kuru dynasty.
Pandu's son Bheemwas that my wish?
stop your wishesfrom being fulfilled.
Enemy?Had I told you that Pandu's
one to say that.You had said
it's our duty to eliminate them.Father, I did as you said.
wrong advise.To proceed towards the hermitage
So you must go.Thus, go there
Go!But, father...
Every child cominginto the world
good valuesnor vices.
What they repeatedlyhear from their parents
Likea road is formed to reach
repeatedly walking on it.It means, the desires
qualities of their children.Isn't that true?
the parents are astonishedand unhappy.
learn such immorality!The truth is that, the
It means, the parentswho desire to make
think about this.Subjects present in the court
are today heading towardsthe most important
the happiness of the subjectsand peace
of the students todayand their uprightness.
after finishing their studiesthey would be capable of
and justice.They will return after
Long live the princes of theKuru dynasty!
will bid goodbye totheir respective mothers.
Bless you, dear.Study well, dear.
more than you valuethe orders of God.
Goodbye, father.Bless you, son.
waiting for you, son.Goodbye.
- May you live long.Your majesty...
The children are leaving today.They will return as radiant and
for the daywhen my son, instead of
The curd will make ita happy journey
All three are kids.It's not right for them
sweet curd.Bheem.
younger brothersis your responsibility.
I will protect Nakuland Sahadev.
Who will protect me from him?Bheem, my brother,
I can protect myself from you.It is a bit difficult.
Be successfulis your mothers blessing.
Father always saidwhatever we do, we
I will surely acquire thebest of knowledge.
my brothers.Son, I have full faith in you.
Looks like unclehas made arrangements
The Lord has orderedyou to get married
And after that, we willmake a sacrifice
Let's leave, mother.Brother Yudhishthir,
Did we make a mistake?No, you have made no mistake.
We did not come here with theintention of ruling this place.
It is our tradition that the onewho kills the King
or sister of the former King.If this does not happen,
conflicts amongst usand our youth
traditions arethe basis of society.
Since you havecreated this problem
Dearyou need not worry.
and righteous man.He will never allow anything bad
of me, My Lady?What about our tradition?
and as my husband.The complexion and behaviour
from that of humansbut the heart
The great sage Vishwashrava hadalso married the ogre Kaikasi.
Vibhishan, My Lady.I promise you
Try to understandmy love, My Lady.
not worthy of acceptance?Accepting what is pure
of humans beings.My love is also pure, My Lady.
You are not onlya woman, Hidimba
his remaining lifeliving amongst ogres?
if you forget my son.Appoint a worthy ogre
of your subjects.For a little while, My Lady!
then I shall spend my whole lifewith those memories.
I will not ask any of youto stay even a day longer.
of giving alms to a beggar.You shall earn the merit...
Bring the garlands.King Vrikodar
This is the first weddingof the Kuru dynasty.
I would have felt contented.Is this marriage
is always correct.But
Hidimba's love is pure, son.Using shackles like complexion,
The look of happiness onbrother Bheem's face is no less.
All hail King Vrikodar!All hail King Vrikodar!
Bless you.Hastinapur.
the kingdom of Panchalseeks permission
bless His HighnessDhritarashtra.
What is it, Duryodhan?It is an earthen pot, father.
that instead of a gold pothe has sent an earthen one?
hold fire, Your Highness.The Prince ought to know this.
Nothing is writtenon it, father.
the fire in that pot.The message will appear.
a 'swayamvar' for thePrincess of Panchal, Draupadi
And this magical pot hasthe power to bear fire in it.
but if one cannotit leads to death.
and also an insult.Is there a Crown Prince
to this 'swayamvar?Certainly.
Whether you arethe Crown Prince or not
Yes.After hearing this message
Then it is time for meto go and talk to grandsire
Then grandsire,what is the solution?
dear.Whoever takes sides
You need not ponderwhy one is protecting
There is no other way nowto keep Hastinapur
in a battle, grandsirethen Panchali's father
take part in it.Even the King of Gandhar
will also take part in it.Eventually all the Kings
numerous womenwill be left widowed
children in darkness grandsire.There will be destruction
I would never have advised youto engage in a battle.
the remainder of the old cropsneed to be pulled out.
the old unrighteous waysneed to be annihilated.
Vasudev had asked meon which side I will be.
but my blessingswill be for the five of you.
of the Aryan regionwho are on your side.
displaying unparalleled valour.May you live long!
grandsire.Why were people
I had set about to protectHastinapur, dear
I do not attack the oneswho do not
the Crown Prince of Hastinapurto a battle.
grandsire.And until I am alive
However,when I die
your punishment.How can you die,
with the boon to die at will.Do not forget
The day the daughter of DrupadShikhandini will stand before me
That dayall of you will have to
Very soon, the Pandavaswill attack with their army
all of you take such pride inwill be put to the test as well
The advice to attack Hastinapurmust indeed
It is their right.I have merely
youdecided on your own
and destroy it,Your Excellency Bhishma?!
of the Kuru kingdomwill be destroyed
will be left impoverished.Who will benefit
We are the unrighteousbut what about
broke a vowrenounced love
of death of millions of people.You have
into agony.Your Excellency...
my...My
I have hidden myselffrom you, mother.
of the shameful game of dice?By standing in your waters
similar to a personbearing a white cloth
The cloth becomes dirtybut the coal
in the game of dice, mother.How can...
On one hand, there werethe duties stemming from my oath
I have attempted to endthis dilemma today, mother.
I have become the causeof death of millions of people.
from all your sins today.Liberation?
I could have averted this warbut in the greed to help
the entire Aryan regionto an exceedingly grave crisis.
son Devavrat?I could have
motherthough that would indeed
my efforts to keep Duryodhanaway from the throne
the throne, son?Duryodhan deems the throne
When he ascends the thronehe will unleash such a reign
the subjects will experiencenothing but misery.
of the subjects with agony.I can see
Millions of people are scatteredin my waters in the form
By averting a warno one can become
in the futureestablishing righteousness again
but you have curtailedthe struggles
Go onand discharge
your salvation with joy.Now, this battle has become
towards a war.How can we stop him?
for insulting Panchali then?Should we allow Duryodhan to
Despite living in a forest,father had imparted to you
How can we forsakethe society so?
in the battlefield?In both the armies
How can we watch them die?When grandsire had
the first to saythat your arrows
pick up your bow?But you never disobey
to engage in this warwas his.
mental state, My Lord.He must have turned his heart
What could have beenthe reason, My Lord?
and yet he said nothing.The tie that had
given him great pain.If he could, he would have burnt
he must have felt when his eyeswere flooded with tears?
He is asking for liberation.Nevertheless
then go to Dwarakaand question Govind.
on our side in the war.Panchali is correct.
then we can indeed believethat this war
I have promisedto protect Dakshak.
made by his father.Even Arjun has made
Why is it,Indra Dev
they make themselvesbut when it comes to the
But Vasudevwhat if the promises made by
a greater value then?Both.
and that of a sonbrings glory to his father.
if you aid Arjunin being successful.
my art and competenceto please you.
Lord Indra.Is there any direction in which
What help do youseek from me, Arjun?
We shall even give them an equalopportunity to prosper with us.
Our grand citywill be known as Indraprastha!
How can I help you?Do build the city for us
and intelligencehave pleased me
"All-accomplishing, maker of all," "all doer", he is the presiding deity of all craftsmen and architects.to begin the construction
Lord Indra!Because you love your son
I take the oaththat the last heir
killed by me!Pardon me,
I had asked Dakshakto seek your refuge.
illusory forest for Dakshakhumans and serpents would
talents, Mayasur.You are like the
employ your skillsfor the betterment of the world.
You are correct,Vasudev.
My Lord.Madhav
to pardon him.I allowed Dakshak to go free
that you wouldprotect the serpents.
has requested meI shall pardon you,
required in the futureyou must employ your skills
Vasudev.I promise you that.
pray to Agni Dev nowand ask him
with your blessingsIndraprastha has been
heartfelt gratitude.You have satiated my hunger
It is in the nature of firethat whichever object
this illusory and powerful bowwhich I present to you.
is also calm,composed
this bowshall be known as
in your newly established city.This bow shall multiply
fulfilled his promise.Look over there.
Indraprastha.All hail...
- King Yudhishthir!All hail...
my daughter...Where is my daughter Vrushali?
on the shore?It is some woman.
Oh! She is the daughterof Vrishbhan.
Let's go.Vrushali
Yes, dear.You and Vrishbhan had
fall into the river?Serpents had attacked us
Even my father was killed!I...
Here you go.Drink this.
The Pandavas havecaptured the serpents
Your father must be alive.Then...
Adhiratha, I have to goto Indraprastha
Certainly, dear.Certainly.
are migrating to Indraprastha.You may travel with any family
- Let's go.Let me help you with that.
- Put this on the cart too.Hey... - Be careful.
All of us will live in thekingdom of King Yudhishthir.
wishes to touch the skyin the form of waves.
on the mountains.And when rain falls
But now, Hastinapurwill become empty!
We must stopthese people from
I need to meet His Highness.Yudhishthir, you truly
runs through your veins?From whom did your characterless
I cannot fight youany longer, Duryodhan.
for anger in it.However, you had angered me
against you nowit will be unrighteous.
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
has returnedas a unique warrior.
This time,only Yudhishthir was defeated.
you could have defeated himquite easily. - No.
You can call Arjun now, son.What if Bheem defeats Duryodhan?
Bheem will not win, father.And Arjun?
Duryodhan.While fighting Bheem...
The day I get defeated by himit will be
Go on.Mother, I knew it all along.
Now, let's see how brother Bheemcrushes brother Duryodhan's
Why is the earth trembling?Bheem has entered
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
the former seems moreproficient. - Be quiet, Sanjay!
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
a mockery out of us before all.The fear evident in the princes
Duryodhan the winner?No, grandsire.
one chance to all the princes.The winner will be declared
Stop!Bheem, stop!
Bheem!You have violated the rules
teacher?I have been blessed
a taste of that boon.And of the things that will
The glory of winningthe competition
is Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
Someone is bound to losein a competition.
I had the thoughtthat if I ripped
I'd have been just disqualifiedfrom the competition.
Brother, I was just...Arjun.
is Prince Arjun of the Pandavas!All hail Prince Arjun!
He is neither hot-headedlike Bheem
has been taken care of.The doorway to the arena
at the correct timewith just one arrow.
So that the doorwaycollapses on Arjun?
My disciple is on his way.Arjun.
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
All hail Prince Arjun!- My son.
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
Brother Arjun is victorious evenbefore engaging in the fight.
crushed under the debris.He created a canopy
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
to deception, uncle.When it comes to deception,
personal limitations, my dear.But I do not see
If you do not havethe means to win
A Few Days Later.Hastinapur.
with a suitable reward for ourlabour throughout the year.
People are obtainingmore money these days.
No wonder they are buying grainsfrom us at a higher price.
became the Crown Prince eventhe Gods are pleased with him.
but Prince Arjun hasput an end to it.
What more couldthe subjects ask for?
the Crown Prince, Yudhishthir.You are correct.
Greetings, brother Yudhishthir.Bless you.
gives me immensehappiness, Minister.
I too would havethought so, Kripacharya.
The spider shown in this scenehas been generated
No, uncle.The enemy submits before it
unable to do anything.In the end
beloved Dusshasan.The day our enemies
that day I tooshall experience
all the arrangementsas per your plan.
but they willnever return, uncle.
to go to Varnavrat?The Crown Prince can be given
There won't be any needto give such an order.
or he will have to seewith his precious eyes
I do not understand, brother.- Dusshasan!
the flat end of a nailthe pointed end
of righteousness in Hastinapuryour grandsire Bhishma
Crown Prince Yudhishthir.If you strike at your grandsire
And the first stageof this insult
You are my eyes.Just look at these ornaments.
Dushala's 'swayamvar.Swayamvar?
Why?Do you not know?
Prince Duryodhan has announcedPrincess Dushala's marriage
How can that be possible?Sindhu has had enmity
will never agree to it.That is impossible,
Jayadratha, the King of Sindhu.Without even seeking permission
The decision to havemy sister married
marriage and its consequencesis the duty of the Ministers,
that only those kings areinvited to a 'swayamvar
does not adverselyaffect the kingdom.
And this has always beenthe policy of our kingdom.
is that of brother Yudhishthir.He is the Crown Prince.
the happiness of my sisteris above all else.
in a river or a pitcher.However, only river water
It is essentialto have a Princess
Sage Vashishtha was marriedto the Princess of Vidarbha,
you have always usedyour sense of duty
- King of Gandhar!Watch what you are saying.
uncle Vidur.The sense of duty
But we ordinary peoplecannot execute such
The Lord of Sun burns himselfin order to
the power to burn.Hence, it cannot
A person who did not marrycannot be expected to
A person who did not marrycannot be expected to
I did not get marriedbecause the sons and
And King Dhritarashtra knows it.The heart pumps blood
because of the blood.The way the heart and the blood
The sense of duty is borne ofaffection and compassion.
that makes him burn himself inorder to illuminate the world.
that the light of the sungives birth to vegetation
In other wordsthat which is valuable
Brother Duryodhanthere is no point
Dushala will have a 'swayamvarand his words are
to you, Crown Princeand to the Ministers of the
The truth is, we havea major dilemma at hand.
You cannot curtailany of my actions.
once, Goddess Parvati had closedLord Shiva's eyes
the entire creation hadplunged into darkness.
And he began tormentingthe entire creation.
The son of Lord Shivaand Goddess Parvati
We are in a similar situation.Back then, Lord Shiva had
curtail his son's actions.Or maybe
There is only one solutionto this situation, grandsire.
and befriend them.And he will forge an enmity
He will keep posing suchproblems for us, grandsire.
I did not expect this from you.Your insult scares me,
keep posing situationswhere you will be insulted.
will add to my respect?Yudhishthir
of Hastinapurwould find a righteous
and despite your presenceI have to declare Duryodhan
will go unfulfilled.My lifelong struggle
This will bethe biggest insult to me.
Pleasemarry my eldest brother.
please work for the welfareof its subjects.
will illuminate the entireAryan region in the future.
will resort to asceticism.Out of the five brothers,
we five brotherscannot coexist together.
Did King Karna of Anganot wish to do the same?
that when I found outthat only the eldest son
someone else my husband.What am I, Prince?
When a tree burnsthe climber wrapped around it
your selfishnessbut sacrifice, Princess.
I will make the sacrifice.You will make the sacrifice.
Will the burdenof so many sacrifices
you should returnto your father.
- And after that...Who will marry me?
Should I also follow her pathand go beg before Kings
the fire of dejectionwill burn me to ashes.
taken an oath to torchthe maidens of the Aryan region
If the four brothers of mineresort to asceticism
will crush our married life.I see no solution
These five stones...These are the fives bases
in one's life, Draupadiwhen one is unable
oneself of righteousnessone requires an object.
But taking a decision bearingrighteousness in mind
happen to Princess Draupadimother.
Lady.Draupadi.
You will not faceany form of injustice.
the rest of my sonswill resort to asceticism.
It is not a refuge whenrunning away from problems.
And Prince Bheem is married.Why should his first wife
that family's good fortune.How can I bring misfortune
Impossible.- Impossible!
planned to divide you?How did such a terrible thought
of this 'Brahmin?!The divinely fragrant
I had heard of such a thing!Today, I have seen it myself!
Pardon us.Fate worked in such...
of killing a 'Brahmin.The royal family of Panchal
then you will be humiliated.And so will I.
of Lord Surya himself.Daughter, one would have
welcomed in his home.How did this happen, sons?
I have ruined a maiden's lifeby giving her lifelong insult.
If you can give all this, Kuntithen what does the Almighty do?
Greetings.There would come
what the righteous path is.I knew of it.
from Kampilya, Kunti.Lord Vedvyas
Oh Great Sage, answer us.What would be correct and
It means being steadyin testing times.
Then how can yoube so perturbed?
Will they...Will they d-die as well?
Please give mea definite answer this time.
the outcome of the war?I want to know, Govind!
destruction, Panchali.Nothing but agony and suffering
would be joy for you in it?Yes.
the entire lineageof King Shantanu
annihilated in this war.Govind
My children...During times of struggle
Their birth had given us...Had given us a new life.
the war we are preparing forwith such zeal
Like a preparationfor sending our children to die?
when he is not walkingtowards death, friend.
not aimed at dying?Is each leaf born during spring
Is its birthabsorbing the rays of the sun
utterly worthless?When a tornado shakes up a tree
to hold onto it.And when the leaves turn yellow
like a great tree, friend.And every human being,
that tree.Their falling off is certain
to experience bothstruggle and peace.
Because you are boundby attachment, friend.
Govind.And even if we emerge
respect and property?This war
we must fight this war,friend.
Govind?Why?
rules, ideals and righteousness.These three entities are like
The waves of timekeep breaking them constantly.
otherwiserules, ideals and righteousness
very few the strengthneeded to establish
everything they havethe people who have
for righteousness.Be it Lord Ram
this world reveres only thosewho struggle towards
friendthat struggling
but a decisionand a vow.
is not a duty.It is a vow
whenever you want.You might
and grandchildrenbut like millions of people
Your life will become worthless.Because of you
given you special powerswill lose His faith in you.
Sister-in-law!Come here.
ornament and a wedding dress.We need to present
Sister-in-lawplease come.
Apart from the fivehusbands of yours
will be destroyed.The entire dynasty will be
can someone tell mehow these 'laddoos
Our sons have reminded usof our childhood.
And after a few yearstheir children will remind them
have immortalised us.Mother Draupadi...
Please come.Come with me.
Tell us,Mother Draupadi.
cannot be pulled out by him.How will I be able
a woman was insultedbut she tolerated it.
Govind.A wife tolerated
but a mother will not be able totolerate the death of her sons
I am willingto forget all the insults,
the empire...I am willing to give up
I cannot send my sonsto the battlefield.
I do not want a war.I will certainly emerge
of all the kingdoms.After me, my son Laxman...*
will become the emperor.If the last survivor
in anyone's wombhe will be killed,
I will die and the five Pandavaswill survive...
Until I receive the newsof the death
It won't.I take that vow!
and Prince Dhrishtadyumnaare entering!
Fatherwhere are my sons?
Mother, my life revolvesaround the inspiration
Bless methat in the coming battle
Prativindhya*Prativindya means Drupadi's son. Other name: Shrutavindha "related to the Buddhi (righteousness)."
I am the heir to my fatherBheem's strength.
the heads of my enemies.So be it, Sutasom.*
make my father Arjun's powersmy achievements.
*Action taken by his son.May you have a very long life.
as the sharp swordof my father Nakul
*Named after a famous king in the Kuru lineage who had that name and he was considered to be an avatar of Visvadevas (various Vedic gods).all your ambitions
Mother, bless meso that like my father Sahadev
Srutasena,* it will certainly be so.*With a famous army.
Take blessings fromyour fathers.
that she is getting marriedto Prince Abhimanyu.
sitting on the royal thronehe will be protected
rule over the entire nation.Abhimanyu will be the reason
what is going to happenin the battle
I need to know.Why such a question suddenly,
Who all will survive?Who can know the result
Tell me.Why did the sacred thread
be the reason behind the changebut his son will take the first
shall be the ruler of the nationBut my elder son Prativindhya
Why will his sonnot become the emperor?
There is some deep meaningin your words, Govind.
the joys of the present.The joys of the future
Perform your duties.And don't try to find out the
Will Abhimanyudie?
Will they also...Will they die as well?
the sons of Dhritarashtramust be slain!
And until he does notinterfere in our path to victory
even tomorrowwe shall reach Prince Duryodhan.
gives us new experiences.Those who plan based on past
perhaps keep a lamp's flame litand stable amidst strong wind.
Even the wick of my soulis drenched with tears.
I enslaved myself to thethrone of Hastinapur forever
that Yudhishtir himself.How can I feel well, Master Drona
But battle plans and strategiesneed to be discussed.
There exists a verycommon battle formation.
our army into smaller clustersand make an attack.
we cannot supervise the activityof the entire army.
of Dhritarashtra may dieor one of the sons of Pandu could die.
my children and grandchildren.Therefore, today
I did not slay him.I could not slay him,
In this battleI have a single goal, Master Drona.
We must soon arrest Yudhishtirand put an end to this war!
summoning all these warriors?Dear friend Karna, brace yourself.
and exhibit your skill!I believe you
- Be quiet!Be quiet, uncle!
It was your advice to yield toGrandsire Bheeshma's insistence
What was the result of that?Today you may have witnessed
but fights on behalf of the enemy!Prince, had you and your brothers
You have broken my trustand strangulated my honour!
You have brought shame uponthe name of King Shantanu!
I would slay you right now!Then raise your weapon!
The embracer of justiceand the son of Ganga!
these treacherous arms are!He had the chance
Had you slain Yudhishtirthe battle would end today,
Friend Karna!I order you
enter the battlefield!You are aware of my
onto the battlefield tomorrowI shall not fight this battle!
makes no difference to me.In fact, if you are not
even more easily.Now I do not need you.
only when it has pearls in itand is assumed respectable too!
Master Drona,before storming at me
Even you better ponder upon your duties!You have embraced the pride
You had sworn to guardthe throne of Hastinapur!
yours, Grandsire Bheeshma?I will spend my life
and abide by your every order!Yes, Grandsire Bheeshma!
to renounce the battlefield!Whether my friend Karna fights or not
Think deeply!You are in a huge moral dilemma!
would you like to fulfill!Will you defend Hastinapur
Ponder over it, Grandsire.Do you wish to renounce your duty
or embrace your dutyand justify your death?
Do not insult Grandsirein this manner.
not break your trust.Let him fight the battle!
My lad!The armoured one speaks wisely!
But what shall I gain from it?I solemnly swear
Every moment, I shall standon the battlefield.
the entire world wasplunged into darkness
from the enemy's heart!I shall obliterate
seem so strong, Krishna?These are the winds of change, Draupadi!
Mindsets have changed.And now situations
become the reason ofour sorrow, O' Krishna?
But, good ladychange is the law of nature!
That implies, no matterwhat pain change cause to one
while some feelthe joy of liberation.
Master Drona?The strategy to unleash rivers of blood!
and unleash chaos!Witnessing the agony in your heart
hatred, pain, sorrow...I shall renounce all of these!
shall be over my head.This battlefield
All lights of Hastinapurshall be extinguished by me.
Just one night!All the sorrows in my heart
and tomorrow, at dawnI shall step
driven solely by thirst for blood!I have lost all my pride.
you are the supreme Emperor.Hastinapur has taken your refuge
your younger brothersand I shall have them freed,
you order me to punish anyonethen even that order shall be
Your Highness,I have been defeated.
I have lost the game of life,Your Highness.
any punishment you award me.You shall not be punished,
and brother Duryodhan.How, Your Highness?
such a pardoning heart?What is the force
but a war,Your Highness
How, Your Highness?How?
Get up,King of Gandhar.
Everyone knows aboutrighteousness and truth
This is what leaves mecontented.
We do not want contentment.I
do not want contentment,Your Highness.
to look at usand put its hands together
We are not lookingfor contentment
how canbeing righteous be something
Righteousness is the driverof actions, King of Gandhar.
nor given up being truthfulrequires nobody's approval
Despite losing all your brothersyou stood by truthfulness.
with righteousnessyou take pride in yourself
than righteousnessin the entire world!
But brother Yudhishthiryou had told brother Bheem that
no pride in losing us.Absolutely, Nakul
bet himself this timeand I am afraid
is this?When a tree
with wrath, there?Why is no one saying anything?
you...Your Highness
army of Indraprasthato the city of Ahichhatra,* immediately.
will certainlyprotect you there.
If the Emperor gets defeatedthen you shall
competent Aryan warriorsas my husbands
how can he be competent?Uncle!
does not have the rightto grace a throne of gold.
of the Aryan regionis me!
go to the wifeof these five slaves
Impossible!If Panchali is
There are onlytwo duties in my life!
orders of brother Yudhishthir!So, in order for
are more than adequate!Calm down,
A person being enslavedcertainly does not imply
This is Hastinapurand justice reigns supreme here!
for her protectionshe need not await the arrival
not insult the Empress.We shall certainly not do that,
do not be foolish.Had the mere defeat
to his familythere would have been no need
We could have defeatedYudhishthir in the first round.
over the Empress, yet.For that
If the society learnsthat you bore Karna before
But instead your five sonswould be mocked at.
When he'd have cried as a childwhich mother would have
of all his old tears.I want to run my hands
Beyond a mother's lapthere exists no childhood,
Mother, childhood doesn't existbeyond a mother's lap.
The only thing I am happy aboutthat after several years
Radha, take a long lookat this radiance.
King Dhritrashtra's sonsyou wouldn't attain respect.
When I had entered the groundI wasn't friends with anyone.
has a deserving place.There should be!
capabilities by this society.Wouldn't it become weak
- He may.A 'yajna' aimed
It's not our duty to think aboutPrince Duryodhan's motives.
in lieu is our duty, father.Karna, the scriptures say
are worth accepting.But I assume that you
righteousness.Go, son
me, father?How would I live without
No, son.We will stay here.
away from misdeeds, Karna.You must leave, son.
your son's head, mother?So that its weight reminds me
Son!A relationship
Priyamvada.I have to now go to my son.
about Karna to your five sons.For the sake of a friend
Only then would I let you go.Just give me the promise.
as I will be the first totouch your feet.
Greetings mother.Mother.
And what about me?When the ground trembled at
I do not know thatbut today
Arjun, today all the ancestorswould be showering flowers
a bow is the supreme weapon.I had said that
perfect for youand a mace is perfect for Bheem.
when...When I...
the Princess fall weak.She is my childhood friend
five capable sonsthen why should she
a mother's heart.When a competition
Motherwe five brothers are like
nor one less wouldbe sufficient.
That means if us fourbrothers apply ashes on someone
and conclude the task.That was said by Nakul.
No, Bheem.Now is not the time to eat.
are yet to be met with.Mother
I haven't spoken to my sonsabout Karna yet.
I will not let this 'yajnaget completed at any cost.
Weak and foolish people like youare of no use to me,
only by the personwho had taken my additional arms
Krishna.But he will not kill me
that he will pardon100 misdeeds of mine.
has left me exceedingly pleased.The fishes shown in this scene
The ritual is now complete.You may be seated
the offertory to the guests.After you are done with it
in which fourrepresentative Kings
Only then will you be declaredthe supreme Emperor.
our mother had taken the oaththat only after the city
Hence, we were compelledto engage in labour
of our revered grandsire Bhishmawe have been successful
of both these peoplewill I have the right
to this gathering!All hail His Excellency Bhishma!
I have been a witnessto her struggles.
of her struggles.Bless you!
Apart from the Almightya King does not prostrate
to break this tradition, motherthen I will not be able
son.Be seated on your throne
Emperor Yudhishthir!All hail the supreme
not yet tarnished it.A few rituals are
First, Yudhishthirwill sit on the throne
he will distributethe offertory to the sages
is interrupted before he does soit will be deemed unsuccessful,
a few lapsesin such a grand ceremony.
But where is the throne?Despite being an Emperor
Emperor Yudhishthir!All hail the supreme
All hail Empress Draupadi!All hail the supreme
the way Surya Devgraces the entire sky
of darkness in mensimilarly
as the supreme Emperorneed to be sprinkled
This is the dutyof a supreme Emperor.
But dear,Surya Dev himself
by the 'shastras.A person
Upon whose advicethe supreme Emperor
Seeking the blessingsof such a person
the 'pudovas', dear?Guide me in this,
or Vasudev Krishnacan be chosen for this ritual.
by selfishness and greedor there is a doubt to his
of another persondoes not have
I am the General of Hastinapur.Obeying the orders
That is why,dear
I thinkVasudev Krishna
Revered guestsrighteousness,
mentioned by grandsireall of which reside in Vasudev.
He has the knowledge of the soulthe beauty of the mind
of determination.Vasudev
will I let this 'yajnaget completed.
displayed theirdedication to you.
to offer the 'prathamarghyayou cannot insult us!
the authority of a foolis not something we will
who is more deservingthan Vasudev in this court?
this world and the otherthe soul and the Almighty
by no one but Vasudev.All that is a lie!
The milk and butterthat rightfully belonged
during his childhood!That person
He led to the untimely deaths ofvarious friends of King Kansa.
but also an unrighteous man.He is a rebel!
ever work towards the welfareof the Aryan region?
Be quiet,Crown Prince of Chedi!
So, will you kill me?Bheem, is only
He married a female ogre.Now, tell me, Kings...
ever be allowed to takepart in a veneration?!
by that treacherous Krishna!But such an unrighteous Vrikodar
Shishupal!I will behead you!
Until His Highnessawards him a punishment
Crown Prince of Chedido not cross your limits
He...He is preaching to me
the highest honourin this court!
not teach you what is correctand what is not?
had committed the unrighteousdeed of killing a sage.
have a problem withour Rajsuya 'Yajna
I promise youthat until you die
But do not resortto verbal abuses
Arjun.By having the right thumb
the art of archery.You are the most treacherous
was a criminal!That is why,
Vasudev and Devaki.Now, tell me! What is a person
Crown Prince Shishupalif you do not leave
sentence you to death.I do not fear anyone.
would never have beenkilled deceitfully!
in the entire Aryan regionthat treacherous Krishna
Collisions: NormalScroll Position: 105
PlayDepth: 0[V4 Styles]
[Events]Format: Marked, Start, End, Style, Name, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, Effect, Text
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:20.49,0:01:23.59,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That is why, this boy\Nshall be called Dhritarashtra.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:23.59,0:01:25.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Dhritarashtra!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:30.47,0:01:32.51,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Dhritarashtra!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:32.57,0:01:34.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Dhritarashtra!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:06.50,0:02:08.61,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He will illuminate\Nthe entire kingdomDialogue: Marked=0,0:02:08.67,0:02:11.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and hence this boy\Nshall be called Pandu.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:17.55,0:02:19.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Pandu!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:24.56,0:02:26.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Councilor, give the priest
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:33.63,0:02:34.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Queen Mother.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:51.72,0:02:54.48,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This ritual is not yet complete.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:47.50,0:04:51.50,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What should this boy\Nbe named, sir?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:51.54,0:04:55.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Prince Dhritarashtra is\Ninherently gallant, Sire.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:08.62,0:05:11.57,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I name this boy Vidura.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:11.72,0:05:15.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This boy will be very\Nknowledgeable and wise.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:26.60,0:05:31.45,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Vidura!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:22.59,0:07:24.57,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am not here to receive\Ncharity, Queen Mother
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:39.74,0:07:40.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,MarriageDialogue: Marked=0,0:07:41.71,0:07:42.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,or death?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:26.65,0:08:28.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What do you wish for,\NPrincess Amba?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:30.59,0:08:32.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am still willing\Nto welcome you here.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:40.63,0:08:42.58,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is not a very wise choice.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:46.64,0:08:48.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Why do you wish\Nto render your life meaningless?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:55.68,0:08:57.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,an imperfect boy child?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:02.62,0:09:04.45,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No, Queen Mother\Nof the Kuru dynasty.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:16.50,0:09:18.61,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The anticipation of that\Nglorious momentDialogue: Marked=0,0:09:18.67,0:09:20.50,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,in the future is what\Nkeeps me alive.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:02.71,0:10:04.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,nor in the past.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:06.48,0:10:08.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Life is the present moment.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:17.49,0:10:18.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But despite knowing thisDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:19.60,0:10:21.59,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,we are unable\Nto understand this truth.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:29.74,0:10:31.48,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and life...Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:35.58,0:10:37.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Life just goes by.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:44.62,0:10:46.60,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,nor shape itDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:47.59,0:10:49.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All we can do is
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:55.73,0:10:58.46,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Won't each moment of lifeDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:59.64,0:11:01.54,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,be filled with vitality.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:15.68,0:12:17.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,becomes an accomplice\Nin his sins.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:18.82,0:12:21.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Every drop of water\Nfalls from a mountain
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:48.88,0:12:53.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Causing you to doubt me\Nis a sin for me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:55.69,0:12:57.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Had I not been worried\Nabout Hastinapur
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:21.88,0:13:24.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If you have\Nhonoured righteousnessDialogue: Marked=0,0:13:24.95,0:13:27.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,at every step of the way
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:38.73,0:13:42.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,only when it doesn't sit\Non the mountain tenaciously.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:42.94,0:13:43.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,So...
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:53.82,0:13:55.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is an honour for\Nthe teacher, Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:58.82,0:14:00.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Fight me.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:14.67,0:14:17.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is enough to plant the seed\Nof doubt in the society.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:19.91,0:14:22.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Thus, pick up\Nyour weapon, Bheeshma
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:06.22,0:16:07.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My respects, sir.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:22.02,0:18:26.11,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You are not fighting me\Nbut deceiving me, Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:50.21,0:18:53.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,whose disciple\Ndisobeys his orders.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:56.22,0:19:00.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Do you not have faith\Nin the strength of your teacher?
Greetings.May you live long.
in archery than me.My knowledge of the art can
around to learn.I have gone
I have scaled the regionsof Kuru and Panchal for it.
But who will teach youthe skills that you seek?
does not have the right tolearn such higher skills.
You will gain nothingfrom my hermitage.
lies the hermitageof the revered Drona.
as his disciple.But know this.
is not something peoplewould either like
That is why accept the clanyou were born into
I do not believe in thisdiscrimination of caste.
and learn from him.Arjun.
of archery from you.My father is the charioteer
Then how could you even dreamof learning the art of archery?
the right to higher knowledge?Son of a charioteer...
And Sire, I am not asking fora kingdom like the Kshatriyas.
Then why can I not learnthe art of archery?
In that case, why didyou learn the art of battle?
revered Drona?Do not argue.
the womb of a woman.I was born in the drona* vessel of sage Bharadwaj.
then prove it.Otherwise go away.
The birth of every childis divine for his parents.
and the dreams of a fatherin the scales of caste
bleeds each timehe tells me to stay away
by curbing my capabilities?Who has made these rules, Sire?
Did his ancestorsmake this choice?
on the scales of discrimination?Why?
in such rules, Sire.I would be honoured to break
who can tie its string.And that is acquired by deeds,
Ghee* is used to light theholy fire in a Yagna.
with crude oil.But Lord Parashuram
Go away.Go away!
I am leaving.I shall go and gain knowledge
I shall return.But let me assure you
And I shall be betterthan all your disciples.
more knowledge than others.In other words, it is immaterial
The thing that matters is howmuch more knowledge you have
the desire to be superiormakes even obtaining knowledge
decisive in a competition?It is possible to be superior
That is when discontent,agony
of becoming superiorif one tries to excel
the contentment of the soul.On the path of excellence
It is a competitionwith oneself.
gain all the knowledge.Even without trying,
With my hairI renounce the rules
shall be the recipientof my blow.
My new form will usher thebeginning of a new tradition.
Are you a Brahmin?I too, like you
I am not opposed to Kshatriyasbut to the tyranny
I am opposed to feeble Brahminsfeeble human beings
with the hopeof becoming strong.
all my weapons.But I
am filled with the desireof imparting knowledge to you.
impart knowledge to you.People of our caste
A charioteer carryingweapons
Are you the sonof a charioteer?
Higher knowledge belongs onlyto Kshatriyas and Brahmins.
I ama Brahmin, my Lord.
the day you areable to do this
shall indeed be fulfilled.12 Years Later.
to reach my ears.Then we shall leave immediately
*Divine Shiva dance which depicts his violent nature, first as the creator and later as the destroyer of the universe, even of death itself.At this hour?
to assume the Rudra formis tonight and at this hour.
and do rememberthat no one is allowed
so dark, Sairandhri?What are you up to?
right here in this chamberthen you are making
illuminate the chamber.In order to have light
This is neither Panchalnor Hastinapur
Do you wish to engage in a duel?Do not be foolish,
then you will be killed.However,
and leave Draupadihere with me.
And I am not stuckanywhere either.
I will have to call outto Duryodhan just once
Only when your voiceleaves this chamber
Those are the horsesof Damgranthi.
Listen!You cannot leave
a message to Duryodhan?Do you hear that,
such sounds at this hour?They are indeed the Pandavas!
such sounds at this hour, uncle?So that we fail to hear
Let's go,my darling.
if the Pandavas hide themselvesthen we will never
then we will succeedin our cause.
Let's go.General Kichak got slain...
King Viratgo and apprehend
by the Pandavas.The Pandavas are not present
King ViratGeneral Kichak
all the immigrants and guestswere to produce themselves
that the offenders of Hastinapurare present in your kingdom.
for our offendersin your kingdom
Impossible!I have made
you aretaking the side of the Pandavas
to be forgettingthat a man who builds an abode
tainted with the ashof the deceased.
you must also facethe consequences.
is beyond my comprehension.However, before I
leave this place.Soldiers
King Virateach brick of your castle
will die a gruesome death.I shall slay
Tell the Pandavasthat if they have the competence
the city of Virat!Hear all!
the inner part of the shellthat encloses a pearl safely
Similarly,your psyche
I have been humbled todayto have met a more
the moment you had cometo the city of Virat
However,I am of the opinion
Duryodhan must be awaiting youwith his army outside the city
This battle is beingorchestrated
If we produce ourselves to themthen there will be no battle.
it would also imply my defeat.Emperor Yudhishthir,
using the secret passages.I shall hold them off until you
King Virat.We cannot forsake
is not just yoursbut ours as well.
If we must produceourselves to them
Brother Yudhishthir,I am of the opinion
it will be the last dayof our life of anonymity.
If Duryodhan cannotrecognize us in twelve hours
This battle cannot take place.In the Matsya kingdom,
grandsire!So,
Without being invoked firstno God ever takes part
no King or Crown Princecan ever enter another kingdom.
to insult us so!If that is the case
If he does not do sothen we shall
You wish to while away timein some way or the other,
Crown Prince?You are trying to launch
there can be dire consequencesto this battle.
will be next toimpossible for us
scare you,Minister?
in your heart?What kind of a Minister
This is not only my insultbut also that of all of you!
that Hastinapur had beenrendered powerless
and had made his blind brotherthe new King.
You have said enough.People of the court
Your Excellency.Will we
Certainly,my darling.
the ties of tearsare more tenacious.
him.Uncle
cannot be madefavourable for you
will come to us.But uncle,
over there.All the strength
and the might of those two menis on the other.
know thatbut the mighty Balaram
Getting Subhadramarried to you
insulted back thenmy darling
we must persuade Vasudev Krishnato take our side as well.
and if Balaramis on our side
strive for their entire livesthey will not be able
lead them to their deathand we
Greetings, guru.Bless you.
is talking about you.However, it would have
been about your prowessin mace fighting.
Greetings, Balaram.Welcome.
You gave himthe knowledge of warfare
butdid not show him the path
precisely why we cameto Dwaraka.
King of Gandharwhere one must go.
leads to struggleand that of contentment
This is the Narayani* Army of Dwaraka, King of Gandhar.*Narayani Sena was the Army of Krishna.
and at the momentyou are right in its center
Vasudev?We came here
We are not here to fight.Is the friendship forged
there is no reasonfor you to worry.
to navigatethrough this labyrinth.
through this labyrinth!He is Arjun and Subhadra's
made by the Narayani Armyand reach the center.
Have you becomean accomplished warrior?
from displaying your skillsbefore them?
dear.Uncle, I was not
from displaying my competence.And a display of competence
Brother Duryodhan had navigatedinto King Drupad's labyrinth.
then we will be scared.My father is bound
Dear Abhimanyudoes your father have
is being made to navigateinto a labyrinth?
And coming to navigatingout of a labyrinth...
and I too am my father's weaponuncle Duryodhan.
since I have had the opportunityto have a mace fight
we have a littlemace fight of our own?
guru.Pick up your mace,
it seems as thoughthe mighty Balaram
The truth is,my darling
not beat up and hurt anotherin a friendly duel,
his disciple.The guru had taught his disciple
deemed playing a game of dicemore appropriate.
thirteen years agoVasudev.
the other team also hasthe right to employ
What are you doing?I am bidding my sword goodbye.
and help me reform my life.I have failed the purpose
Do not say that.You do not know, Draupadi
Flowers not only emit fragrancebut also look beautiful
A thorn is bornonly to prick others.
The people who do notsucceed in the battlefield
I cannot be.If ember loses its fire
The person who touches itbecomes dirty.
with anger and vengeance.It is a tie of my
my entire being getsfilled with dejection.
Butfather snatched this basis
I shall talk to him.You... You need
Father will never listento you, Draupadi.
You need to comewith me, sister.
Fathersister deserves this respect.
away from sister?How dare you question
the questions of his children.In order to question
Draupadi!Shikhandini has
to slay Bhishmabut was defeated
defeat Bhishma then?!She has proven the prediction
Because she is a woman!Women can bear jewellery
*Goddess of Victory of Good over Evil, "the invincible", the most popular incarnation of Devi/Goddess Shakti--the female aspect of the divine.She bears not one
of the Gods to yousimilarly
I do not requireany such gift or blessing.
why did you ask for me from Agni Dev* then?*The god of fire and the acceptor of sacrifices.
because of their intransigence!They have sent you
a symbol of my weakness!You and that Shikhandini!
The two of you remind meof my defeat!
One who does not getrespect from one's father
I, your daughter, fatherbeg of you
sister's self-confidence.This is not injustice.
Because I never accept defeat!But in that battle
Then why punish only sister?If you wish to stay alive
crime of insulting your fatheryou shall be sent
in Kampilya any longer!Go!
Please pardon her.Guard
Take her to the gatesof the city!
of the city!Right away!
I am your daughter.If I stay here after this insult
Draupadi..No, Draupadi.
Father, stop Draupadi.Father, she has no
Please do not banishmy sister, father.
FatherI apologize on her behalf.
a symbol of my weakness!They have sent you by defeating
in Kampilya any longer!Go!
Otherwise, for committing thecrime of insulting your father
This maiden has been banishedfrom the city of Kampilya!
is where the melody of flute does.He had also told me
will I be able to winover the High Queen.
all that I had with me.Now, please allow us
who cannot revereMadhav's flute.
"This is a matter of honour.""It seems to be"
"and this is a vowI must fulfil."
of my life."May you be blessed
inherit the glory and valourhis father possesses.
I hope you will pardon me.I've accepted the peculiarities
the day I comprehendthe meaning of such fate.
The future of the entireAryan region
And brother Balaram had said...I am not asking you
Man decides whyhe does certain things
by the Almighty.It meant only one thing...
of the Aryan regionand you
Mother's ordersMadhav's wish
towards this goal.If that is the case, My Lord
has many obstacles in it.Please begin to get
No, my child.No.
you will not beable to fight a lion.
to be weapons.Krishna can crush him
only of King Jarasandha.Krishna had killed
of Jarasandha.In order to exact his revenge
and left them terrorised.In the end, the Yadavas
We are not goingto approach him for help.
of Hastinapuram to seek his refuge?
This is politics.If you wish to conquer
and stop the 'Rajsuya Yajnaof Indraprastha
If Jarasandha kills the Yadavasthen how would it
then you mustcleave it
and the Yadavasare separated
He is the only personwho can make
because Jarasandhacannot be killed.
Cannot be killed?How can that be possible, uncle?
in order to bear children.The King divided
to each of his wives.Both his wives gave birth
prayed to the female ogre Jara.The ogre Jara used her powers
Since Jara had amalgamatedthe two halves
as Jarasandha.All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
your might!Come forth!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha...- Hail!
He cannot be killedwith any weapon.
is known only by the ogre Jaraand the Almighty.
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!Let's go, my child.
Hail the Emperor!Greetings, King Jarasandha!
who had approachedVasudeva Krishna
Your Highness.He fell in love.
I have heard a lotabout your feats.
and not love.Because your political ploys
to achieve success.To me, Emperor Jarasandha.
one must open another.That is how rodents behave,
to their shelter gets closedthey scurry in another direction
has only one entranceand the courage
No one!Your Highness,
We have come to youwith a proposal.
The entire army of Hastinapurand the enemies of the Yadavas
the Emperorof the entire Aryan region.
engaging in one is foolishness,King of Gandhar.
you have fought your own battlesEmperor Jarasandha.
Your Highness...If even one of the flames
And now, Vasudeva Krishnahas become the sun
in Magadha is a crime!So, how dare you praise him!
Soldiers, arrest them!Have them beheaded and send
Surrender yourselves.Have faith in the gambit
the Pandavaswill be unable
So, Your Highness...Do you approve of these rules?
my darling.Your might just have to
to play till the endand so must you.
are you contented with this?I am contented.
neither of the playersmust engage in foul play
Now, if the Empress wishesthen she may proceed
My Lordsomething that
need not necessarily bethe same thing.
will you throw the diceon your own
Is there not a rule to throwone's dice on one's own here?
which belongs to the playerand he
The way I have given this rightto uncle.
but worse than uselessin throwing the dice,
then Gandhar wouldnever have met
Your Highnessdo go ahead and tell us
with me, unclebut the Emperor has the entire
should be me,Your Highness.
Tell me what you wouldlike to bet first.
which I have obtainedwith my own efforts.
Then I have my apparelsand jewellery.
This isall the property I have with me
I bet my entire propertyin the first round!
then will you play just onceand put an end to this game?
will become doublebeloved Nakul.
You also need to betobjects of equal worth
of the objects bet by youshall be matched
under my possession.You must be familiar
leave their basestraverse the entire path
can capture thoseof the Crown Prince
the most numberof pieces in the base
all the pieces of the opponentand removes them from the game
King of Gandhar.Though I oppose this game
There you go,Your Highness.
My dice have also rolled outa sum of 12.
Your Highness.One of my pieces is
your piece capture minenor jump and go beyond it.
You have captured a pieceof my beloved Duryodhan.
And there is nothing surprisingabout it, Your Highness.
There you go,King of Gandhar.
Now, I too haveonly three pieces left.
You and I arein the same boat now.
Look at these,Empress.
by Hastinapur.The moment the game of dice ends
by Hastinapurby having a gala festival.
who have not beenaccepted whole-heartedly.
Will the Kuru Princesaccept my husbands
All of you belongto the Kuru dynasty
Sister-in-lawwhat Draupadi meant was
First and foremost,they must accept this.
Its sole purposeis entertainment
both the players now haveonly one piece remaining.
will be the winner.In order to win,
UncleI have bet all my dreams here
roll in my favourthen there will be
all my plans are made keepingreversal of fortune in mind.
Your Highness,let's see
He needsa score of 12.
place his second bet.What will he bet this time?
True pridelies in relationships
in my brother Vikarna.He is an ace archer
My younger brotherVikarna is my next bet.
Vikarnawill be your servant.
younger brother of yourswould you like to bet?
They, who are the causeof this state of yours
to ordinary womenin Duryodhan's kingdom.
It's your righteous dutyto establish these two.
for the ultimate reality.Here are the five gems
neither tie your hairnor adorn the tiara.
of our life's goal!If that's your promise
Until I wash my hairwith the blood
That will definitely happen,Draupadi.
Only darknesswill surround them!
to put off the lamps.Orders to put off the lamps?
that there will be darknessin the whole of Hastinapur,
be lit even in the royal palace.Forgive me, but I will
of an order have you given?Why are all the lamps
- You can see darknessbecause you're blindfolded,
sees the light of fortune.You should declare Diwali
You see fortune?How?
They will killall my 100 sons.
You have always given moreimportance to ambitions.
to love the thronemore than his mother.
But it's the result of your lovethat Duryodhan
in order to get the throne.Brother
Other women bear their childrenin their womb
kept them in my wombfor two years.
Why will we die, mother?You have no faith in my
in the court.Even after seeing
about your strength.Draupadi's curse
This is the curseof Yajna's child, Draupadi.
Thirteen years laterwhen I'll return their
Yudhisthira to promiseto not wage a war.
No property shall be returned.In the incognito
the Pandavasand send them
This is a false hope,brother.
Brother...Brother
Today I request to youdo anything
Definitely.I will take responsibility
fights the battlealong with the Pandavas
My family will be ruined,brother.
- Gandhari!Vasudeva Krishna!
For 12 years to comeprepare for war.
Like Lord Brahma'sfour faced weapon...
weapon of destruction.During the battle,
to confront a powerwhich is beyond
Lord Mahadev's weapon.Hence, Arjun
to please Mahadevand acquire
the scienceof physical strength...
Hence you willgo to mountain Gandhamadana
you will perform penancefor Lord Hanuman.
Sahadevaboth of you will have to acquire
you're able to protectyour army.
that righteousnessis the basis of victory
as well as the companyof the highest truth.
will serve the asceticsand gather virtue.
at Dwarka.Definitely, Arjun.
I will train himto be a warrior.
Why is righteousnessdefeated, brother?
Achieving somethingis not victory
It's the impact of time,Subhadra.
Were you aware that all thiswas happening in Dwarka?
of immorality repeatedly.When a river meets a waterfall
treads the path of immoralityit gets completely tainted
people are followingthat despicable practice.
Neither is brother Yudishtirto be blamed
that is to blamethat gets bound by malice...
of traditions.There is no such thing
When a man holds on stubbornlyto his oaths and promises
But is being stubbornin every situation
in that filled courtroom.Grandsire Bheeshma,
and the eldest brother Yudishtirwere all bound by their words
Just fulfilling their oathsand promises
Even if one of them hadbroken out of their solemnity
What do you mean to say,Krishna?
Righteousness is like a tree,elder brother.
But the roots of the tree arecompassion.
But not as much as the roots.If in order to end one's agony
But here, at this present timecompassion has been destroyed
One values his agonymore than that his dear ones.
Compassion has drained outof this society.
The plight that Dwarkais in today
righteousnesshas grown lifeless.
Once again the society must bemade aware of righteousness.
in Dwarka, Krishna.But I am facing
prevailing in the Arya clan.The prospective war between
decides a war for itself.The Kauravas and Pandavas
But a flood has no banks.Even we cannot be mere
on someone's behalf.You are right, Krishna.
the side to whichyou shall incline to
Now try proving me false.What are you doing, son?
Because the oath to slayall of us hundred brothers
to slay the armoured Karna.Then I shall slay your sons,
Grandsire Dhritarashtra runs inshall bleed it all out
two more headsthat you can severe.
Because your unclehas chosen our side.
If an earthen pot hasheld poison even once
Couldn't you severe the heads?Because the heads of
siding with injustice.Brilliant!
both your uncles well.Come.
Proceed and wait for me.Bless you!
So how did you arriveat this conclusion?
I shall not fight onanyone's side in this battle.
And how can I engagemy own family in battle?
this war either, Master Balram?You better question him
*The Refuge of Everyone.And all decisions pertaining to
Dear Duryodhan,go and counsel with Krishna.
Whoever approaches him firsthe will provide that person
Victory lies to the sidethat Krishna will be on.
immediately.Meet him before Arjun does.
My Lord!The eldest one has
Lord Krishna and the Yadav armywith participating
Request brother Krishnato aid our side with the army
on the side oftruth and justice.
there is no use asking him.You have to ask him, My Lord!
Blessings must be sought.And if brother supports you
that Krishna is being partial.Krishna has promised
he shall surely grant himwhatever he asks for.
A beseecher's placelies on the ground, Krishna.
Krishna.I am not seated higher.
Would you like somerefreshments?
You shall not find it even inthe celestial world.
I am here to discussan important matter.
You had promised master Balramthat whoever approaches you
Impossible.Brother could never decipher
whoever appears before me firstI shall surely grant his wish.
back to life.I shall be eternally grateful
and also quite eagerto bless you
power, competenceweapons, wealth, army
of mine back to lifeyou have given me
along with our wifebe able to complete our final
the art of disguising yourselvesdear Yudhishthir.
the art of disguising yourselveswill aid you in staying hidden.
for all four of your brothersto leave to complete
to see righteousnessprevail once again on the earth.
What danger had befallenall of you, My Lords?
It was only a test.Call it the first test,
in the next 12 years.One's meditation is incomplete
the time has comefor Bheem, Arjun,
their respective meditation.Will everyone
Yes, Panchali.One has to revere
We have only 12 yearsto please them.
The people who know their limitsbecome truly powerful.
that all of you willindeed be successful.
your meditation will bethe most arduous one
will become your might.You need not be scared.
In order to keep an eye on us,you have been
That is why, you arelike family to us now.
shall be brought by me.- No, Your Highness.
And you need not tell Duryodhananything regarding this.
that we will not hidefor the next 12 years.
is of no use.However,
a life of anonymityall the treachery
of the King of Angaand even the entire
We shall appearonly when we decide to.
It cannot be stopped.These many 'laddoos' are
laddoos' aside for myself.Om Anjani Sut Pavan Putra
Om Anjani Sut Pavan PutraTubhyam Namah!
Tubhyam Namah!Aavaha...
This sacrament is for Lord Hanuman, son of Pavan Dev.**Pavan Dev: a name of Vayu, the god of wind.
What would the Almighty dowith two 'laddoos?
Who are you?!You seem to be
to interrupt my meditationby that wicked Duryodhan!
but do not forgetthat I have married an ogre!
Your illusion will notwork before me.
*Monkey demon.You are a strange human being.
and then fight with mefor no apparent reason.
I had only imagined youin your titan avatar.
Upon seeing a tiny beingdid you also underestimate
you do not knowthe true form of might.
You are my youngerbrother, Bheem.
your parents had beenblessed with you.
First,you must...
is it not?So, go bring it.
At least leave that one for me.So, take it.
The might that becomes inactivegets disintegrated.
when Pavan Dev created meHe gave me the form of a monkey.
brother Hanuman!Then get up.
Marvellous.Composure should be
it is essentialto have a calm mind
No matter what task is at handit can only be successful
and a calm mind.That is why
But at least give methat 'laddoo,' brother.
younger brother, Bheem.No one can learn
The basis of might isto assimilate everything.
and the capability ofreceiving all the information.
The aim of might is focus.The Almighty gave man might
it is of no use.In other words,
Whenever you arein a battle or struggle
around you inconspicuously.Your mere bellow had killed
in the great war,my bellow
Indeed, Bheem.When the Almighty himself
has given birth to theheir of the Kuru family.
the one with numerouspositive qualities...
Emperor Shantanu.On this happy occasion
in the kingdom.Subjects of the kingdom
By the grace of Godtoday, the ancestors
An heir to take forwardthe lineage
I am extremely happy thatmy younger brother,
please the ancestors.On behalf of the royal family
and prayers in allof the kingdom.
member of the Kuru familyfill the hearts of our subjects
the arrangements.This is the order of the
Hail King Dhritarashtra!Hail King Dhritarashtra!
Hail King Dhritarashtra!Where is the princess
brought misfortune to me?Your Majesty...
with great difficulty.Then, wake her up!
sleep peacefully?Gandhari!
Hundred!You had promised me a 100
Where is the heir to my throne?The one who would make
The blessings of Lord Shankar*cannot go in vain.
a life of humiliation.Is that the boon
a boonor is all of it fabricated?
No one can predictbirth and death.
I have always beendisappointed by you.
blindfolding yourself.Yet, I didn't remarry.
but still, she giftedhim with a son.
I was consideratetowards your feelings.
a son at the right time.That's why... You haven't gifted
I have honoured youmore than you deserve.
you would have delivereda child by now.
my mistake very soon.The way you have hurt me by not
I will do somethingwhich will hurt you
It will hurt you at every step.Lord!
such a condition, sister.What else shall I do, brother?
I will obviously have to cry!- No, Gandhari!
that, Gandhari.You will give birth to a baby,
addressing it as a misfortune.Consider it as meditation.
How much more paindo I have to bear?
the sweeter its fruits are.But my husband is
I have always disappointedhim as a wife.
I had attained myhusband's love.
No, Gandhari!You shouldn't worry
over his anger.But he wouldn't dare
that you will be the one tocarry his 100 sons.
a message from the King.What is the message?
But I have taken an oath.I will not leave the temple
What? - The order is foryour head maid.
The King has asked Sugadhato beautify herself
to come to his room.Me?
I will not go, Queen.Is this the idea
What are you raving, maid?Sugadha will not go.
Follow the King's order.Go, Sugadha.
his heart is full of anger.He tries to punish the person
But whenever we lose hope andour desires are shattered
There can be many reasons whydesires are left unfulfilled.
and some due to our destiny.And sometimes, the
Without considering thecircumstances
The basis of justice is mercyPity.
It means...Dealing with someone's offence
Isn't that being unfair?Think for yourself.
your mother.What crime are you
Why have you turned me intoa culprit before my husband?
or be the cause of my death!Either take birth
Either take birthor be the cause of my death!
Be the cause!Move aside!
Is it a son or a daughter?Answer me!
Answer me!Why isn't my son next to me?
My son...Where is my son?
Not a sonyou have given birth
Council-Head, please ask them ofthe impairments.
In order to reinstate the trustlet such wealth be bestowed
Your Highness.In my opinion, the princes
their trust in justiceand it will serve as a moral
Your Highness!Excuse me, Your Highness!
Your Highness!There is no need to worry
about Duryodhanyou'd be quite worried,
so soon, Your Highness.There is nothing to worry about.
The wound will heal soon,Your Highness.
Shakuni?What wound?
is out of danger, Your Highness.What!
How?Answer me, Shakuni.
Who's weapon it wasthat injured Duryodhan
I mean, the attackers ofPrince Duryodhan
The ones who spilled my son'sblood will have but one fate!
- But, Dhritarashtra.This would be atrocious.
Forgive us, Your Highness.Please do not take our lives.
Forgive us, Your Highness!Spare us from a death sentence,
what sort of justice is this?I have inspected
at all.My son's blood has been spilled,
the gravity of their crimeswhy are you concerned about
They have intended forthe death of the Prince.
Even if the accusationsagainst them are true
I've been reigning formany years now, Queen Mother.
Wait, Dhritarashtra.Such stoicism
was always a lovingand kind-hearted ruler.
Bhishma, pleasesay something to Dhritarashtra.
the king's word holdsas good as the law of the God.
But I canappeal to His Highness.
Please heed her advice.Your Highness,
Mother Queen's kin.Punishing them makes her heart
her childhood yet.Prince Shakuni, that's an act of
reminding one of his/her clanbe a crime, Chief Minister?
Keeping in mindthe feelings of Mother Queen
The fishermen are herebybanished from this province.
do they have permissionsto reside anymore.
or His Highnessaren't questionable
hence I am asking you this.When the time came to leave
rather a member of our familywould your tears have
Queen Mother?I...
Everyone is helpless.The whole province is helpless.
And probablyKing Pandu's sons wouldn't have
which the tree imparts to it.God knows,
Arjun!Arjun!
I have found brother Bheem.Sahadev!
NakulSahadev! Brother Bheem
Sit.One for Nakul.
Say your prayers first.So, are you done eating?
But as we closed out eyesto say our prayers
I stole it?Are you accusing your own
as if it were the first time!Aren't you ashamed?
you to fatten up!Go have the 'sattu'* that mother has prepared for father.
That's my 'laddoo'.Arjun,
Brother Yudishtir.Enough of it.
Let Bheem eatall those 'laddoos'.
How can I manage withjust these many 'laddoos'?
Have them in peace, Bheem.Then have some fruits as well.
half a 'laddoo' each.If the three of you eat
half a 'laddoo' left.Go.
come on.Brother. Was that love
Son Dhritarashtra.I can tell by your
Queen Mother.But justice isn't necessary to
Dhritarashtra.To be blinded so much
that you are a king.Your foremost responsibility
the subjects' fault at all.The fault was your son's.
Return them to theirrightful place. - Queen Mother
love that pond so muchthat when the pond dries up,
But maybe that'stheir helplessness.
to be as freshin your memories till date?
Today I will give youan advice, Queen Mother.
Not as a fisherman's daughter.Whoever raises his weapon
You are right, Grandsire!It isn't your skills that are
If you were capable indeedinstead of taking the lives
I...am bound by my duty, Khrisna!
In my entire life never for a momenthave I commited injustice!
Just for the sake of your dutyyou are plunging the whole world into peril!
A character is which strives towardseveryone's well being, every moment.
Khrisna!You are crossing your limit!
to call one's duties tainted!My duty is truth!
There is no such metalthat does not meal in my fire!
You are being a hindrance to worldlywell being and the course of destiny.
I shall surely slay you![MUSIC]
I am not Vasudeva Khrisna!I am not a Yadava!
that you may acquire death!Please forgive me, Khrisna!
But in order to slay me,you are willing to violate you oath.
Please tell me!Your fault is ignorance, Grandsire!
Until the roof of compassionspans the entire world
I renounced royalty for the sake of my father!I swore to a lifetime of celibacy.
of royalty were indeed great deeds!But why did you give up your responsibility
within the Kuru clanand to avoid war in Hastinapur for the throne
I took up this oath, Khrisna.Look all around you, Grandsire?
this catastrophe, this war!Ponder over it, Grandsire!
why would this great war occur?In reality, justice isn't a name
Justice is the name of life!And life changes constantly!
for the sake of change!Yet you give up on deeds, Grandsire?
in any significant action.The meaning of actions is taking decisions
That is why I suggestbrother Pandu to be crowned the King.
On the auspicious occasion of Akshay Tritiya'**Hindu holy day, believed to bring good luck and success.
Why did you not try to stop King Dhritarashtrafrom committing unrighteous deed, Your Excellency?
That is atrocious.Just do as I say!
humalliation of Panchali there...Grandsire, the whole of the Aryan
Then despite witnessing such depravity.How can you even remain quite?!
But you could not take a decision,Your Excellency.
shall live my life as a servant!The truth is that under the garb of duties
with righousness, Your Excellency.In order to free yourself from ties,
the fruits of those actions.Instead of deeming someone's order to be a duty
You had taken that oath a very long time ago.Did you know what the future
Times changed.But did you not break your oath.
this war is being waged today.Then does an oath hold no value?
entire society indeed holds value.However, the moment
then that very instantit becomes mandatory
is the decision you cannot take today.Then at least give up your weapons.
if you cannot take the decisionto engage in battle
I accept, Khrisna!If I had acquired the knowledge
But...even if not in life
Death at your hands shall bea great honour to me.
As you wish, Grandsire!No, Khrisna!
That is why I am breaking my oath!But, Khrisna, the entire world
Either way, after this battleI have to bear may insults
At this moment, Grandsire's death in inevitable!No, Khrisna!
and defeat Grandsire under my circumstances!
Please heed to my plea!My death
And ought to that reasonPrincess Amba is born as Shikhandini!
I promise!I promise, Khrisna.
on the battlefieldI shall lay down all my weapons!
But none of your soldiersshall die at my hands!
This is my decision, Khrisna!A fiery glowing visage
your daughter, father.This boon from the very gods
touch my feet.The boon from the gods
anyone rule over him.Then I have
Let's go, Dhrishtadyumna.Panchal and I, your father,
of your father soon.Definitely, father.
Isn't fatherhappy about my birth?
up the earth.His nous
father will surely come to knowthat you are the fortune
The customary bathing ritualis at hand.
Draupadi!This is your room.
Attendants!Draupadi's customary bath
*"Mixture of five products."perfumed oil and others
offerings madeto Goddess Parvati
and jewellery for the princess.Princess, you collided with
Who is this?That's your reflection.
Princess, don't you even knowwhat a mirror is?
with every form of knowledge.But not of those objects
time is at hand.Draupadi
Post that, we'd set out tovisit Goddess Parvati's temple.
I wasn't miffed.As you say, Princess.
Limits are defined byone's disposition.
One that ought to be mindedisn't a limit but a prohibition.
What would you do with it?I would get her married
She appeared out of the flamesof a 'yajna'.
It's full of joy, Princess.The entire world seems like
Mother keeps hitting me.Always pointing out faults
Okay, then.Fine.
and when I come to knowhow it feels to be a grownup
Would you be my friend?But, Princess
than this dolly of mine.My dolly will marry
to a handsome prince, Princess.How dare you snatch
It isn't courage,it is training.
it's right to considerhim as an elder brother.
Accept my greetings, friend.You seem cultured.
the princes of Hastinapurto change their attitude.
It is the center of my sharpbrains and limitless powers.
these arrangements for me.Hereafter, you will have equal
there will be abundanceof facilities.
on a golden platebut one cannot cook in it.
of this hermitage.It's human nature
to get all the happiness.That's why we always
We try to increase ourcomforts and facilities.
that we always provideour children
How would comforts benefit them?The ones who are provided
Hard work makes the bodyhealthier.
it becomes more radiant.We have experienced it.
soul experience difficultieseven they become stronger.
our children awayfrom hard work and sorrow
These lovely clothes and goldwhy are you putting them
father's orders.Did your father
But your father had decidedto renounce poverty
Poverty is still verydear to him.
lead my life begging for alms.Why is that, mother?
Why does father hate prosperity?Today, I was being friends with
But fathershut the door of that
types of friendship.The best form of friendship is
and principleswork hard for the welfare
friendship is whenall the friends together
the society and thewelfare of the nation.
of viceswhere attempts are made
you share with the Kuru prince?What benefits would you derive
in life until nowthat I can chose?
he is being friends with you nowbecause you are
had a bitter experience in life.You had a bitter experience
Ashwathama is only...- Only?
The best clothing?Gold ornaments?
Would he be satisfied with that?You seem to forget
and the son of the discipleof the great Parshuram.
The throne of Panchal.I will crown you
promise, son.It's a promise.
I won't be able to forgetthe humiliation I'd endured.
who is capable of doing this?Wake up.
Not now.We will wake up
throughout the night.Go away.
Wake up, elder brother.The teacher is here.
Wake up!- Sire!
is called a student.Everyone should assemble
A new life begins forall of you today.
The first day of acquiringknowledge is more important
what will all of your learnin the coming years
There on the branch of the treea wooden bird has been placed.
Yudhistir, you arethe eldest of them all
sitting on the branch.There are other branches
I shoot the arrowthat the nest should not fall.
there is an ant hill down there.It may break.
That's amazing, dear.You can see so many
needed in a good rulerwhich is naturally
Whatever brother had seen,I see the same things.
You could see so many thingsbut you couldn't see whether
- Of course.Go around the entire hermitage
Aim at your target.What do you see?
tree, Sire.What should I drop?
placed on the branchhas to be pierced in a way
How is that possible, Sire?An attack will surely
on the aftermathuntil there is no control on
Place the bow down.Go back to your place.
the Kuru princeswho can pierce the bird's eye.
Arjun.Aim at the target.
the bird's eye, Sire.Shoot the arrow.
slay Yudhishthir.Charioteer, proceed
it's time to takethe third step.
from Guru Drona's protection.Of course, Madhav.
Release the spheres of fire!Attack the unit
Soldiers, get ready to attack.Attack only once Guru Drona
Commander Dhrishtadyumna.And Commander Dhrishtadyumna
only for a short while.Friend
Once I attack AshwatthamaGuru Drona will come to me
no one will be thereto protect Prince Duryodhan.
Kill my Duryodhan!No.
I... Anyhow, I need to sendthis message to Duryodhan.
is in danger, Sanjay.I am feeling
Do something quickly.The great sage Ved Vyas
of that divine sightwill have to be borne by us,
to protect him?Tell me.
has always dreamtof defeating me.
I challenge you!Select the weapon
enough faith in meto know that I never sin.
by leaving Kurukshetra?Catching a glimpse of you
Today, this is my placeof pilgrimage, grandsire.
that you plan to attack.You never lie.
towards Hastinapurto mount an attack...
I never said so, grandsire.Vasudev must have been aware
command me to proceedtowards Hastinapur.
victorious against youbut I will surely fight you.
is in danger.He is battling Prince Arjun.
are capable enoughto defeat him.
can never be in danger.Guru Drona!
you keepGuru Drona occupied...
away from the battlefield...The better the chances
The final stage of our strategyand our final step
as much timeas you can.
or have you lostyour self-confidence?
My childdo not act foolishly.
A smart warrior does not justaccept a challenge.
I shall crush this worm.Possible, but not inevitable.
at this moment.In this situation,
Soldiers, attack!Soldiers, attack!
all our ancestorsand our descendents.
They are ridiculingyour parents!
I need to leaveat the earliest
None of your strategieswill be successful, Arjun.
Why did you declare warwhen you fear death?
Are you a Kshatriyaor a eunuch?
Upon your arrival in Hastinapur,I wanted to be the first one
The truth is...My heart never abandoned
and at the feet of the Almighty.I am not worthy of this.
And my father had taught mein my childhood
of the subjects.That is why, as a child,
all the injustice done to meso that she would help me
Just now, my motherhas refused to reside with me
I did not come to the palaceto look for a new mother, Queen.
This was just an old wishthat I fulfilled today.
of my arch enemyas my own, I do not wish to let
I...I saw you in the arena.
of equal skills.We are not equals.
And this enmity stemsfrom the fact
is mine.And the place where
to be seated there.I have no place at
deem me as your competitorbut I do not deem you as mine.
as mercury corrodes gold.Are you telling all this
Karna?What is the point of saying so
and not iron.And where valour is nothing
but iron.Iron.
such insulting language.Karna...
elder brother...He is like your elder brother.
elder brother Duryodhan.King of Anga Pradesh
And our weaponsshall not differentiate either.
King of Anga Pradesh,you are welcome here.
Oh Princes, who cherishtheir birth as their ornaments
all will know the truthabout their valour and birth.
If we ever cross pathsin the battlefield someday
And not in a village fair.And as for your promise
gave me great solace, son.The earth was trembling today
felt as thoughthere were a battle
After all, you have givenelder brother such a name.
will not be easy.You are correct, Dusshasan.
And your sons are inarguablythe most superior, father!
would have seemed true.There was no verdict?
Your Excellency.The King of Anga Pradesh,
- That is why, this competitiondid not have any verdict.
is on my side now.My friend and my associate.
but also has the capacityto become a fine prince.
he brought governanceto the kingdom of Anga
and magnified his strengthand that of his kingdom greatly.
of both these concepts.Your Excellency
Physical might is not the onlyrequirement to rule a kingdom.
from the lionthe small and weak animals
Our teacher had narratedsuch a tale to us.
only they speak of alliances,uncle.
To know about the strengthof my limbs
who got a taste of the groundof the arena today.
Tomorrow, I will eat and digestthe whole of the arena.
then be present in the arena.My name is Vrakodar.
The competitionhas now ended, son.
May all of you be prosperous!Today's competition
were being tested today.That is why, this competition
took part in this competitionand displayed their art
If no verdict could be reachedthen have the competition
the competition is out tomorrowthen you will be
Allows us to start the battleor order us to put down
his approval for battle,will you put down your weapon?
Issue an order to give up!Sire! You know that 
on behalf of my fatherhas been given to me!
My heart is bound and so too my mind...
like any other souls!My soul can't issue
give rise to both curseor gift.
In this warpunish all your enemies to death!
May you be victorious!Please, your majesty!
*Special mantra for Mahadev/Shiva.Majesty, tread carefully!
and offerings of milk!Even in unknown surroundings,
My own royal chamber is like getting in my way, Sanjay!
I have turned blind,Sanjay!
Brother!Great Sage Vyas has arrived!
Gandhari!Great sage!
Please help me reassure my heart.I don't have any knowledge on how
I'm just here to deliveran unfortunate news.
Oh sage!Her majesty's passed away!
afraid of the dark.Therefore, they close their eyes
and Kuru dynastywill sink into a terrible darkness!
for the next world!Her majesty was the ruler
her urn.Here,
such ash urn, majesty!Her majesty Satyavati leads a good life, that's 
receiving her urn?Learning this news, how can you bear
of the Kuru dynasty?I want to know, great sage!
If you want to know the futurethen comprehend this moment.
If you desire to witness this battleI will grant you a divine vision!
No, great sage!No!
do you want to have this divine vision?No, great sage!
throughout life.So, now
I...I've cloaked myself
face realities!So...
do you want to have this divine vision?I'm sorry, great sage!
I will surely now presenton the battlefield.
then please grant me with that divine vision,
of battle from him.Sanjay!
always satisfied with arrogance, that is who you are, majesty.
This vision seems like enemy to the other eyes,am I right, majesty?
Vasudev!Krishna...
from both sides.Please drive the chariot slowly 
To which direction will you see?And what do you want to confirm?
I want to observe the enemy's army, Krishna!And my own troops as well.
will establish justice,and whose death will uphold injustice.
and what would I lose.You have made sacrifice just coming 
But the sacrifice is onewhere donors give and all the world benefit!
Countless soldiers here are to lay down their lives.I want to make sure
destroy injusticeor along I will jeopardize justice too.
Supreme God himself effects creation and destruction, Arjun!
responsibility to yourselfand let your vanity grows?
does not own anythingis one to achieve something important!
Go ahead and lookwhat you want to!
actions are not taken into accountin the truest sense!
to the Prince of Mathura, Kanshas surrounded us.
there is just onebig kingdom, Panchal.
and their kings do not havethe might to stop Jarasandh.
The most powerful kingdomin the south is Vidarbha.
- Panduwhen you set out
from many kings.If you do not do so
and attack our kingdomsome day or the other.
a very serious topic.To dispense sound advice
is present here.Greetings, brother.
We need your assistance.In other words, does
grandsire call me here?I would have been here
I can only request to you,brother
the skies thunderanimals are bound
is like an order.So, tell me, Your Highness.
or given me life imprisonment?Son, what are you saying?
the elder brother, Queen Mother.Being the elder brother
Listen to me, brother.Expunge your heart
And even grandsireand Queen Mother agree
This rank will be abovethat of a Chief Minister.
Will such a rank be formedonly for me?
a blind man dispense?The darkness of his vision
Brother...- Let it be, Pandu.
I would cry to see the moon.Then mother Ambika would place
was better than the moon.She would say that people
to be able to eat the sweet.I am not a child anymore.
But I do have questionin my mind.
* Sacrificial offering.** Sacred texts.
based on righteousness.So... - But brother,
According to you, righteousnesschanges according to situations.
But for me,tradition is righteousness
that one gets one's rightbut only after
have enlisted our competenciesand Pandu has even proven
Chief Minister?Even I did not
prove my competence, brother.If you like you may test me.
but only a personwho has to it.
Just like the progeny ofthe Princess of Gandhar.
Chief Minster?Goodbye.
What should I answer him?For the injustice done to him
Righteousness can neverlead to injustice, Queen Mother.
what happened to him was unjust.And even Gandhari's brother
If two walls are at loggerheadsthen the ceiling
go against each otherthen the Kuru dynasty
To keep King Shantanu's kingdomas an integrated entity
Bhishma, we must put an endto Dhritarashtra's doubt.
Where will we find a maidenwho will bless Hastinapur
the future of Hastinapur.Whose presence will magnify
It was not a mistakebut a crime.
To snatch its motherfrom a child
from its mother is notsurrounded by the world
The King has sent you a message.He has asked you to return
The day of your 'swayamvarhas been decided.
You are back.Come here.
my 'swayamvar' already?Yes, dear.
But father...- No, Kunti.
then its answeris always doubtful.
But what ifthe heart is filled with fear
cannot be executed, father.This is what you had said.
Then what are you afraid of,Kunti?
that keepstormenting my heart.
Something that wouldtarnish my reputation
Then what keeps tormenting you?Father...
Dream of happier times ahead.I have complete faith
the very finest of them all,will become your husband.
have been invitedto the 'swayamvar'.
He is organising a 'swayamvarfor his daughter Kunti.
She is not eventhe daughter of King Kuntibhoj.
King Kuntibhoj has adopted her.If she is not even a princess
Queen Mothera mango sapling is taken
And the new piece of landmakes the mango even sweeter.
of Kunti and Yadavawill get strengthened.
of becoming Hastinapur's Queen.I have heard that
and her service was such thateven a short-tempered sage like
such a difficult taskmust have the virtues
Princesswhat were you about to tell
the daughter whom hedeems to be pure and chaste
It is a secret which, beforethe kings of the region of Arya
His Highness hasboundless faith in you.
That was a mistake in your past.There is no point
How can I forget about it?How do I forget about it,
sends chills down my spine.I am very pleased with
from my serviceI, sage Durvasa,
able to invoke any Godand call him to you
Thank you, sire.I accept your invitation, Kunti.
- Yes, Kunti.Greetings.
When you chant this mantrawhile taking the name of a God
Then how did I not get burnt?I have regulated my temperature
about to conceivewill similarly have
Sire.How... How did you
arise out of amazementor from the desire
to him with the stick I madeusing blades of grass.
is making his entrance!Your Highness
is the punishmentgiven to the princes.
all the other court membersneed to vacate the court.
that it was necessaryto punish them.
to your decision.The question is as to
Pandu's sons and mine.In what manner
knows no bounds?Your Highness!
with unfamiliar people.Until now, Kunti
but now that they are livingunder the same roof
of one's character.In other words,
grandsire?Dhritarashtra!
it acts as an armour.If that love becomes a weapon
the familial love has madethe princes impudent.
that princes should gain wisdomby residing in seminaries.
lies with which 'Brahmin',Vidur?
or a knower ofscriptures and weaponry
Arjun.Why did you enter the court
I wished to show thisto grandsire.
Arjun and our other brothers?Brother Yudhishthir
have gone with him.Arjun has gone
if you wish to duel.No, no. We have not come here
*Pramanakoti was a beautiful spot on the banks of Ganges, north of Hastinapura.The fruits that grow
We have brought some for you.Delicious.
Let us go.Today we have organised
For us?- Yes.
That was our mistake,brother Bhim.
is our duty.It took you quite some time
brother Bhim.It would be better if we make up
will jubilate in Praman Koti.Indeed. Let me go call
Dushashan will go and call them.Dushashan, when Arjun
Nakul and Sahadevare done with the yoga
Shall we go, brother Bhim?If you are fearful
We shall leave after some time.Fear?
Let us go.This way.
is making his entrance!The eminent son
The great Bhishma.Greetings.
What crimehas Hastinapur committed
you are leaving the palace?If a proper and apt welcome
the woods practicing the Vedasgreat Bhishma.
Only a few riverscan achieve this task.
with the fire of this enmityand become arid like a desert.
why the news of your arrivalwas not conveyed to me
whose heart never dries upand who does not let enmity
with one's wife's brotheris not something Lord Parashuram
what Kripacharya said.I may not be a true Brahmin
such a teacher.This way, Drona.
Take this and feed itto the son of Pandu.
in the path of Duryodhanwill be gotten rid of
to gaining somethingdeception is more potent
to the struggles of lifeand when man does not
in his own strengththen he renounces virtues
born in man's life onlywhen his psyche
can bear righteousness.What is self-confidence?
make him weakthen he loses faith in himself.
to free himself of it.But when he believes that
is strengthened with exercisethen with each struggle,
self-confidence is nothing buta state of mind.
brother Bhim.Many snakes and serpents
Indeed. Did you notsay something about a feast?
Let us proceed.Please come this way.
Look at all this.Such varied dishes.
Especially for you.When the rest of the brothers
brothers Yudhishthir, ArjunNakul, Sahadev and the rest
on his way here with them.And it would be inappropriate
We shall wait.Brother Bhim, how about
need to alter the taste or not.Indeed.
- No, no!We shall only taste these.
Indeed.I am a great cook myself.
First, you must get a whiff.Then you must take in the aroma.
and flower's aromassatiate your heart.
Our chefs makethe tastiest of 'kheer'.
of the brothers eat?If you insist so much
I shall eat you after a while.Duryodhan.
Me?No, brother Bhim.
Have some.No, I cannot eat this.
Nothing.I was just ribbing you.
But brother Arjunif you leave the city
Sahadevif the cows are
no reverence of the city.We need those one lakh cows
about the future as well.How will you live by yourself
without your protectionwhat will become
You can see the future,can you not?
But I have a bad feelingthat Indraprastha is
is going to happen here.And at a time like this
Please let me go get the cows!Sahadev!
You do not even have the weaponsbestowed by the Gods.
I have to do this.We need to conduct the
Yudhishthir becomes King soon!But think about his situation
that you have made such abig sacrifice to make him King
Had we been fivethis would have been
Sahadev.I am making
- No, brother.I can go to Panchali's chamber
Wise men say that whenone is altruistic with food
one's body and soulstay healthy.
that My Lord had tobreak his oath?
Brother YudhishthirTakshak stole the cows
has gone after him.Nakul, the venom needs to be
Brother Bheem,brother Arjun has said that you
Let's go, Nakul.Bheem, I shall come with you.
were generatedusing computer graphics.
If you are willingto take my refuge
Take your refuge!The refuge of a human?
son of Pandu.Kill me.
of not killing serpents.But until you give into fatigue
I accept my defeat at the momentson of Pandu.
has not ended yet.Today, if
that Ishall certainly be back
I shall be waiting.We had taken an oath,
Panchali's chamberwithout her permission.
ArjunI am the eldest son
in my penance.May your penance
always meet withappreciation, Arjun.
then you must certainly go to Saurasen's kingdom.**Surasena, present-day Braj region in Uttar Pradesh.
entire Aryan region!Brother Bheem
and lead a controlled life.Do not say that, brother.
hamper one's penance?We shall meet very soon, friend.
Manipur* in the East*A state in northeastern India, with the city of Imphal as its capital.
I wish to see those regions.You may certainly go there.
you must cometo the city near Dwaraka
Chandra* had been blessed with a new life there.*The Lunar deity Soma (lit. "juice"), the juice of sap in the plants and thus makes the Moon the lord of plants and vegetation.
Pardon me, Panchali.Before taking
your permission.You have taken the correct
will benefit our kingdom.And I...
May there be appreciationin your penance, My Lord.
are all gamesof time and tide.
and by its ruleswe must abide.
Time is the strongestin the world.
Only that happenswhat is destined.
Time is the strongestin the world.
Actions are more importantthan the amenities of life.
Once again, lifein the woods lies ahead.
If I am a dedicatedand faithful wife
will ever hurt you.Sacrifice and truth
in order to avenge the insultmy husband and children are ready to take weapon in the war.
without selfish motives in mind.Wait.
who you really are?Panchali,
I know his name, My Lord.I even know what is his relation to us.
Son Abhimanyu.Panchali do not ask what all people know.
Some carry flood.Some bring beautiful bath.
Tell that to mother.I...
But the glory will go to my father.I shield my brothers.
But above all,above all, I am kohl* for the eyes of Mother Panchali,
I could wipe the entire existense.These are my tears,
He is your son.He is surely mine.
New eraalways begins with the destruction, Majesty.
Every war causes great destruction.Tell me what will be destroyed.
to the Almighty?As a result, only he is still alive.
be destroyedare those who has not been in the path 
Great Sage.His Majesty Bisma, great teacher Dorna,
Mars, Mercury, Venus, SaturnRahu, Ketu,* Sun and Moon
than any warriors from each side, Majesty.When it's time for someone to die
strengthen your heart.Survive the blow, Majesty.
Are all my childrenwill die in the war?
which has the protection of the Almighty.Which have the protection of the Most Powerful?
do not have the protection of the Most Powerful?It has been so
My children...will die...
There must be a wayto keep my children alive, O' Great Sage!
You can save any of your sons' life, Majesty.One son!
They were supposed to build my husband's empire.And you say
Your Excellency, it is also not an easy taskhowever
can stay alive.Who can stay alive?
This is your decision to choose.Do you want him to stay alive, Majesty?
I can not even sayif this arrangement will benefit your children,
is one of the beneficial.Kuru dynasty would disappear
I can not even sayif this arrangement
The burning of lights at the foot of the Almightyis one of the beneficial.
But you have declared war.Who knows how many princes
have Uttara married before the war?Being recorded for the alignment of the object 
war begins.We still have four months with us,
held in just four months?What needs to arrange a Swayamvar?
There you go.It is a Swayamvar.
shouldn't we marry Uttara and Abhimanyuat the earliest possible?
And Uttarais the great Matsya dynasty descendant.
the three major dynasties, King Virat.Impossible!
Abhimanyu is a great warrior.Kshatriya's daughters are married in a Swayamvar, Majesty.
How about the future of our Uttara?Queen Sudeshna
in accordance to your plan?Do you
But even youdo not have right to time.
no right to time.However, I have faith
that Uttara would give birth to the greatest empire of the entire nation.
While his sonwill begin the first phase in the transformation.
to peace and tranquility.If your daughter was born
not all dreams are realisedin this world.
then in some formor through a medium
married to themost competent warrior
and it shallindeed be fulfilled!
and if there is a competentperson amongst them
Did you see that, Pateshwar?I came here and the King
This is certainly a sign.Be quiet, Batukeshwar.
it does not mean thatall 'Brahmins' are like him.
We will be insulted.Pateshwar, there is
One of you should go thereand give it a try.
recognizes us then...We should go from here,
Let's go.What is this foolishness
Where are you going,young 'Brahmins?
Turning one's back to actionsmust also be termed excellence.
anything, 'Brahmins?To think only of one's joy,
towards the worldis utter selfishness.
Is such altruistic behaviournot the basis of
If you have true competencethen come forth.
and possiblyyour welfare may also
then it must be correct.Go on, Arjun.
have been filled with the zealto display their might.
then how can they lift a bow?Go back, 'Brahmin.
the last drop of your dignity.Think of Lord Parashuram
the art of weaponryare 'Brahmins.
that this competitionis solely for you, Prince.
my greetings.Vasudev Krishna
and Princes DraupadiI bow before you.
Every womanis a form of Goddess Durga.
If you accidentally get marriedto the Princess, 'Brahmin
And the wife...The wife is the deity
Let's see if the valuesimparted to you
All hail the great 'Brahmin!All hail the great 'Brahmin!
All hail the great 'Brahmin!All hail the great 'Brahmin!
He won!All hail Mahadev!
around his neck this instantotherwise I shall have my
Engage in a grappling combatwith me, Krishna!
If you dieyour parents will be spared.
Do you still wishto engage in a combat
to embrace death.I took an oath to save millions
All hail Shri Krishna!All hail Shri Krishna!
All hail uncle Shri Krishna!All hail uncle Shri Krishna!
All hail uncle Shri Krishna!Uncle, did the possibility
How could you gathercourage at that moment?
Dearwhere there is affection
Being the reason of deathof the people who gave you life
of the creationis a part of the Almighty.
The way a flowerspreads fragrance
spreads a foul smell in itsimilarly
One's joymakes
are alike in the world?That is correct,
Because of Kansa,the entire Yadava society
the entire Aryan regionhad to witness the destruction
because of Duryodhanthe entire Kuru kingdom
exploited and tortured.When unhappiness
while the majorityexperience sorrow.
in order to put an endto the unrighteous
relationshipsand love hold no meaning.
nor does one hope for joy.This is the situation
must either make a sacrificeor accept the unrighteousness of
The decisionrests with all of you.
Similarlynone of you will derive
to take the decisionto sacrifice yourself
hearts of the sons of Panduso that they can pardon
have the capacity within themto pardon others, Vidur.
What could have made him proposethe idea of avoiding a war?
Duryodhan and Dusshasanaccept this proposal?
Uncle,the sons of Pandu
even the most treacherous planlies with Vasudev Krishna,
Goodbye.May your journey be fruitful.
Minister Viduris proceeding towards the city of Virat.
my darling.Before the war
taken care of by me.His Excellency Bhishma
and Great Archer Karna arethe great warriors on our side.
to demonstrate their greatness.That is why
Vasudev Krishnaand that too,
uncle?My darling
Krishna will certainly come herebecause we have sent Sanjay
it is mandatoryfor Vasudev Krishna
you need to makea strong and illusory rope
*Airavata, a white elephant.Lord Indra's mount.
Just watchhow Vasudev Krishna
shall go beyondthe physical realm
Bless you,son!
become your prideand not your tie.
Bless you!May you live long!
but a decisionand a vow.
is not a duty.It is a vow
Mother Draupadi.May I be able to serve you
husbands of yoursthe entire lineage
The entire dynasty will beannihilated in this war.
the required compassionto take the decision
My blessings...I bless you to...
The blessing to a long lifeis the right of a person
it is merely a hope.Whatever Arjun has got
I got a wife, mother.Your daughter-in-law.
ordered us five brothersto divide her amongst ourselves.
into five parts, mother?How?
Stop, dear!But Arjun, why...
for a woman?It is charity, mother.
that all forms of charityin the world
fortune had opened up.Mother, you could have
the right to give ordersdo not have the right
at what I have got as charity.Whatever Arjun has got
I got the daughter of Drupad,King of Panchal, as charity.
into five parts, mother?Draupadi...
It was my mistake.But
Never had I imaginedthat Arjun...
Were you that certainof your plans, Lady Kunti?
both fate and destinyand realize all your plans?
You have every rightto be angry with me.
then the river is not at fault.But even the deer
in this situation?You are not at fault.
your state of mind.The mere thought
Butthat will not happen.
also have the rightto abrogate them.
not to follow my orders.This life, this world
are parts of lifeOnly that happens
in the world.Time is the strongest
Marry Draupadithis instant, son.
And right after thatyou must go to Kampilya.
They fly away instantly.If a place involves
stay there for long.You should go.
near the kingdom of Panchal.Drop me off?
in Arjun's marriagebut we four brothers cannot.
What are you saying, son?Why will you not be able
then what problemdo you have with it?
but not the wordsuttered by one.
sink into the heartthey emerge in some form
wise men saythat the one who utters words
But sonit was...
was also a mistake, mother.But for that
It is not that thingsdone unintentionally
to fulfill them.Unknowingly, you have
And the moral dilemmais that, mother
Answer me.Answer me.
Yudhishthirtell me.
All of us have decided thatwe will meditate, mother.
He shall marry herand we four brothers
Similarlyfinding solutions
you won the competitionbased solely on your competence,
What did I do, Princethat made
Maybe fate is at fault here.Fate.
My Govind says so himself.That very fate
us five brothers.Now, even if mother wants to
no answers to yourother questions, Princess.
marry my eldest brother.Pardon me, dear
will meet with misfortuneand establishing righteousness
in the path to defeatingthe Kauravas
to back out from this warthen I can release you
Either back out from this waror give up the protection
Lord Indra.For the sake
in such a grave deceptionwith me, Lord Indra.
What have you done,Lord Indra?!
Yes, Arjun.Now, there will be no obstacle
so unjustly, father?!By rendering my enemy weak
If there is no challengethen how can there be
are very strong, Lord Indra.But the stem of a lotus
Today, you have taintedmy reputation, Lord Indra.
even to this day.Even today, whenever someone
I begin to doubtthat had Ekalavya
gravely tainted, father.By asking for the armour and
my reputation further, father.Because of me
Didyou not have faith
in his Gandiva?Or did you not have faith
It was a partof Surya Dev himself.
It was necessaryto have it removed.
shall be present on your flagand not in your chariot.
I could have slainKing Karna of Anga
However by asking for the armour and
You have snatched the joyof victory from me, father.
the weakness of my enemydid I gain victory.
his armour and ear-rings!That is impossible,
will never take back anythinghe gave away as charity.
Go ahead,dear Karna.
with my presenceand give him nothing in return
Go ahead.Ask for anything you like,
An unfailing weaponwhich, when released in the
Arjunyou will indeed die at my hands.
to slay youvery soon...
Karna!Karna!
Karna!Karna!
Karna!Son!
King of Gandhar.The war begins tomorrow
an enterprise of this magnitudeit is quite natural to stagger,
compels him to become heedless.Various situations arise
And what arethe various situations
When did I ever give riseto a situation?
And our reactionsin those situations
had your sister marriedto a blind man
was born in your heart.And by taking an oath
you have bound yourselfto that situation.
Duryodhan.The first one is
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
To fight me is difficult.That is why
even the time to be fearful.All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
May you be victorious,my dear.
I shall stay right herein Hastinapur.
Go on.The first to compete
All hail Prince Nakul!Mother, brother Nakul
when he was in Hastinapurhe used to make me laugh a lot?
All hail Prince Nakul!All hail Prince Nakul!
Your Majesty, Prince Nakuljust made a wondrous entrance.
Your Majestyamong Prince Duryodhan
greater talent and skill.Wonderful, son!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
sister-in-law.Uncle.
step towards victory, dear.Who is next?
of the Pandavas!All hail Prince Sahadev!
Why not Bheem?You must first get rid of
All hail Prince Sahadev!All hail Prince Sahadev!
Sanjay.What is happening at the moment?
and Prince Sahadevthe former is exhibiting
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
my second son as well.All hail Prince Duryodhan!
a new name, Nakul.Now, we are not the Kauravas
to be quite endearing.It seems as though
any premonition today?I have the premonition
after defeat?Nakul, brother Bheem had told me
I must not tire Duryodhan out.He does not want
because of fatigue.Sire, if the third competitor
is certainly a deception.This is deception.
they will not fight Duryodhan.All this facade
I know this, Vidur.But...
with no alternative.Now, it is Yudhishthir's turn,
the competition in no time.But if you are unable to do so
in their beautyare afraid of their reflection
If you try to corruptYudhishthir's interior
Yudhishthir.Yudhishthir?
and the rest not here?And between whom is this
and uncle Pandu.How can that be possible?
And is uncle goingto descend from heaven?
I have given you my wordto stay quiet, son.
Indeed, father.Whether Duryodhan wins
Next is Prince Yudhishthirof the Pandavas!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
are exhibiting equal valourin the competition.
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
Recollect my words.Yudhishthir, you truly
runs through your veins?From whom did your characterless
Did Queen Gandharigive birth to a lump of flesh?
has been delivered.But why, Lord?
so much ofsorrows and grievances?
Yudhisthir's misfortune!My father used to say...
for his protection.A lone tree gets uprooted
it doesn't get uprooted.Kunti
for his protection.You have to invoke the deities
four more heirs from you.Hail Lord Mahadev!
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
Hail Lord Mahadev!Let's go, Sanjay.
- It's sire Bheeshma, King.King, I've learnt that
- Yes.I am going to
I've taken an oathto extend my kingdom all over!
I don't needanybody's permission!
I kept followingthese obligations so far!
Disperse!Do take your own decisions.
The water of such a riveris not fit for drinking.
What did I gain by takingdecisions while staying calm?
The Queen Mother got me marriedto the Princess of Gandhar.
But what did I gain?What?
But still, I accepted herat your behest.
What did I gain?What and when has
Brother, what will you gain byfollowing the path of warfare?
That pain fetches the heat outof their bodies.
I want to feel the pain ofwounds caused by swords.
I don't want to hear that.I don't want to hear that...
a lump of flesh.What sort of irony
I have always been atthe mercy of people.
What will they think of me?What sort of a man am I
I couldn'tgive her a child.
To expect a child from Gandhariwas our mistake.
God's blessing nevergoes in vain.
She has delivered the sourceof a 100 babies.
Now, the personwho can bring them
Shakuni, what is the sage doing?He has prepared
*"Earth Womb"Vedvyas has said that
and give life to my children?Vedvyas doesn't
to the 'Kshiti Garbha'.Greetings, mother.
the royal family with...I have embedded them
floating in clarified butterthat has been specially treated.
many unique miraculousherbs.
and gave you this boonyou must have had a desire
this unspoken desire of yours.A daughter will be born
is his strength.Yudhisthir will be known for
But a king's deeds andjustness receive respect
I want a son, Kuntiwho has the strength of
brings about cycloneshe destructs mountains and
What does the sightlook like?
in any of the urns?Is there...
This caveis filled with the lives of my
each of these urns.Just like the one in your
feel it, Your Highness?Not just flutter but a quake.
His son, in spite of beingthe oldest in the royal family
Just watch.My 100 sons will be
Strength!Strength!
son, Your Highness?Then you will do
has deceived you,Your Highness.
she has given you a 100 ordinarysoldiers, Your Highness.
One of them will carryhis sword for him.
And one of them will alsohave to pick up his slippers,
Your Highness.Or else, you are
She went through so much painand gave you a 100 princes.
to bring them upas a 100 ordinary soldiers?
Your Highness.This is a very complex question.
you only will have toanswer it.
I am here to fulfil the boonof Sage Durvasa.
Half the body ofyour son
in his arms.His enemies will shiver on
The whole world will know himby the name of Vrikodar Bheem.*
My Bheem.I will go and get
Bheem!Bheem...
Vishwakarma, himselfis helping the sons of Pandu
In other wordsto aid them in the
one lakh cows.Why do I hear a tone of doubt
to the impoverishedbut when being charitable
I am alludingto Prince Duryodhan,
The Crown Prince will not breakhis promise, Your Excellency.
one lakh cows, Minister?Why do we not send
King of Gandhar?I am not being sarcastic,
The true property of a kingdomis not represented by
is its subjects.Beloved Duryodhan knows that.
my nephewwill give away
If he exhausts his fortuneby helping the Pandavas
how will hegain all this wealth again?
go to great painsto make the kingdom prosperous,
In other wordsthe subjects of Hastinapur
What do you mean?Your Highness
are leaving Hastinapurand migrating to Indraprastha.
migrate to Indraprasthathen Hastinapur will never be
then what will the Minister do?A mahout* uses love to control an elephant, King of Gandhar.
the elephant neverforsakes the mahout.
to control the subjects.Certainly,
But before one learnsto control it with love
You seem to be forgetting this,Your Excellency.
to leave the city.This is what I feel,
an announcement.No subject of Hastinapur
Your Highness, why usea sword to kill an ant?
If you allow methen in order to stop
of Hastinapurto leave the city.
Your Excellency.Close the gates of the city!
We must leave post-haste!- Open the gates!
Make haste!Let's go.
- Let's go! - Open the gates!Open the gates! - Make haste!
to arrest all the subjects.Open the gates!
My Lord...My Lord,
The subjects are leavingthe city, King of Anga.
You need to be stern with them!What are you thinking?!
Father!My son is still inside!
While closing the gatesof the city
I have accepted this dutyand I shall decide
Father...Father!
- Open them!Please calm down!
- Please do not do this!No one is allowed
has given the orderthat if anyone tries
Open the gates...I request all of you.
Return to your homes, please!Our entire family
The people who are outsidewill be imprisoned and punished.
All of you need toreturn to your homes.
Open the gates!- Radheya!
Are you leavingthe city as well?
but fate brought me here again.My father is outside the city
Just like me, the familiesof these people
an order to separate families?No one can leave
then why can we not?Do not argue with me,
what you get here as joy.There was a time
searching for happinessand seeking joy
Pardon meKing Karna.
resides not in a manbut in his crown.
but I must open these gatesand go to the other side.
if you let this maiden gothen we will not be
otherwise you shallbe imprisoned.
King Karna of Anga!King Karna of Anga
that you had to renouncethe righteousness
King Karna of Angathis maiden said
but in his crown.My father,
have a crown on their heads.That is why,
King of Anga!Do not argue with me,
Aunt Kuntithe order of His Highness
dear Dusshasan.And the order of His Highness
asking to make an exceptiononly for this maiden
and also the dignityto speak it out loud.
When I leave for thereverence of Indraprastha
unrighteousness residesnot in the crown
to be your duty?You are very beautiful.
I shall have her married toa good and handsome Prince.
Nakulin which direction
found some wheat.Hence, there must be villages
in that direction then.Let's go.
What will happenif someone recognizes us?
who else can recognize us here?Sages, we shall offer you
You have no protectoror weapons with you.
We are not five.We have...
and it is my dutyto protect all of you.
to the next village safely.This way, please.
Five young men and their mother.We must wait for them.
Where are they?We have to kill him now.
to stay in hiding.Besides, we cannot kill
Look for them!Let's go.
And to look for a personwho is hiding
Brother Yudhishthirproceed to the forest
make it to the forestI shall stay here to keep
Arjun, be careful.Let's go, mother.
of the ogre, Hidimb.A person who enters it
penetrate this illusory forest.They are bound to become
why they werehiding in this manner.
are you alright?Sahadev, that way.
How odd!Sunlight does not penetrate
must have left by now.Now, we should leave
I had ripped a tree outto clear the path.
or from somewhere else?From where did we
Brother Bheem,we should rest for a while.
rest here, mother.After entering this forest
This is an illusory forest,Nakul.
brother Yudhishthir.Nakul, working as a maid
and Panchali cannever deem herself one.
Just fifteen more daysand all of us will be free.
can see the sunlighteven before sunrise.
I have left a pieceof my apparel
when it is time to punish him.Kichak!
I shall crushhis head this instant!
Just like Jarasandhavery few people can slay Kichak.
of Kichak's death spreadsthen Duryodhan will know that
We need to stay anonymousonly for fifteen more days.
the son of Emperor DhritarashtraCrown Prince Duryodhan
King of Gandhar.Welcome,
to the city of Virat.King Virat, may there be
King of Gandhar?In the last 500 years,
the kingdom of Matsyais something
King Virat.That is a false accusation.
to the Matsya kingdomand the city of Virat
When?A year ago.
King Viratthe sons of Pandu are
then you must facethe army of Hastinapur
Crown Prince.You are welcome to command
there is no need for a battle.Crown Prince
be surpassed by no other.If an exceedingly
for the past one yearthen bring her to the court
the vow to put an endto all the evil-doers
five mighty Gandharvas.This is not the court
This is the court of King Viratwhere such lowly behaviour
Stay within your limits!Do not cross them!
we have no reason to be an enemyto the kingdom of Kuru.
migrated to the city of Viratshall have to walk in this
do acceptour hospitality tonight.
General.In the kingdom of Matsya
My decisionis that of His Highness.
Tomorrow at dawnall the guests and immigrants
order all the immigrants to behere in the court tomorrow.
by General Kichakthat he would help him
and the King of Gandharrecognize us
an unfamiliar shape, Nakul.However, a keen eye always finds
If Kichak has made a promisewith such great faith
If that is the casethen why did he not disclose
nefarious intentions.If he has discovered
try to take advantage of it!Empress Draupadi,
I knowwho you truly are, Sairandhri.*
of Hastinapurhas reached this kingdom
your true identitythen you will have to go
I shall think of the waysto protect you.
You are married to five men.Another husband
if youand your five husbands
then Duryodhan will indeed notdiscover your true identities.
One more thing.Do bring some wine with you when
This is an impossiblesituation, My Lords.
then I shall have toembrace death.
go on an exilefor another twelve years
Then we shall kill Kichakand flee from the city.
of fifteen days.Our life of anonymity
in the court tomorrowthen everyone will indeed
and King Virat hasgiven us refuge, Sahadev.
Protecting itis our responsibility.
brother Bheemif we ask ourselves
However, I canascend the throne
get killed in a battle.If I kill him myself
will never accept me.In other words
slay Virat and his sonin the battle
then I shall bringyour offenders to you.
We give our word to make youthe new King.
There is another ambitionI must fulfill
Our life of anonymitywill certainly go in vain.
Uncleare we truly going to
That old geyserwill never attack.
uncle?In the path to one's ambitions
What?One's greed.
greed for Draupadiotherwise he would never have
He does not knowthat righteousness dwells
an exile again, the Pandavaswill not forsake their duties
ever do so.In other words
will slay Kichak.I am awaiting
between Bheem and Kichakto reach my ears.
of the Pandavasgo in vain.
when I did not ask for any?It is me, brother.
I do not fear anyone.Do not keep reminding me
each person has some weaknessor the other.
while another,cannot lift heavy weights.
another is unable to recallthe things he has learnt.
who has everything?And that single weakness of ours
This gives birth to sadnessand discontentment in the heart.
or is bestowed by fatebut the same weakness,
not to be overstepped.But there are some people
defeat their weakness.What is the difference between
There is a very simple answerto it.
and houses righteousnessin his heart
In other words,God may give one weakness
only by the nous of a person.Think about it.
Are you here to helpyour elder brother again
Am I right?A king is offered services,
- But I amnot yet a king.
The throne has been awaitingyour presence all these years.
Greetings,brother Dhritarashtra.
is decided by the capabilityof a person, brother Pandu.
I have complete knowledgeof all the 'Shastras' and lores.
When the time is right,he will take the decision.
are worthless like the fruitspicked before they turn ripe.
Goodbye.Goodbye, brother Pandu.
he is envious of us, Pandubecause we are the sons
is the son of a maid!Son of a maid.
Neither does anyone ever doubtthe depth of his knowledge
And grandfather adoresa particular virtue of his
Do not call it a virtuebut vice, Pandu.
An abuse.But, brother, the truth
false intentions.You have nothing but
You should always be gleeful,brother
and it is the duty of a kingto uphold justice.
I am enthroned as king, Pandu.I am always skeptical, right?
With every sound I hear,I am filled with disbelief.
This disbelief gives birthto loneliness
enthroned as king.No one will be able
when I shall be declaredas King Dhritarashtra!
All hail the king!A kingdom is for the service
for a selfish cause.Besides, loneliness is cured
You need a wife now, brotherwho will become your eyes
to think about marriage, Pandu.You need not think about it.
By fixing your marriagewith the princess of Gandhar.
The princess of Gandharis the fortunate one, Pandu
My Kingafter taking a decision
is but worthless.I am not worried or sad,
with the feeling of guilt.I feel as though l have
the proposal of BhishmaI was filled with anger
that your decision was correct.With a person like Bhishma
spell disaster for our subjects.This decision was made
this decision to be wrong.My King
Sudharmalook at our daughter
She is a princess, my King.If she has to make a sacrifice
with a smile on her face.But how will I tell my daughter
Right now, Gandhari is ina state of bliss
transform into misery.Let her fate reveal itself
from the huntwhat will happen then, Sudharma?
that his sister is being marriedto a blind person.
Prince, this rope will break.It cannot take the weight
of the rope, soldier.That will save your life.
than mine.Then you should
- No.. No..Let go.
It is matter of great surprise,King Drupad
when I was aboutto achieve the goal.
but had she not ridiculedmy birth like this
been proud of the Princess!You daughter does not know,
she has not only insulted mebut also those
determined by their lineagebut labour and strength!
Your Highness.Committed a grave sin.
is a right that liessolely with the maiden.
of your daughter!You have turned this 'swayamvar
that to end the enmitybetween Kuru and Panchal
you solely wanted to insult us!That is a lie!
If my intentions were not purethen this instant
is never open to beings of alltypes and sections of society
and approach a Princessfor marriage.
is the duty of everyone.The truth is, by deciding to
the rules of this undertaking.If this is what you think,
I am challenging youthat if you are to get married
that too with such a personwho emerges victorious here.
Is there anyone who canachieve this goal?!
that a person who isfated to receive alms
Break that bow!Destroy that goal, King Drupad!
the corner of a palace forever.- Kuru Prince!
for attemptingto break that bow.
Crown Prince Duryodhanthat the bow of Lord Shiva
the 'swayamvar' of Goddess Sita.Only after the completion
This miraculous bow did notbreak at your mighty hands
that a warrior who canwin this competition
Crown Prince Duryodhanto allow this 'swayamvar
all the Kings present herefor one last time.
If a King, Crown Princeor 'Kshatriya' warrior
Govindcan a 'Kshatriya' maiden
But only if you want to.Yes, Govind.
I have firm faiththat my hidden fate
Your Highnessit is said in the 'shastras'*
of 'Kshatriyas' falls shortand the knowledge of the
Brahmins' for answers.King Gadhi's daughter* was married
But Vasudevmy daughter was born
it cuts through itafter some time
to become a queenthen she might just
Nakul, hold on to its string!How did you come up with the
The hearts of human beingsalso keep soaring like kites
is lost or cutthe heart
It goes insane.Look at Nakul's kite over there!
because of other people.Govind!
and one is on the vergeof losing control
and keepingone's heart under control
going to happen to us, Govind?Can you not see the future?
that I can observethe temperament of a person
you will indeed see the ray ofjoy in the darkness of sorrow.
I must leave to protect Dwaraka.I have got the news
and is headed towards Dwarakato attack it
The string of controlthat you had lost
Do not lose heart.I reside in the hearts
then your Govindyour Krishna
Allow him in.Welcome!
Greetings.Greetings,
with joy todaywhen I give you
brother.What happened in the court
and how the daughter of Drupadhad to interfere
for which both Duryodhanand I are very sorry.
the Pandavas and Draupadi willbe invited to Hastinapur by us.
and we will ensurethat she gets it, Vidur.
will also be cordiallyinvited to Hastinapur.
personally by you,Vidur.
What do you mean?It has been
whenever sister-in-lawis present with you
Yes, Your Highness.Will the Pandavas
No, uncle.Duels of all sorts
well aware of the naturesof brother Bheem and me.
any weapon, Duryodhan!That is an order!
a game of dice is alsoa part of us 'Kshatriyas.
it is essential for a Kingto have control over
will organize a game of dice.Let us see
Let us seehow much control
and send them the invite.As you say,
Here goes.Go on...
I won.But Your Highness,
If we can roll themwith our hands
you cannot turn them.You do not know
I will play with My Lord.My Lord.
What happened,Subhadra?
for your wife who is with child.Do you know,
become the valuesof the unborn child.
My child ought tolearn the values
of gambling and drinking.You will not be able to
you do not know it yourself.You may teach him
not fall asleep.If it is interesting
either has five, sevenor nine circles
through the seven circlesand enters the middle
through the seven circles againto come out of the labyrinth.
I hope, you arelistening, Subhadra.
I knew that she would.She heard how to
failed to hear the strategyto come out of it.
Minister Vidur of Hastinapuris here.
Uncle!What brings uncle here
were generatedusing computer graphics.
I have brought these presents.For this gesture of goodwill
especially Empress Draupadi.I have approached you
Crown Prince Duryodhanwill
such an invitationthe ministers of the court
Minister.Certainly.
Prince Arjun.What do you suggest,
Greetings, uncle!Bless you!
one must understandat once, dear
this invitation be accepted.Under the garb of a ceremony,
a web of treachery.Elder brother.
please set me free!Elder brother,
please set me free!Pardon me, Prince!
Who is in the prison?Me?
What happened?Why are you screaming?
what happened?I shall grant you sight,
What... What sorcery is this?What is it that I am seeing?
Forgive me, Krishna!Forgive me!
Friend!What illusion was that, Krishna?
Because there is no userunning or hiding from death.
General...Gather the army right away.
that hypocritehas inflicted on me!
We will attack for sure!Are you still dreaming
to incarcerate Vasudev...That moment...
Forever and ever!If you still have
who like a jugglersets a bewitching trap?
Ill finish him!Whether or not he chooses
I will for sureput an end
Friend...Dont take a decision
- Keep quiet!I used to consider
When that cheatwas setting a trap
What were you doing?Its the duty
But you remained seatedlike a helpless woman!
All of youare just a bunch of cowards!
Im capable enough!Duryodhan...
Your Highness, Dhritarashtra!Stop your son
Your Highnessplease walk in,
Please do this favour on mefor one last time.
Let this battle take place.Not my righteousness
No one can protectthe Kauravas now.
Krishna...Did Duryodhan try to incarcerate
Humans only play a rolein executing destiny's plan
Sister-in-law wishesto apologise to you
Greetings, Your Highness!If you must
the right teachingsat the right time.
empoisoning your sons' mindswith revenge
you let your sons imbibethe teachings he was imparting.
all his limits.Don't be resentful
of the lightning pace at whichthey are nearing their death.
How can I be resentful at him?I only sympathise with him.
why don't you refrain himfrom commencing the battle?
from self-destruction?Duryodhan has utmost belief
and on the Karna's capability.Grand sire is helpless
Karnais bound by the oath
Guru, hermit and Godcan't be broken at any cost.
if it isfor the friend's well-being.
I have full faiththat Duryodhan won't
it becomes impossiblefor even God to enlighten him.
an effort, it's possiblethat Karna deters
I can accept your proposal,King Shakuni.
The great warriorKarna.
I'm a charioteer.I am no king.
You are devoted to your friendand not towards me.
to whom even skilled warriorssurrender their arms.
You will be its king.And will swear allegiance
yield sweet fruits in futureis to be planted
anyone else's orchard.I apologise, Emperor.
the responsibilityof a kingdom.
remains independentand carry out his orders
I am a wrestler.A wrestler!
as a kingand only then can this plan
there is a very complexsituation in front of us.
friend.Don't ask me
for me.My child
I am afraidVasudev Krishna
with the intentionto attack.
will not be enough.He has to be there to protect
the entire planwill be down the drain.
keep themselvestied to the boat.
like Jarasandhthen it is necessary
Or elseyou will drown
friend.If I'm able to repay
I will not be able to takeany more of this burden.
any favour.Whatever you got was
and knowledge.You considering me
Friend...- Let me complete, friend.
of a charioteer.And Vrushali explained
birth as an embarrassmentthen I will never be
as a charioteer's son.I hold no anger for that.
with myself.Do you know why, Karna?
Because I know whatrighteousness is.
I end up insultingmy friend.
impure, friendbut your intentions
against injustice.Do you know, friend?
I have complete faith.But if uncle's plan
This crack ofunrighteousness
I require your support,friend.
But won't you standby me today?
but only with the helpof your faith.
is pulling a chariot or notbut till he dons a bridle
Listen to your fatherfor he is aware that
Go away.Go away, charioteer!
right away, declarethis young boy
there to protect your friend.But only you can protect
bear the king's ordersand at the king's feet
There isn't another man asintelligent as King Shakuni
What do you mean?I didn't get you.
Now, we will not be able togain victory over Magadh.
Vasudev?Now that depends on you,
as a childthat you had learnt to wrestle
any techniques?Definitely.
is definite, Bheem.But now
A Brahmin wrestlerwill now have to
*"Terrible" or "Frightful", sometimes known as Kala Bhairava, is the fierce manifestation of Shiva associated with annihilation.Oh, Lord Mahakaal!*
of 100 rulers.May I be blessed with
Get thosedisciples of Krishna!
why is he planning to carryout a sacrifice?
very pious at Magadh.And that is why Jarasandh
Uncle!I have an extraordinary news.
Suddenly they changedtheir path.
the winds changes its pathit can be considered abrupt.
to understandwhat Vasudev Krishna
Madhavwe've to stop the kings
Jarasandhcannot ignore a challenge
is first fed well.Only the sacrifice which
Won't you giveyour sacrifices
before their death?Nothing can give contentment
- That's untrue, Emperor.For the worshippers
of wrestlingis the biggest reason
This friend of mineVrikodar
I don't have the time now.The auspicious moment for the
of wrestling?Friend, it's a very happy
Now you can tell all thewrestlers of the Arya dynasty
your challenge.This is a very happy moment.
First try to displace my leg.Then you can dare
Don't be too proud.Any of them.
Who are you?After having consumed
Now you'll haveto wrestle.
Pandu's son Bheemis very excited
Your Highnesswhy did you halt
I had entered Hastinapur...It was on a chariot.
I am the culprit of Hastinapur.I couldn't protect
riding on this chariot.- Your Highness
And the future Queen Mother.Who has ever known
gives birth to, Vidur?Hence I request you,
don't exist anymore,Your Highness.
a 100 boys arestanding there.
then the rights of your sonstoo will be lost.
Not rights.My husband has
Sonscome here.
your grandfatherBhishma. Dhritarashtra
Serving them will beyour duty.
Be loving towards them.Reciprocating their love
differentiation betweenGandhari's 100 sons
there will be the 105 sonsof the Kuru clan.
Because of themyou couldn't be coronated
advised His Highnessthat my coronation
My dearI had to say this
that he will notbe partial.
These two peoplelove these five Pandavs
that they arenot your brothers
May God give you patienceand faith, child.
my five sons.I've brought them here
please don't say that.They are not outsiders.
May you have a long life.Greetings.
it's time for your sister-in-lawto enter the temple.
Let's go, Kunti.The attendants will take
Let's go, Kunti.Bheem, stop making fun of him.
Call your companion wrestler.- Come here.
- Yes, Prince.I'm a wrestler from Magadh.
If I come to your placewill you give me some lessons
who belong to this placedon't follow
and rural style.We apply oil and soil
master like you?Attendants,
I'm not talking to you!I'm talking to these
with the servantsare servants themselves.
Of course.Nakul and Sahadev,
It's a must for the younger onesto greet the elders.
It's about superiorityand inferiority.
rather, everyone else greets us.All five of you will greet
Pay your respectto the sons of the King.
Their father was the Kingof the woods.
then enquire about it.- Bheem, don't argue.
of the factthat the one who doesn't
if he is greeted.Doesn't the Prince have
in the kingdom.And there is only one prince
Has the coronation ceremonybeen conducted for you,
Durbhiksh will tell uswhen his coronation ceremony
- At the order of His Excellencywe're attending to
I don't require a coronation.It's only my right to be
The cloudscan be easily blown away
to one's rights.So, intelligent people
Pay your respects to him.It's my order.
brother Yudhishthir.I think, an animal
Who are you and what hasreduced you to this condition?
had imprisoned us.We have fled from his captivity.
my heartfelt apologies.No
tortures people, fear becomesa part of
in this region?This is a grave sin.
When anger and greedtake over a person's heart
to be expunged.The fire of his insult
the five Pandavashe is asking for just one son?
such a 'yajnabut the great sages Yaja
they had earnedthey have asked for a son
is being performed in Kampilya.The Gods are pleased with
the fulfillment of your wishes.It is now time for
your heart has beendying to have, King Drupad.
as sharp as a sword!By sacrificing my armour,
is indestructiblelike an armour!
and place his head at my feet!King Drupad
His glory will be everlastingand you have been blessed
His name will be Dhrishtadyumna!My son Dhrishtadyumna!
Give me your blessings, fatherso that I follow your orders
May you live long.May you be invincible!
But why did all of younot perform such a 'yajna?
We would not have beenable to give a son to Drupad
only a daughter.What do you mean?
Today, you have returnedto your mother, son.
But I have committeda sin, mother.
Did she protest, my child?Not explicitly
covered for lifeis a form of her protest,
Devavratawere you filled with protest
Why are you asking methis question, mother?
No, mother.I can say with
I had nothingother than concern
in my heart.And even today, I feel so.
the wish of any woman.Then you are innocent, son.
Sometimes, it is my dutyto breach my banks
some duties are also agonizingbut they give birth
Gandhari has undoubtedlyset a new standard
was absolutely true.This palace has seen
Was our sacrifice not enough?The question is whether
No.I do not see this..
The perspective of Dhritarashtrais what is important.
I know that.Just by listening
If you go in that direction, youwill never be able to reach me.
Where..Where are you, my Lord?
where I amhow could you cover your eyes?
a mockery of yourself?I just want to be in the same
I can see with every inch of me.Gandhari
that you deem the blindto be helpless?
from the rest.And I am trying to adapt
That I wish for a courtfull of blind people?
to cover their eyes forever?What most people cannot see
Do not say so.Life becomes hell for a person
I refuse to accept youthen will your life
carry out her oathis the duty of a husband,
I shall uncover my eyeswhile stepping into the fire.
you will not listen to meunder any circumstance.
Where are your bangles?And why are you
I have adorned myselfwith flowers
Enough.Enough of insulting me.
you have gone to this limitto remind me of my blindness?
of the Kuru dynasty?You will have to grace
of a female monk?Has covering your eyes
met with injustice?Is it not so, my Lord.
for your hair, Gandhari.It is the symbol of privilege
You are unworthy.You are nothing
Ison of King Vichitravirya,
The whole of Hastinapurmay consider you its queen
as my wife.Never!
one particular questionhas always bothered man.
and keeping sadness at bayis the primary motive.
complete satisfaction?Think about it.
Our security is basedon relationships.
is also a relationship.Then why do we meet with grief
born from relationships?Have you ever thought about it?
and tries to bring abouta change in it
the more one refusesgreater is the struggle.
Is it not the truth?If man willingly
then is achievingsatisfaction in relationships
Now, even Dhritarashtra isgetting impatient to hear this.
Dhritarashtra has excessivegreed to rule the kingdom.
by ruling this kingdom.Who does not go
but he has not yet been ableto accept his condition.
Dhritarashtra is the eldest sonof the Kuru dynasty.
that he is blind.If he doesn't become the king,
or the Chief Minister.His life will be
Will Dhritarashtra appoint Viduras the Chief Minister,
he does not appoint someoneas the Chief Minister, then
nor will you.After the coronation ceremony,
Then beforethe coronation ceremony
and Vidur as the Chief Minister.But to keep Hastinapur
Dhritarashtra as the king.Bheeshma
Greetings, sire.Welcome, Vidur.
Permission?Regarding what, son?
Neverthelessthey are the sons of queens,
ever gets tarnishedthen I will be the first one
You are my disciple, son.You would never do anything
as the Chief Ministerwhen it is time to decide
sire?Righteousness is like the sun
you will get comfortbut also the darkness
there will be lightfor you, your family
Go on, Vidur.Go and swear in
with righteousness.As you say, sire.
Son, may Hastinapuralways be protected by you
May your enemies shudder atthe very mention of your name.
May the rank of the Generalof Hastinapur
to shine like the throne.I know,
For a mother, her child'ssuccess is her only happiness.
the grandsonof King Shantanu
take up the reins ofthe kingdom of Hastinapur
of Hastinapurto the very limits
of the Kuru dynastybeyond the limits of the sky.
All the kingsof the region of Arya
I.. - 'All hailKing Dhritarashtra!
Today, I take the oaththat..
In reality a human isn'tbound by his deeds.
immense sorrow upon defeat.And that sorrow shall compel you
be born again.If you are victorious
shall drive you towardsworldly triumph.
shall bind you.Think about it!
and have no fear of losingwould you feel bliss or sorrow
nor sorrow.Therefore your bliss, sorrow
aren't due to the war.The expectations that you have
Is it not true, Arjun?Therefore, holding joys
This is called 'Karma Yoga'.The one who attains
that he isn't a bodybut a mere soul.
And therefore, aren't real,but just illusions.
But, Krishnaif deeds are meant to restrain
and embrace sainthood?Such thinking is the sole reason
When the ones possessing 'Gunasand the ones who know justice
run the world.Had Grandsire Bhishma
grown so vast today.And had your father
reigning in peace todayand would be teaching
But Arjun, the sad truth isthat only the virtuous ones
who often think of sainthood.Just as water drifts away
right there, similarlythe virtuous and learned ones
Tamas' function in the world.Ought to this very reason sins
but not the deeds themselves.He stays in this very world
but doesn't lose himself in one.A 'Karma Yogi' expects nothing
and even his subjects at all.He himself reaps the benefits
like a familial head.A human toils for the well being
from his own off-springs?Whatever a human does
Future gains are measuredin a transaction
him love and protection.The deeds of one's children
And when one has no rightsupon their deeds
If you think deeply, Arjun,you shall realise soon
and expectations is inevitable.When the creation is God
by God himself.A human does nothing on his own.
Hence it is necessarythat you become a 'Karma Yogi
and continue with your duties.The desire to achieve something
must be given up, Arjunand liberate your soul.
to commit deeds.The outcome relies on the Lord.
nor is it right to expecta return for your deeds.
but does not give up deedshow can such a 'Karma Yogi
The one who gives up foodjust to escape its taste
He faces a twofold loss.For one he becomes weak
cannot be done by him.And secondly
Hence rather than giving up foodone better gives up
all cravings in his mind.He accepts life as his duty
with his actions.And Arjun
are the one whose motivesare fulfilled.
The one who doesn't think he ismost superior after one success
And such a person succeedsin life repeatedly.
And it is a characteristic ofwishes to stay unfulfilled.
And anger gives rise to desire.Due to desire a person
And the society becomesan enemy of such a person.
Like for brother Duryodhanhis Commander-in-chief
and he blessed youto emerge victorious.
towards the divine knowledge.Strengthen your faith
Break free from the shacklesof bondage.
By strengthening my faithin the Almighty
a human keeps reminiscingthe Almighty.
of submission.And this sense is called
about what is right and wrong.And that knowledge gives him
of the Almightyhe becomes the most Dutiful.
That is the ultimate aimof all souls
get rid ofgreed, pride, anger
of the roomand stand under an open sky?
sees the Almighty.Like the taste of
the taste of the oceansimilarly
That means, Madhavare you the Almighty?
Just like you are.But you aren't enlightened
So, Madhavwhy isn't submission before you
Submission before me issubmission before the Almighty.
a blossoming flower.I am the human race.
I am Duryodhan.And I am Arjun too.
your birth.Your mother is still alive.
ancient and modern?You are seeing the body
times, Arjun.I have many avatars.
And I will take many birthsin the future, as well.
evil raises its hoodin order to rescue the righteous
righteousness, I'll take birth.This has happened in every age
I am the Almighty!I was the Matsya avatar*
*The dwarf that grows into a giant to save the world from King Bali.I am Parashurama and
And I am Saraswati, Kaliand Lakshmi, as well.
I am neither the bodynor its parts.
I am everything!Yet, I am nothing!
as well.Kunti!
Nakul, Sahadev!No!
Bhagirath had brought youto the earth from heaven
beloved deceased in your watersand pray for their salvation.
when a person cameto offer his own ashes?
and pray for my salvation.These are my ashes, mother.
the sons of Panduwere the basis of my life.
How can you attain liberation?The tree has fallen, Vidur.
It fell.Every inch of me is burning
Lord Parashuram's exampleby drawing my weapons
I feel like punishingDuryodhan and his brothers
and punishing Duryodhanand his brothers
for their sinstill the end of time!
I...I am helpless.
The tree of righteousnesscan never fall.
the mist of unrighteousness.But when the time is right
and that tree will bevisible once again.
How?I had a suspicion, uncle
had hatched a conspiracyin Varnavrat.
Does this meanthat the sons of Pandu
Rahu can swallow the sunonly for a few moments
be alive, uncle.And when the time is right,
then a search partywill be sent for us.
our kingly clothesand dress up as ascetics.
as 'Brahmins' and sagesand proceed to the West.
where father and mother Madrihave been commemorated.
Greetings, Minister.Listen carefully.
You must monitor all activitiesof the King of Anga, Karna
and you mustremember everything.
shall stay here tonight,mother Radha.
I hope, you willfeed me yourself.
What is it, son?T-Tell me, son!
The major flaw of theenvironment of a palace
but very soon, it ignitesa fire within one's heart.
but that of a righteous personburns with the fire of remorse.
Please give up the greedof being a King.
of unrighteousness there.If you befriend a serpent
a serpent, father!Even he has met with injustice!
will not aid himin having his right.
is the only possible solutionthen why are you
I have given my wordto Prince Duryodhan.
unrighteousness, father.This is the fire
Engage in charity, sonbecause charity is the
And also pray thatmay Duryodhan's plan
from committing sinsand may you be saved too.
Greetings, Her Highness!- Bless you.
of Varnavrat, Purochan.Indeed, Crown Prince.
And I could never have gotso much space within the city.
Where?Beneath the earth?
Purochan, before we enterwe must light a lamp
Certainly, Her Highness.Do come in.
Do come in, Crown Prince.This way.
Please enter.This palace is miraculous,
put a lot of labourinto constructing it.
Wonderful, Purochan.Never have I seen
illuminated with only moonlight?Indeed, Crown Prince.
that moonlight issufficient for lighting.
for this lovely creation of his.To have all of you reside
to me, Prince Bheem.On a new moon night
On a new moon nighthow does the palace
Actually...- Sahadev
Why do you worry unnecessarily?Just think of how many mirrors
very pleased.Incidentally, the question
illuminated on a new moon night?We will have to
I will certainly think of a waybefore the new moon night.
Let's have a look.I will be there.
where to put that lamp.What happened, Purochan?
That isan ill omen, Purochan.
Now, light the lamp againand place it near the entrance.
of a temple is its pillarsand the sanctity of the temple
When the pillarsof a temple collapse
temple's sanctuary breaksit gives birth
of a temple...Which temple was the
understand that, Ministerbut the King of Anga
experiencing hell itself.Duryodhan's enemies are
compare them to thepillars of a temple?
He...He...
mother, Her Highness?Duryodhan must certainly be
- Bless you, child.Greetings, Minister!
- Greetings.[MUSIC]
Greetings, Duryodhan.Greetings, Krishna.
and refreshments at my palace.No, Duryodhan.
I can't stay at your palace.Don't you trust us, Krishna?
for my adviceand not a treaty.
See you at the court tomorrow.Greetings, Krishna.
bring pride to the Arya clan.If you both form a nexus
Karthikeya and Ganeshwould never stay
Goddess Parvatiwas unfortunate that way.
I shall fight a battlewith Arjun.
Why do I need to wagea war to combat Arjun?
Thwarting such a catastrophewould be the right thing to do.
advocate righteousness.Why do you emphasize
Rashavi, is that all?What about the sweet meat?
we've been eatingsuch plain food.
Dry bread for the drynessthat's spread around.
Why so, aunt?I love sweets.
Kuru Dynasty ruin.On one hand I think
that justiceshouldn't be denied
under these circumstancesis impossible, Krishna.
It can never be attained.One who seeks happiness
One whose happinesslies in power and wealth
is destined to be ruined.King Dhritarashtra
His sons toosought happiness
Will the entire dynastybe doomed?
Justice and righteousnessshall prevail.
Ones that have to be savedshall remain safe.
needs to be understoodand it can't be attained.
that you've prepared.Tomorrow at the court
Greetings, Your Highness.Bless you, Krishna.
Vasudevonly you can show us the way
and make your sons readyfor repentance and punishment.
But they will have to let goof their pride.
can be averted.Vasudev!
aren't the rulersof Indraprastha
Everyone has the rightto fight against injustice
that they haven't starteda battle with you so far.
Actuallythe end of a state
A margosa treenever yields mangoes.
at Hastinapur.Had you announced
that very daythen this circumstance
are you using,Vasudev?
or to declare a battle?King of Gandhar
But the truth is that,Vasudev...
So, how do your sonshave any right to the throne?
Your Highness?Vasudev
the Pandavas had acceptedthat they will live in
of that one year, Duryodhanhad found Arjun.
Only if they give upthe idea of a battle.
does not convert the sininto a good deed
not stake his propertyhis brothers, his wife
poisonous.Even I was unarmed
war right then, Prince?Why did you conspire
during the game of dice?The truth is
Vasudev, evenHis Excellency Bhishma
the gatekeepers cannotjust protect the door
a crime against societyagainst humanity
I cannot supportthis strange
to have this debate.Right now, we must
And that's why, I have comeas a messenger of peace.
If you leave this court now, Prince...I will meet him next
Duryodhan.Wait.
you made the message of peaceunacceptable.
Which warrior tries to disrobea woman from his own family
What does fearing punishmentafter committing a crime, mean?
that if the culpritstouch Draupadi's feet
as a punishment.What has happened to you, sister?
Sanjay, now nobody canstop my son's victory dance.
Your Highness!This duration of time
Madhav, there is verylittle time left for sunset.
He will only cause Grandsireto lay down his weapons.
To bring that great man downall five of you brothers
are approaching him.- Take me there.
Duryodhan, you should bemore concerned about yourself.
I had called out to you.Today, I request you.
the possibility of my deathlooks possible and near.
May God bless all of you,my dear.
Princess Amba.Use all your combined powers
Take your mace and step down from chariot.We are short on time.
Do not wait for Princess Amba.Attack me, dear.
If four of my beloved ones liftmy bier during my last moments
I will consider myself extremely fortunate.It is time for my departure.
righteousness, Grandsire.We cannot do this to you.
After taking a lesson inrighteousness from Lord Kishna.
as that is appropriate.Do not shed tears.
Arjuna.Your powers...
of others in times to come.Take your weapons and attack me.
Instead I will be relieved!Attack me!
Attack me!Attack me!
Until we live, we will not allowthem to harm you.
Attack me, Bhima.Brilliant, Bhima!
Slay me!These hands have comitted 
injustice in this lifetime!This life of mine must ends!
my lads.Yudhisthir, my lad.
When your soul is plagued by age and exhaustion, I shall arrive as your death!
The cause of your death is present before you, Bheeshma!
I shall lay down all my weapons before you.
*A mandapa is a pillared outdoor hall or pavilion for public rituals.Dhrishtadyum go tell the domestic help
Let's go, daughter.Father, Draupadi...
the sons of Pandu.But they have decided
I cannot tell father about it.Please do not tell him either,
Whoever they were, Draupadi...After what they did
Let's go, Draupadi.One can preach righteousness but
what righteousness means to us.I can only aid all of you
Yudhishthirif you resort to asceticism
will be devoid of a worthy King.My sons have renounced the
about the welfareof the subjects?
and unrighteousness?No, sire.
would be appropriate.Letting your heart
govern your likesis the first stage
this now, Kunti?We must stop hiding like this
descends from the throneYudhishthir must become
but to provide the subjectswith a worthy King.
But Yudhishthir and Bheem...If both of them
if, apart from Yudhishthirthe remaining brothers
Yudhishthir?Pardon me, My Lord
for Princess Draupadi.Politics is also a method
as righteousness.When facing a dreadful situation
and thinks only of himselfthen is it correct?
But My Lord...Whenever the thought
How can we make a womanlead such a life?
Then can you five brothersnot make certain sacrifices?
which will ease Draupadi's life?If the decision to make
then why are all of youdeclining it?
Many women will beforced to do so.
be incorrect, Princebut at the moment
The righteousness one resorts toin times of trouble
would be a grave sin.If another woman will be married
may also be atypical.What kind of a path
of my younger brotherbe deemed my own?
as my own motherhow can I deem her
An urn is placedbetween three pillars
The idol is securefrom all five directions.
To all of themyet to none.
the idol in your life?Do remember, Bheem.
The urn and the pillarsdo not sanctify the idol.
If you resort to asceticismthen a powerful kingdom
of a worthy King.If Duryodhan becomes King
kingdom like Hastinapurwill be ruled by selfishness
not make certain sacrifices?Can you not take
Draupadi's life?Can you not deem Draupadi
descends from the throneYudhishthir must become
but to provide the subjectswith a worthy King.
descends from the throne...- Who will protect Yudhishthir?
Not for his personal gain...- If Duryodhan becomes King
kingdom like Hastinapurwill be ruled by selfishness
but to provide the subjectswith a worthy King.
of asceticismcalled life, sage.
Go on, sons of Pandu.Bless you!
Those five 'Brahminsare approaching
Get the troops ready!Soldiers!
does not resultin committing a sin!
Todayby killing the five 'Brahmins
shall be recipients of merit!All hail Mahadev!
How dare you come here?Who gave you the right
my daughter so gravelyforget about Kampilya...
King Drupad.These five 'Brahmins
the sons of King Pandu.And that is Arjun
Grandsire will not fight usin the battlefield.
the throne of Hastinapur.Are his principles
One does not forsake one'sprinciples for the throne, dear.
In order to wring clothesone can apply force
excessive force, dear.You have hurt
with due respectis the righteous thing to do.
dear Duryodhan.Arjun has challenged us
and also the throneof Yudhishthir.
Give themwhat is rightfully theirs.
Are you asking for mercy forthe Pandavas, Your Excellency?
the Pandavas their property.However
Minister?If you are asking
Your Excellency.We cannot give them
of taking their rights,King of Gandhar.
will have to faceutter destruction.
End this struggle.A struggle always has
to prove that it wassundown the other day.
However,if they attack us
Go and tell the Pandavasthat the right
All hail Empress Draupadi!All hail Ballav Maharaj!
Your Highness.Emperor Yudhishthir
By spending your lifeof anonymity in my kingdom
The army of the Matsya kingdomis prepared.
You have indebted uswith your love, Your Highness.
We five brothers took an oathsolely based upon our competence
Very soon,only five chariots
To punish the hundredsons of King Dhritarashtra!
Hundred and one,Panchali.
The basis of unrighteousnessof Crown Prince Duryodhan
The sons of Pandu will sacrificehundred and one people.
of the Golden Apple Treeare offered to Lord Shiva
tomorrow at dawnhundred and one severed heads
Kala Bhairav* as an offering.*The fierce manifestation of Shiva associated with annihilation.
will be presented tothe Deity of the Battlefield
challenge me to a battle?!I shall render
on behalf of Hastinapurhas not been given to you yet
person of this worldand the most powerful General
The challenge is for the hundredsons of Dhritarashtra
Challenge...This is not a challenge,
A protest of slaves!Do something,
Whether the life of anonymityof the Pandavas
in any manner.That day,
grandsire.Even when the sun goes down
dusk,grandsire
while standingin a particular place
for that particular place.Now,
Your Excellency Bhishma.Who is the one
or day,Your Excellency?
Me?Who?
are both actsof unrighteousness.
whether youwish to take the side
of that family.You must leave
to slay the sinners!Uncle, tomorrow at dawn,
When Hastinapur will echowith the sound of a battle cry
The white flag of peaceor the red flag of war.
for the pastseven generations, uncle.
will get annihilated.However,
If the sons of Pandulose then my dream will break.
Only the sons of Panducan safeguard my principles.
the sons of Pandu.Till this old man
the Pandavas are boundto be defeated.
In replyeven I have waived
of Hastinapur.If you're competent enough
Lift your weapons,Pandavas.
is present here before you.No, grandsire.
and return.I am confined
I will definitely be presentto defend it.
I will definitely be presentdo defend it.
for the Kauravasand not the entire
to even accept this!Then based on what powers
that my righteousnessserves as a shield
a battle with you, grandsire.Hence we sent the summon
and the king of Anga,Karna.
has not been acceptedby Dhritarashtra's sons.
then what will you do?We will be forced
an attack on Hastinapur.Guru Drona and you will
to fight you.This means, grandsire,
our humiliationforget about our wealth
towards your daughter-in-law...Is it not important
I have no remedy, son.The outer cover
Even if the water withinthe coconut dries
my duties.A person who was born blind
Never!Gandhari?
have a very thin lineof difference, father.
A father is firmand callous is but an enemy.
No.It's not the time to
I am still alive.Your brother!
It's my oath.I am not scared
They may have abundant wealth.But you and your future
I wouldn't have at leastdreamt so big.
He isn't your husband.The imbecile heart dreams
The future shattered in no time.Dreams are like
all lustre is lost.The shattered glass pierces
for father should haveat least told me.
message to Hastinapurthat we do not accept
but we do not acceptthe wedding proposal.
Gandhariwhat are you saying?
Parents can never ask forcompensation of their love.
When my parents are in a dilemmaI cannot refuse from
and this bothers me.But being a princess
with a man whowas born blind...
How would you?If I don't find happiness
The happiness of the subjectsshould be more important.
This marriageis acceptable to me.
to proceed to Hastinapur.Princess
I am trying to getused to darkness.
I am...I am really scared of darkness.
I have to fight my fears.Princess, you are
How would have the princelived in darkness all his life?
not stumbling again.But
The fear of darkness musthave hounded him too.
I have to befriend darkness.In this very darkness,
- King Dhritarashtra!All hail!
- King Dhritarashtra!All hail!
Gandhari yesterday.The guest house used by
of ornament?That isn't an ornament
The Queen Mother is eager totake you to the wedding tent.
Today is my firstmeeting with Gandhari.
Your image in the eyesof the princess
Let's go.The auspicious time for
should go to the guest houseand give a message to
along with Gandhari.The auspicious time for
has brought a messagethat princess Gandhari
in the next two half hours.Sugadha, are you done
All of you should nowwait outside my room.
for the wedding.Let the future wait for me.
Leave, Sugadha.Govind!
Don't touch me,Queen Mother Kunti.
your daughter-in-law.I'm not your sons' wife.
Dear!Now, I'm without a husband
Just like a flameburning in the hearth
but I am thrivingon what is impure.
equivalent to that of allthe women in this world.
if you wish to save yourselvesthen renounce
will drown today.I'm not a human being
I'm the deathof all the wicked men
And it's my cursethat right now,
Please don't curse,Draupadi.
My curse is forgivenessin itself, Your Highness.
These men have almostcommitted suicide in this court.
it is called self-annihilation.But suicide takes place
don't do somethingsimilar to these men.
And it's a woman's task as wellto keep the society clean.
Today, the sons of Panduhave endured
to redeem ourselves.Let us avenge your dishonour.
of these wicked people.And I no longer
But only you...Only you can guard
a chanceto repent for our sins
in the netherworld, Draupadi.I'm not saying this
Don't lose your patience,Draupadi.
of others terrify usand give us a chance
to be patient.It is very important
Patience!Patience...
King Dhritarashtrayour younger brother,
keep in mindthat the day my sons...
will be the last dayof your happiness.
You wanted to disrobe Draupadi,isn't it, Duryodhan?
Even the skin of a poisonoussnake
Look around this court!Listen carefully, Duryodhan
Narayani army to Hastinapur.And I will request
the Kuru dynasty!Help my sons gain freedom!
of taking revengefor my daughter-in-law's
No.No, Kunti.
If the Kuru dynasty isdestroyed
will never rest in peace.No.
You can ask for any wishyou want.
If it's possible for youerase the memories
can subside my pain.The stain on our characters
decreases to some extentask for a wish, my dear.
Make an announcementin the entire Kuru kingdom
All hail!- King Pandu!
Prince, I havebrought you your meal.
Gandhari wishedyou to be introduced to
- If you didn't like itI will get another meal
The taste ofGandhar's cuisine is good.
So finally the dishes ofGandhar did make
It's my first try, Prince.I must say,
in Hastinapur.Henceforth
If the platter has a varietyof tastes
If the tastes of here, Gandharand Kunti province join
You don't have the rightto offer me counsel.
I understand that youare still disturbed.
as the stoup it holds.As a matter of fact, the stoup
to be considered the'stoupcould never be
for supportwouldn't suit if it were
made for either of themis something only the architect
of the Almighty, Prince.This is the time to forego
- Don't touch me!I haven't yet given you
Every time I try toconsider you as my wife
as to how muchmy insult...
you at peace by the same!Remember, Gandhari
Now whether you abide bythe same or not
on coming closertry to form boundaries and rules
relationship, we'd noticethat the source of all of them
And even if unknowingly,a stranger oversteps the bounds
is rejected, his heartis filled with sorrow.
our heart is filled with wrath.Isn't that how it always
the independence of anotherboundaries and rules
just like agreement isthe body of a relationship
Think over it.No, dear.
is the King of the YadavasShoorsen.
No!Greater than the father
Please come.Did you hear that, Priyamvada?
By selecting such a husbandI have made myself fortunate!
no such thingthat robs you of your fortune.
one has to liethat's deception
it's not termeda deception, Princess.
The truths of the worldare but hazy at best
that if the same truthspass into the hands of a foe
What...What are you doing?
of any vile person.Till the time this thread
about your past to your husband.But... - There's no time
And anywaya secret portends
Why do I get the feelingthat by tying this thread
If I keep this mattera secret from my husband
who would have raised my son.Whose family would have
Help!Someone, help me!
What's going on?- Help!
Someone save him!Save him!
Son!Karna!
Mother!- Shut up, idiot!
Come home and I'lltake you to task!
doing anything?But I don't require
- Shut up and come home!Come on!
Come on home!Mother!
and then very coyly askif I am angry.
I'm Adhirath's son.I will have to save
But I have to save you fromyour father's temper, right?
deems your punishment necessary.Father had gone to the Kunti
on his way back.Son, the King is coming
nor any valorous warrior.Mother, haven't you
attention is good fortune?Or even great misfortune.
always has a profound effect.Then we should be graced
All hail!- King Pandu!
and King Pandu's happy lifefrom the attacks
- King Pandu!All hail!
- King Pandu!Why did you stop, Adhirath?
Greetings!- Greetings, younger brother!
His and Her Highnessare welcome.
that you should first paya visit to the district deity.
Radha, how are you?Where is Karna?
so that Their Highnessbe pleased.
My lord, how could I stophim from welcoming the King?
He won't use a bowand arrows, right?
Now I have to stop him!Where is he?
the very same flowersin whose golden colour reside
Who did this?This archer has
Tomorrow hereinI shall step onto
With only triumph,clenching my mind.
Assume that today,is the final day of the war.
while the Pandavaswill concede defeat.
The Pandava warriors are cookingup a battle formation, my King.
shall confront Duryodhanat the centerfield
Attack the forcesof the Kaurava, from the west.
to rebuff Lord Dronacharya.King Virat, Abhimanyu and I
Brother, attack Duryodhanthe moment is vulnerable.
at the earliest.The battle formation
Praise the lord!Praise the lord!
created a formation, yet?What if, like the first day
No, Arjun.Grandsire is a
which his enemies can comprehendhe will never put up with the
war needs a formationdecimate doesn't have one.
And shall protectPrince Duryodhan.
my sense of duty.Today, you shall view
my obligation.Let's move, my friend.
Arjun.It's Kaurava's accomplished general.
Lord Bhishma!Pandava!
Your army,will not be allowed to surrender
On this battlefieldthe only thing they
Lord Bhishma hadcaused us great many casualties.
battalions of our soldiers.I could feel for a while
Grandsire wasagainst the Kauravas.
His perception has changed,Sahadev.
Henceforth,he is ready to embrace death
our only objectiveis the death of grandsire.
Your Grace, we just have fourbattalions of soldiers left.
And this is just thefourth day of war.
Every potent individualhas tried his best.
If we do not stop grandsirethen he will
Run!Run!
Fifth Day of the War.The funeral pyres of the enemies
the torches in their campare spreading
This very darkness will engulftheir fortune as well, Sanjay.
does not residein Lord Indra himself.
the Pandava army has beenreduced to three 'akshauhini.
No,Guru Drona.
seven 'akshauhini' army with usbut now, we merely have
akshauhini' army with them.We tried to attack
Can no onerevolt against grandsire,
brother Yudhishthir.However, it is mandatory
Vasudev, by the timewe await the right time
at any cost."Eighth Day of the War"
Your Highness.For all these days,
Then how can such powerget generated in his aged self,
but my uncle's meditation,Sanjay.
Mother-in-lawwhy is great grandsire Bhishma
water and rest?Grandsire is facing the
each time he will slay someonehe too will experience death.
His Excellency Bhishmais the sentinel of the
liesand deception
this punishment today.As long as
dear.I do not wish to slay you!
with the wish to die!You may certainly slay me!
who attacks HastinapurI must slay him!
Remember, Arjun!The orders to drag Draupadi into
Dushyasan, bring thatslave Draupadi to this court!
grab her by the hairand drag her till here!
Today he wields a sword!But he always tries
how he conspired to burn all youfive brothers and your mother
all five of our foesshall be together!
shall be decided!Now look here, Arjun!
the audacityto infringe
and Master Drona!He stayed a mute spectator
with five men...l am ashamed to call her
for vengeance now, Arjun?Does your soul not
a weapon does not arise in you?Does the battle
This battle is inevitable!Now, this battle seems
once again, Arjun?And remember
of Hastinapur as a kingl shall live every moment
immense love and pridehe bestowed upon you
best archer!l shall make you
Just in order to make youthe world's best archer
If you wish to give mea souvenir as a disciple
And over there,look at Vikarna as well.
at the royal court that day!If a King ever loses in battle,
And Draupadi is the brideof the Kuru dynasty!
But look at the side you are on,Arjun!
Your eldest brother, Yudishtir!Brother Bheem!
and your nephews!Many of them shall meet
by the possibilityof their death, Arjun!
of Brother Duryodhana!If he was greedy for power
If Dushyasan committed a crimeby dishonouring Draupadi...
elder brotherand let your wife
Grandsire considered his oathto be more important
Was that not unfair?And your eldest brother
You are indeed right, Krishna!On both sides
the form of justice, Arjun!My mind has gone numb, Krishna!
What for, Krishna?What for?
or the oath of vengeance?I do not have any such reason.
I cannot!A catastrophe is the foundation
two grow in its place!Why do you fear
shall cause reformation later?Do not embrace this impotence,
This impotence does notbefit you at all!
Raise your weapon!How can I raise my weapon,
and my elder brother!I do not have the courage to
by slaying themit is futile, Krishna!
thinking of his future.Even when I look
million soldiersit reminds me
shall be widowed.Countless children
of society are brokenthere shall be none to teach
shall go extinct, Krishna!The Kuru dynasty
shall be destroyed!It shall all be destroyed,
You may preach like a wise man!But in reality
If a tree sheds a few leavesor grow new ones
The reason for a leafs creationand the meaning
Similarly, the real reasonand purpose for a man's birth
And the entire worldis for creation!
The one who realises this factcan always see the path
There shall be destructionin this war!
that new traditionsshall be formed too!
Thousands of years agothe heritage that was
The social construct that wasbased on a man's intelligence
shall rise again in a new form!Just as before rainfall
and the land sprawled withflowers seems tainted as well
the skies and the earthare washed clean!
shall be scourged clean, Arjun!Post this war
Hence give upyour affection, Arjun!
Raise your weapon and wage war!I can hear your words, Krishna!
My mind is clouded by affection!How do I see through it
that you shall steer my chariotin the appropriate direction!
in the right direction, Krishna!What is it that
Rise, Arjun!Listen, Arjun!
of creation!Plunging your fist
But if you dip a cupped palminto the current of river Ganga
Think, Arjun!Is it a fist of arrogance
Can you comprehendthis knowledge?
Bheem, be prepared to die.Those who do not fear death is
forgiveness to God.You never do good in this life.
in the next life.Bheem!
Immatured knight should not interfere.
Get up, Duryodhan!Come on, get up!
I can not give myself to you, Grandsire.
Yudhishthir I do not want to kill you.
It will end this war, my son.
This is why I hate this war, brother Bheem.
Why are you lying on the ground like a tail insect, brother Bheem.
Hit me. Get up.
Get up, brother Bheem.Get up!
Brother Bheem!Get up!
Heeyah!Mark and remember my vow, 
First I will pull your tongue and then crush your head.
I am the Crown Prince.King of Hastinapur, Dhristarasta's 
The right to imprison and kill me is only in the hands of your brother Yudhishthir.You're stupid, Duryodhan.
So you will not get Grandfather's protection.
Come here, servant Draupadi.Sit on my lap.
If I die, the war will end today.Kill Duryodhan,
Sanjay...Sanjay, why are you silent?
Quick, tell me!Majesty,
have more eagerness.Unless you can let go of your attachment.
You will remain bound to them, and victory will always be away from you.And attachment will only bring 
My duty, my brothers,and my family is my courage, 
face my courage again...It will be your last day, 
It will soon arrive!The war is over for today, 
But...uncle did not let their 
Wait and see, Sanjay!Until uncle in charge in the battleground,
Our victory today is priceless, Emperor Yudhishthir.
Now they believe that under your leadership,
We achieve victory today.But Grandsire experience
Brother Yudhishthir did not fight with all his might.
It is possible to severely hurt him.That will cause him can't 
Grandsire is the epitome of chastity.We will not be able
Anyone who tread the road of Kaurava's punishment,
this day has ushered a newbeginning to the Kuru kingdom.
and embraces each memorythat resides within it.
I can recall the timewhen, in the royal courtyard
would sit next to meand study their lessons.
playing a strange game,In that game, Pandu and Vidur
and were calling outto their eldest brother
And Dhritarashtra ran to themand caught them in his arms
had they fallen to the ground.On hearing this,
his elder brotherwas standing there
Upon hearing this, I told Panduthat Dhritarashtra
Upon hearing this, Pandu saidthat
to see him.He said, his brother's love for
my disciples taught mea new lesson.
when Lord Yama* must have come to take your younger brother awayThe god of death.
as towhom he needed to entrust
confidence, Your Majestythat he must never have
branches of a treeor meeting Lord Yama himself
Only in you.I will not be able to say
may the Lord motivate you!This is my blessing.
Your Majestyeveryone is eagerly waiting
only one warriorwho has never accepted defeat.
And this is the reasonof my victory.
was suchthat one could draw
because uncle's adviceis appropriate.
When it comes to me, this oathcannot be forgotten either.
within my heartfor it is very important.
When it comes to me, this oathcannot be forgotten either.
within my heartfor it is very important.
awaits your decision.You have a righteous heart
the crowned Prince of Hastinapuris... - May the Lord
I apologizefor interrupting you!
the heir to the throneand that is why, I have
no one ought to bechosen in the court.
even the Almighty cannot residein the idol made by him.
I do not understand you.Your Majesty
That is why, until the Princesare his disciples
So, what does the mightyDronacharya expect?
to pay me in the form ofthe art I have taught them.
is the most apt wayof judging him.
Pardon me, Your Majesty!Pardon me.
If one looks atone's reflection for too long
Capability is a virtueof the soul
And it does not showin a reflection.
But there was no definitiveoutcome of that competition.
That is why, if the capabilitiesare now judged
then what problemdo you have with it?
was inconclusiveresorting to this method
Ask for your fee.The Prince who will be able
But while seeking your feewhat if you become partial
And whether my feecan be paid by one Prince
is a matter of doubt.What are you asking for,
for being insulted.The King of Panchal, Drupad
needs to be at my feet.I was insulted gravely
of my friend Drupad.The hurtful words of an enemy
denote an insult.When a friend insults you
I have endured the fireof this insult within me
I could have defeated Drupadat that very moment
That is why, I took an oaththat one day
And todaythat moment has come, Princes.
of fulfilling the vowof your teacher.
Do you have the capability?Do you have the capability?
A powerful and experiencedwarrior like Drupad
two crore soldiers.And the fort of
No, mighty Drona.Ask for something else.
and self-confidenceof my disciples
But you need not feel sad.I will go to another kingdom
so that they avenge my insultbecause, Your Majesty
In everyone's life,there comes an event
but the truth isn't ableto come out of the mouth.
or eventor else talking about
No.This is just a fact.
is usual.But sometimes, even while
So...what's truth?Have we ever thought about it?
wait for the right timebecause courageousness
Earlier, messages were beingconveyed through the drum beats.
from the battlefield.We'll receive a message.
There is a good news,Queen Mother.
I had faiththat in the first battle itself
he has proved himselfas an emperor.
Nothing should be lackingin the welcome ceremony.
On the very first dayof marriage
a wife feels.I have no regrets,
of a king is on his throne.To be at the second place
When a husband doesn'tpay attention to his wife
your husband's priority.Now it's time to decorate
and decorate the king's roomin the best manner.
Is there any...bad news?No, grandsire. The news
The news iswe, I mean, King Pandu
from a fierce war.Subsequently, the king of Madra
He must have requested.To refrain His Majesty
in a way that... - Vidurbe clear about what
had made King Panduhis son-in-law.
Make arrangements to welcomeKing Pandu
A king has many queens.If King Pandu
troublesome for your life.As it is, a secret is always
of King Pandu in Hastinapurand into his private chambers
of second marriage of Panduwill make Kunti sulk.
but look, sisterKunti accepted Madri as
Greetings, brother.Hastinapur and I are
On this occasion of victoryI would like to make
I have looked up to onlyone warrior.
his struggle.With his robust character
Every move I made in the war wasdone following his footsteps.
And this is the reasonbehind my victory.
and he is my elderbrother Dhritarashtra.
<i>This victory is not minebut yours.</i>
Greetings, grandsire.I wish you a long life.
No, Pandu...Your body gets relief from pain
For a few months,along with your wives
And that too immediately.But, Queen Mother...
arguments.It's a right of your wives
Yes, Queen Mother.Yours
Madri.Rambha!
I heard aboutthe king's valour in the battle.
I also didn't know that onthe very next day of marriage
the minute I get here.I have wronged you.
is worthy of being excused,right, sister?
You are not at fault,Madri.
receive the love and respectthat I get.
I was thinking about youthroughout the journey.
I would have tocompete with you.
I had such doubts.There is no competition
on seeing you.I am younger than you
no competition between usthat would be best for you.
waiting for me.The state of Queen Kunti
But kings having morethan one wife
and the absence of optionsrather than accepting the same
But I completelytrust Pandu.
Injustice isn't a part ofPandu's nature.
Haven't Kunti and Madri gonewith Pandu
itself is as suchthat anyone would
Greetings, Elder Queen.Prince Dhritarashtra has sent
He has called me!Yes, Your Highness.
ten cows in charity.The son of Bharadwaj
on a gold parchment.But if you talk about rights
that had been conquered,friend Drupad.
and its punishment isthat I should have only
You are to dieat the hands of my son
if you deem the Princeto be your son
will become the mediumof your salvation.
That is why, you hadsent me a message to come here.
of your greatnessbut today...
Your Highnesshad you known your daughter's
been that difficult.You have always deemed your
Draupadi's greatness.Look at her dedication.
was pacified by her.Draupadi!
Draupadi.Let's go inside, Draupadi.
from the city.Draupadi, come inside
He shall certainly pardon you.If a chariot loses its wheel
no self-respectthey cannot command
to have self-respectit is important for me
and what my strengths are.Goodbye, sister.
make the necessary arrangementsfor a grand procession.
Draupadi has decidedto leave Kampilya.
My...My daughter cannot
that today, becauseof Vasudev Krishna
S-She must not have gone far.I shall go and bring her back!
accomplish this task.Princess Draupadi.
W-Which mantra did you use?Share that knowledge
I did not use any mantra.No, you certainly did.
How?You must... You must
I do not believe you.Without the knowledge of mantras
In other words, you hadused the mantra of love.
the mantra of lovebut no one is able to use it.
you are free to do so.Go right ahead.
I am merely looking forthe answers to some questions.
What is the purpose of my life?To make my father accept
as to who you are.If you know yourself
Who am I?Every person is an image
In ash are hidden embersand in ignorance...
unable to see himselfhas the desire
what we areand who we are.
And the one whodoes not know himself
what must I do?You must bear righteousness
you must makethe necessary efforts.
Before knowing righteousnessyou need to know its bases.
justice, dedicationand patience.
You have been born to acquirethe five bases of righteousness.
future of the Aryan region.You will help
And this will only be possiblewhen these five bases
a peacock feather...Answer a question
pacify that mace?What do you think, Draupadi?
pacified for you.That is why,
friend?Why is it taking
that after years,they shall have
Closer...I cannot wish
on your opponent's side now.Pardon me.
you have shown us the pathto victory, Vasudev.
you do not wish for our victorywe will
the way the strength of a bowlies with the archer
The Narayani Army is indeeda superlative one in the world
even the Narayani Army can fail.We would never worry
Maharathi Bhishma with usas our General.
there is no need for theNarayani Army, King of Gandhar.
who will lead the Narayani Armyas its General?
Brotherthe result of a war
Even His Excellencycan die.
Without using treacheryHis Excellency Bhishma
the side you have chosenis a righteous one.
of treachery, King of Gandhar.Lord Ram was hiding
Dashanan Ravanhis brother Vibhishan
at the core of treacherythen even treachery
In other wordsyou will engage in treachery
Maharathi BhishmaGuru Drona
and that too by using treachery.If there is
then go ahead and find it.Panchali
The great war had begunthe very day, My Lord
will come to an end.The one 'akshauhini
father.We now have
have a maximumof only
the great Yadava Krishnawith them
he had defeated Jarasandhadestroyed Kalyavan
resonates of the taleof how he had straightened
the female ogre Putanawhen he was only six-months-old.
Duryodhanthat in this very court
When Krishnawas not present here
The daughter of Drupadwas born of fire, grandsire.
She must indeed be an ogre.But we fear no one
do not demonstrateyour fear,
We fear for you,Crown Prince.
but you seem to be forgettingthat if the entire army
then the entire armywill flee from the battlefield.
has relinquished his beakand claws voluntarily.
and everyone knows this.Pardon me but now is
of the enemy.In fact, it is time for us
because self-confidenceis the basis of competence.
Be calm.Before the war
Every viewpoint...But the Pandavas have
But the Pandavas havealready challenged us to a war
the date of the war.They...
The Pandavas seek an answerfrom you, Your Highness.
Seeking their refuge is outof the question, friend Karna.
Stop,son Duryodhan.
Meditate?Where is the time
have asked for an answerfrom us today itself!
No.I do not know if this date
The Great Sage Jaiminiis the most renowned astrologer
As you say,Your Highness.
I must find out whether this warwill benefit my sons
become the good fortuneof the Pandavas.
see the gates tothe city of Virat over there?
Pandavas will exit from thereand move northward
the General, uncle?No.
cannot be the General.Then who will be the General?
but the Commanderwill be no one but you.
responsibilitydoes not scare you,
uncle?A sword is hungry
the enthusiasm of victoryhas no place
will be slainand the new era will begin
Prince Arjun and Vasudev Krishnawill be here in the city
for welcome, maid!On my behalf
Have a festival held!Prince Abhimanyu should be
Ever since we moved awayfrom Indraprastha
Prince Abhimanyuand the other Princes.
In times of struggleswhen a child is born
He is the son of Arjun,the bearer of the Gandiva.
He is the discipleof Govind himself.
but he is not your son.He is the son
than one's own.The affection of a child
Abhimanyu the next King.However,
will apologize to Hastinapurand settle in Dwaraka.
will be the five sons of yoursand not Abhimanyu.
Queen Sudeshna.Sacrifice and righteousness
Your Highnessyou have lost the independence
in the game.My darling,
in the opponent's propertyplaying the game
a reduction in his mightwinning the game
Arjun will be my servant now.A person who is
of a charioteerbut abducting a woman
can be done only by ogres!Friend Duryodhan,
No, friend.I have decided
King Karna of Angahas even sold his soul to you!
Dear, Crown Prince Duryodhanhas bet
Until now, he was an accessoryto unrighteousness
being treated like propertyand being bet in the
I got to know from thecharioteer of the Crown Prince
And in the end, by enslavingthe innocent daughter of Drupad
Go on, Your Highness.Just four more points
Uncle, my patienceis giving in now.
Your Highness,I say this with great grief
You now haveonly one piece with you.
Prince Arjun has beenlost by the Emperor.
I give you a servantas a present.
where is your bow?What is it called again?
I have heard that Agni Devhad preyed upon the illusion
to make that bow, brother.Give it to Karna.
Give it!Do accept it,
then I shall imprison each Godresiding in the heavens
I have lost my independencebut not my competence.
I do not requireany celestial bow.
Servant Arjungo and kneel down over there.
in this round of the game.Get up, Duryodhan!
No, brother Bheem.I shall bet my beloved
This is the only opportunityto defeat me, Duryodhan.
Your Highnessshall we begin the game?
I know that you shall lose mebut my mace shall never be
will you answer a question?After losing
character and righteousness?I am ashamed of myself, Bheem.
yourself in this game.If you remain independent
King of Gandhar.Go on, my dice.
that of brother.I think, you will win
brother Bheembut has he ever wondered
No, he has not!Keep quiet,
the permission to interfere!Then you may
Master Duryodhan.You should resume the game now.
King of Gandhar.I have even lost
Brother Duryodhanyou now have nothing
and neither do I haveanything with me
So, I quit the game.[Script Info]
Title: mhbr season 001 dvd 001ScriptType: v4.00
Format: Name, Fontname, Fontsize, PrimaryColour, SecondaryColour, TertiaryColour, BackColour, Bold, Italic, BorderStyle, Outline, Shadow, Alignment, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, AlphaLevel, EncodingStyle: Default,Arial,20,16777215,65535,0,-2147483640,-1,0,1,3,0,2,10,10,10,0,1
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:43.89,0:00:44.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vichitravirya!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:43.88,0:01:45.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Surya!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:55.96,0:01:58.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Show yourself to me!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:59.70,0:02:02.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am invoking you!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:02.76,0:03:04.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The souls of my father\Nand ancestorsDialogue: Marked=0,0:03:04.83,0:03:06.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,are crying up in the heavens!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:28.75,0:03:30.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Let the future be the concern\Nof God, Bhishma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:31.69,0:03:34.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Be patient. - How can I\Nbe patient, Lord Surya?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:44.84,0:03:45.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The entire kingdom and IDialogue: Marked=0,0:03:47.81,0:03:50.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,had vested our hopes\Nin Vichitravirya
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:00.95,0:04:04.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What will become\Nof this kingdom, Lord Surya?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:04.82,0:04:05.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What will become of it?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:19.77,0:04:21.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,It has forsaken me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:21.84,0:04:24.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No, it has not forsaken you.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:24.83,0:06:27.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to accept the love of\Nher husbandDialogue: Marked=0,0:06:30.87,0:06:32.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but now
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:54.69,0:06:55.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,When widowedDialogue: Marked=0,0:06:56.86,0:07:00.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,unhappiness houses\Nthe heart of a woman.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:33.83,0:07:34.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Me?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:36.77,0:07:38.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I too have witnessed\Nthe demise of my husband.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:48.88,0:07:52.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You were fortunate to have a son\Nwith your husband, Queen Mother.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:54.85,0:07:56.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You were blessed with children.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:11.70,0:08:12.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Neither were we\Nblessed with a husbandDialogue: Marked=0,0:08:13.80,0:08:15.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,nor with children.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:23.85,0:08:25.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Why, Queen Mother?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:28.79,0:08:32.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No, neither are the two of you\Nrefugees here
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:40.83,0:08:43.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,that your sons\Nshall rule this kingdom.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:49.91,0:08:51.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Our sons?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:04.82,0:09:06.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,through the medium of 'Niyog'.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:09.76,0:09:11.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,In the event\Nof a person's demise
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:19.87,0:09:21.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,one can conceive a son.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:22.74,0:09:25.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This method is called 'Niyog
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:41.76,0:09:42.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,'Niyog'?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:43.76,0:09:45.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Before taking this decision
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:56.91,0:09:58.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am the Queen Mother\Nof Hastinapur.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:00.94,0:10:02.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,For the benefit of the throne
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:09.82,0:10:11.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,cannot affect such decisions.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:21.80,0:10:23.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The two of you\Nare queens as well.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:34.06,0:11:36.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Revered ParashuramDialogue: Marked=0,0:11:36.07,0:11:40.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,you had taken an oath to help\Nthe oppressed of this world.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:46.94,0:11:49.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,turned a blind eye to your\Nduties by denying me justice.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:51.15,0:11:53.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That is why today
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:01.06,0:12:03.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,for your entire life!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:26.08,0:13:28.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What do you want from me, lady?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:15.12,0:14:18.11,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,am I anxious for\NI anticipate good newsDialogue: Marked=0,0:14:18.96,0:14:21.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,or do I expect something\Nbad to happen?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:28.17,0:14:32.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but now, sage Ved Vyas\Nwill blessDialogue: Marked=0,0:14:32.04,0:14:34.17,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,the whole of Hastinapur\Nwith his efforts.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:07.11,0:15:10.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Tell the messenger to inform the\NGeneral and the Deputy GeneralDialogue: Marked=0,0:15:10.98,0:15:12.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,that the birth\Nof both the princes
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:45.15,0:15:47.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The birth of a son to a maidDialogue: Marked=0,0:15:47.12,0:15:49.10,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is not the reason\Nof celebration.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:08.97,0:16:11.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Ayurvati, what news\Ndo you bring?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:11.97,0:16:14.17,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I hope, the babies\Nare in the best of health.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:21.12,0:16:24.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That is why, I am being punishedDialogue: Marked=0,0:16:24.12,0:16:26.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,for delivering\Nthis bad news to you.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:05.86,0:17:08.63,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,the value of a mango\Nlies not in its shapeDialogue: Marked=0,0:17:08.76,0:17:10.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but in its taste.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:19.71,0:17:20.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Bear this in mind.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:32.82,0:17:35.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But how will he live?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:42.80,0:17:44.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The future will be a happy oneDialogue: Marked=0,0:17:45.77,0:17:48.65,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,filled with courage and glory.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:14.76,0:18:18.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,by his capability and glory.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:22.77,0:18:24.60,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Bhishma...
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:33.81,0:18:35.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,In the summer monthsDialogue: Marked=0,0:18:35.88,0:18:39.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,even the shadow of\Na cloud lights a tree up
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:50.63,0:18:52.62,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The birth of the princesDialogue: Marked=0,0:18:52.77,0:18:55.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,has filled Hastinapur\Nwith new hope, Bhishma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:39.85,0:19:42.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,the ocean had made\Neven stones float on it.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:43.82,0:19:45.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Do you not know of this?
Hoping to get somethingin charity from you.
for a Warrior's motherto gather courage?
I didn't havethe courage.
I could have acceptedmy character being questioned
How could'veI tarnished that, son?
than your son's life.No, son.
I lacked the senseto understand
I am the result of your mistake.My entire life is the result
I'm here to rectifythat mistake, son.
Now you cometo be my mother?
about that mother of minewho has stayed up
Whenever someone ridiculed meupon seeing a bow in my hand
What do I doabout that mother
because now people willno more address me as her son
What do I doabout that mother?
as your mother.We can change
How can one changethe past, Queen Mother?
I was always in front of youbut you never accepted me.
No one can changethe past.
Your son has drownedin the tide of misfortune
Where will youlook for him?
is burningin the flames
Queen Mother.We can end this complexity,
receive paininsult or tears.
You'll be referred toas the eldest of my sons.
brothers and guide them.Abandon my friend?
will that make youproud of me?
Why are you taking his side,son? - Because he had once
did not lend her support.During those dark times
And for that onerighteous deed
My weapons will foreverbe indebted to
against your own brothers, son?And that will be the most
you've committed.Even after I surrendered
Had you done so, motherthen today, I would have
in your favour.But now...
I am bound today.I witness immorality
at every step, but I...I am bound by a promise.
would injure my brothersmy heart would bleed too.
But, I...I cannot break my vows
in the war, son.Even that encompasses creed.
Is it reasonable for one'spride to be their creed?
I am aware of my creed.I cannot renounce it.
Farewell, Queen Mother.You chose to remain silent
was borne by me alone.I am accustomed
please do not hurt everyone.Do not tell my five brothers
that they are firmin their creed.
And I...I would slay their competence
Let the war materialise, mother.Do not inform them
in their ignorance.I have...
and that will be my identitytill death.
slaying each other...How can I be an audience to it?
be so dreadful?How is it fair, son?
How could it be so?Weren't you here to ask
You would need to mournthe death of only one son.
Only Arjuna and Iwould combat to vanquish
at the hands of Arjunaall five sons of yours
at my handseven then five sons of yours
I would address you as 'mother'.This is my promise,
Karna...Madhav has sent a message.
I will direct all of our troopsto leave for the river route.
total obliteration.Don't say that, Your Highness.
You are right.Arjuna... Bhima... Send a message
Arjun!Stop, Duryodhan.
Hence, don't get angry, dear.Because tomorrow morning.
The less the burden of comforts are,the easier the journey gets.
Just keep it in an upright position.Arjun!
after his death he goes to heaven.Grandsire
I even insulted you, Grandsire.But the respect my heart holds
leader of Hastinapur, Grandsire.The leader who stopped you from
I will definitely forgive you, dear.F- Forgive... Forgive me, Grandsire.
Even you have righton my blessings, dear.
that while breathing your last,your face will have a
you achieve contentmentout of righteous deeds,
out of unrighteous deeds,you will go to the nether world.
couldn't give up on your inclinations.I had thought that in your last moments,
you have always been against me, Grandsire.Look, Grandsire...
You have to suffer.Duryodhan,
How could you curse Grandsire?All these are pointless, Bheem.
The movement of sun hasnothing to do with it.
The minute he sacrificed traditionsand recognised the true
you don't need to worry, Bheem.You are blessed with the
No, dear.Pain
All of youshould stop worrying about my pain.
will continue to hurt mein the form of arrows, Vasudev.
Only then will I be ableto let go of this body.
Only then will thesubjects of the Kuru dynasty
will I accept my departure to heaven.Now
all alone.All of you should now depart.
Hastinapur's flag has been destroyed.And the pillar that held it
has been destroyed.I know everything, Vidura.
attacked Hastinapur's dignity and prestige.All the five had together attacked, Vidura.
With arrows!Pandavas, Your Highness?
An old man, who has the rights on all the comforts in the world. He was handed weapons...And taken to the battlefield,
respected and honored...The eldest member of such a family...
allegations by your son.Whose death-bed...
Even when the birds leave their nest,
and kill me, beheaded me.But I will not be able 
children live,why didn't you kill them
Are you watching?Look, my hands lost 
Don't leave me in times like this.It's your sons that have
You cannot place it on the throne.Your son is the coal of 
tried to give that son the throne!
I have renounced you, sire.I will not see you even at the 
like fire to me.Yes.
the throne and the nation,to the best of my ability.
for as long as it has been,going on.
will be victorious and succesfull.And you...
- Duryodhan, defeat...Calm down!
to Hastinapur tomorrow.You have to arrange
Defeated!But lord, the princes of
like celebrations.But when my son returns
what would be his plight,Gandhari?
how would my Duryodhantolerate it?
But my son is not.In the lamps lighted on the
on fire, Gandhari.All the desires.
then the mirror isn't at fault.Instead, the appearance
Duryodhan is thatas the heir to the throne
How would he agree to it?How would he?
How would he bow his headbefore Yuddhistir?
decide right nowbetween us.
I consider a duel with youas a defeat, Duryodhan.
isn't appropriate.When two logs of
And all the woodsburn down to ashes.
The throne of Hastinapurbelongs to me.
throne of Hastinapuror fight a duel.
Do not take an oath whichwould hurt our father's soul.
decidesI will agree with it.
would be like deceiving thesubjects of the Kuru dynasty.
that his sonbe coronated on the throne
Hastinapur.Panchaal.
towards Ashwathama.Dhrupad will himself
I return the half of thedivided kingdom to you.
The grand valourof the ancestors...
If there is a forest fireit only makes the land
the same land.I am sure there would
will be hoisted on thepalace of Hastinapur.
against those ace warriors?You were defeated in
potentials of Pandu's sons.Haven't you heard the
it was Lord Indra's weapon.They are undefeatable.
Would you point yourweapons at them?!
You know that very well.These talks are futile,
been blessed by Lord Shiva!I was a fool
Shikandini, one cannot applyturmeric on silver ornaments
Go, Shikandini!You are useless to me.
and rule.A competition?
Sire Bhishma andthe chief minister termed
Dushasan is right, father.Tomorrow, you have to
How would I, son?Show me a way.
Even if your prove that Dhrupador Drona cheated you
What are you saying, father?What is the need to
superiority of the Pandavashow can I make the
Yuddhistir as the King tomorrow.Father, I believed you.
At court, if you declareYuddhistir as the King
Don't do that.If you revolt, then...
Charcoal is born out of fire.But even then, if charcoal
to burn it into ashes.Hail the sons of Pandu!
- Hail!Hail the sons of Pandu!
with your rightful duties.The chance is standing
At court, if you declareYuddhistir as the King
Duryodhan!Duryodhan.
thanks to your blessings.We have fulfilled our duty
Your deed must have pleasedyour teacher, Drona.
- Bless you.Congratulations on winning
Greetings, sister.Greetings, Dhrishtadyumna.
who has sworn neverto ride a chariot
worried aboutyour daughter's future.
of the futurehas been decided.
the result of our presentdecisions and deeds.
then have faithyou will definitely be blessed
of archerywas won by a Brahman, Vidur.
of our spy reads the same.That when no prince
to a young Brahman.Then, Vidur
in order to getthat young Brahman
another conspiracyget all the five Pandavas
Brahman Batukeshwarisn't it necessary during
Uh!I didn't ask this young Brahman
V-Vateshwar.Vateshwar!
Why do you want to knowabout my lineage?
Hey!Hey!
Someshwar.Som...
Yoursecret was not revealed.
your lineage.You can't remember your name.
I have learnt archerythat's why I'm good.
I'm a Brahman.Hence I don't wield a bow.
Why did you halt?He says that the princess
alone with you.Hey...
Show me his face.Come on, quick!
Brahman Batukeshwarwill you get us married
Butare these the marital chants?
what the marital chants are?- Brother Someshwar
Yes.Those chants were...
You made a very big mistake,Brahman Batukeshwar.
No one has the courageto marry a demoness.
You're right, sir.But if you kill the demoness
How do you know this, princess?The king's spies give him
only demons can winagainst the demons, right?
no ordinary Brahmancan defeat them.
A demon has won me?I definitely have
as a demon to you?What?
You please stop crying.Brother Someshwar, would
Now go and persuadethe princess.
Apologise for what?If you want to have
My name is Arjun.And he is brother Bheem.
Hence we are disguisedas Brahmans.
hear it from you.Let's go.
I had never imaginedthat someone would
then how can I wear them?Give them.
Other than those that arethe symbol of auspiciousness
me a part of thisI couldn't understand.
into the 'SwayamvarI knew
Your intuition is alwaystrue, Sahadev.
Brotherhere they are.
what happened?What took you so long?
hence I was waiting for it.But I couldn't get
It was His Highness, Shakuniwho provoked all the kings
will step forwardand I'll kill him.
Don't be unjust to Karna,brother Bheem.
Brother Sumangalwhy are you referring
But why are youreferring to Vateshwar
I am sure Arjun has toldPrincess Draupadi
The one who is capableof being a life partner
Brother, hadn't I told youthat I had an intuition?
You're not married yet.You're the princess of Panchal.
But I have vowed tocomplete this journey
you should first seekmother's blessings.
Arjunlet's go.
Mother must be waiting.- As you say.
She must be done by now.You're welcome, Princess.
You shouldn't say that, son.Since childhood
- It's my order, Yudhishthirathat whatever Arjun
all you brothers.What have you done, uncle?
the dice keep changingconstantly, my darlings!
The Pandavas.Before the Pandavas perform
the kingdom of Hastinapurit is important
We cannot attackthe city of Dwaraka
Howeverafter performing
then we will have to,my darlings!
we were insulted by Krishnafor which we must
we must snatch from the Pandavastheir beloved city
from the Yadavasbut
Who will fighton behalf of Hastinapur?
If that happensthen the Pandavas
and the hold over Indraprasthawill both fall into our laps.
His army is a miserable one.Jarasandha's might
an army of brave warriors.Then how could he understand the
My friendyou must deliver
Go on.Where are you going
is in danger, Vrushali.I have to go to Magadha
the kingdom, My Lord.I had renounced the kingdom
on the back of a horseuntil the reins are
And I shall indeedbe bound by it, Vrushali.
on numerous occasions.Protecting him when he is in
I do not wish to comein the way of your duty
This is the lifestyle of Kings!They venture out every day
for them today.If need be, My Lord
Do not argueunnecessarily, Vrushali.
The entire army of Hastinapuris there to protect your friend
is only you, My Lord.The gates will seem
and solid ground will seemlike areas containing water.
created by Mayasur for our city.All the Kings arriving
upon seeing our prosperity.What is the need for such
to construct somethingthat can give rise
brother Yudhishthir.He will explain us
That is why, be it a prisonof bricks or that of a heart
Punish them!Punish them, Your Highness!
andthe person who is
The King of Anga.These are not arrows,
of Lord Surya himselfand no one can stop them!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
he will spend his entire lifeshooting at you and leaving you
You will be robbedof your strength.
but the friendship ofMaharathi Karna never will.
of Crown Prince Duryodhanare differentiated
that creates something newwhile might is something
but the importanceof competence is way higher.
it is essentialfor all the Kings
That is whyI had suggested you to create
the people who seesuch a grandiose structure
Upon seeing any great structurethe subjects of that kingdom
in order to make the kingdommore prosperous, the subjects
lies neither in his armynor in the strength of his
lies in the sense of pride hissubjects have for the kingdom
The competence of a Kinglies in his army
You have had the entireAryan region terrorized
Who is the personwho makes certain
obeyed by people?That is why
able to kill Vasudev Krishna.Who is the person who makes certain
obeyed by people?That is why
able to kill Vasudev Krishna.The killing of Jarasandha
and the constructionof a grandiose court
When you shall accomplishboth these tasks
will deem youthe undefeated Emperor.
only when grandsirewill go to Magadha himself
But brother Yudhishthirin exchange of accepting
we become independentwe shall annex
to attack, brother Yudhishthir.I am getting restless
everyone obey your ordersare warriors
He can go to far-off placesand make people
you must becomethe undefeated Emperor.
will you be able to killVasudev Krishna
to take over Indraprasthaand annihilate the Pandavas.
Emperor Jarasandhaand no one can
very intelligent,King of Gandhar
will be my first stepto attacking Dwaraka
Brother Yudhisthiryour army shall indeed
will be the beginningof your Rajsuya 'Yajna.
that Prince Arjunwishes to meet her.
Tell him to enter!Wait!
Walk carefully. I have placedthose clothes there to be dried
graceful dancer, son of Pandu.Are you contented now
Did your brother Krishna teachyou to exact revenge like so?
had abducted your parentsthen in order to
My brother Krishna saysthat justice makes
then the world will loseits state of balance.
He compels oneto meditate over things.
So, you've come to meto learn about him?
why did your brother Krishnaleave from Mathura?
your brother defeated him.He could have done so
Son of PanduI hope you will invite me
brother Bheem will get married.My marriage is
You should leave.I have to get ready
But first, answer my question.I don't know.
that the path leadingto Dwaraka from here
Travelling by that pathis not safe.
Hastinapur now?Certainly.
Duryodhan hasaccepted Yudhishthir
Righteousness dwellsin his heart.
Get ready to leavetomorrow at dawn.
A Few Days Later.We need to let our horses
and have your meal.Are you certain
despite me being with you?No...
and that no weapon can kill him.He is ghostly white
Your brother Krishna comes upwith the most fascinating tales!
Hey, where are you going?I do not require your help.
Let's go.I do not wish to rest here.
You will have to come back!And what if you
What happened?Did you come across Kalyavan?
Subhadra!Subhadra!
- I am your doom, Kalyavan.If you are not Krishna
that if I abductKrishna's sister
And if you are Krishnathen protect her.
Brother Krishna!- Brother Krishna!
and saveyour sister from this demon!
you seem to be flying too high!You think you are
the King of Magadha!Then come here
Your discipleArjun.
capability of escapingeven the fire of a volcano.
If they are alive then whydo they not show themselves?
in Draupadi's 'swayamvarif I have to send the invites
an invitation, King Drupad.Go ahead and conduct
of the Aryan regionthen Arjun will be sent here
- All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
the rest of the humans.Stop...
I beg of you.Do not sacrifice them.
Be quiet!Ogres
that giant and inferior man.She has forgotten..
And the arch-enemies of us ogresare these humans.
Hidimbado not talk like a fool.
we will pleaseour Lord Vrikodar!
King Hidimb, how can theyhave a meal before you?
dine together.Sahadev.
Yes, it is an insultto the King.
He never lies.Brother, is it not a sin?
you will have to kill me.Hidimba, do not worry.
Go ahead, King Hidimb.No!
Arjun..Sons, all of you
Go ahead, King Hidimb.I await to become your meal.
this giant man.All hail Lord Vrikodar!
- All hail Lord Vrikodar!Is Vrikodar
Now, go ahead andoffer him some sacrament.
Arjun?Thank you!
His father, King Panduhad renounced the kingdom
had been appointedthe interim King.
wants to become King.But ascension to the throne
With regard to thisthe throne of Hastinapur
envy and dejectionDuryodhan sent the five brothers
if these rumours are truethen the Pandavas let
and you call them powerful?Protest is not a proof
who tolerateand the ones who can do so.
injustice to be a power?When the heart gets expunged
strength of righteousness.From anger stems revenge
stems justice, Draupadi.Draupadi
with some form of injusticebefore you resort to justice
We shall not beable to eat more.
will not suffice me. Bring more.You need not go.
Your Highness.Your Highness!
Sahadev, Nakul, Arjunbe quiet.
your entire life.B-But
brother Yudhishthir?Yes, Bheem.
will brother Bheem have tomarry an ogre now?
have any premonition?This is an auspicious sign
being dressed like ogres.Could you not
that she would show usthe way out of here
That is because, brother Bheemif you had left this forest
to Princess Hidimha.So, this is
to sacrifice him, Devaki.No, brother!
is meant to slay you.This is what the voice
is poisonous, Vasudev.I will not spare
the entire nation should knowthat if a person even
right after his birth!Devaki
No, brother!I will not give my son to you!
He is soft and fragile.- Let me go!
Just look at him,brother.
Even a lion cubis defenseless and fragile
the King of the Jungle!That is why, I will not let
- No, Kansa!No!
My Lord...You are my doom?
but please let him live!Let him go,
My Lord...Let me go...
We will sacrificeseven children of ours
to slay you will indeed be born!If you have the competence
Unclewere all the children
Yes, dear.Both sins and merits
attracts the secondand the second
one good deed leads to anotherwhile one sin leads to another.
But a personblinded by arrogance
The tradition ofunrighteousness and crime
and deceitful actsand crimes
and grandsire Vasudevable to make so many sacrifices?
was sacrificed each time?Dear Prativindhya
mother Devaki and father Vasudevwere robbed
those childrenwere not sacrificed, dear.
they were the brave martyrs.The happiness
of the sacrifices for the peopletrying to establish
of the sinnersis the limit
until the sinners and their sinsget annihilated
cannot come to an end.Am I correct,
the wicked Kansakilled all the children
a sign...A sign of death
then I will not be able to live!I will not be able to live!
then I too shall embrace death.But I have firm faith,
the entire worldour eighth son
not be able to kill him.The power to thwart
Guard!What is this
Guard!Guard!
Go to the prisonand examine the situation.
I shall have you beheaded!Go! - As you say,
Devaki's eighth sonwill indeed be born.
bless you!When Hiranyaksh had submerged
and salvaged the earth.In my Narasimha Avatar
I had established King Baliin the netherworld.
of righteousnesseach time their hearts
takes the place of loveand arrogance
his own subjectsand begins to covet
I am born on this earth.Today,
another avatar of mine.The two of you
Upon seeing your agonyeven the Gods in the heavens
the worldwill receive
I will be born as your sonand play in your lap,
I shall enter your wombwith all my skills and powers.
That sounded like the screamof your eldest brother, My Lord.
performing the 'Sandhyavandana?Maybe a crocodile bit him
Please go and havea look, My Lord.
That is the second time he hasscreamed for help, My Lord.
today is the last dayof our exile.
That is what we fear.He must have attacked
Please go and havea look, My Lord!
I shall protect myselfwith this sword, My Lord.
Who are youand why have you come
I am King Jayadrath of Sindhuand Dushala's husband.
Welcome!Pardon me...
to perform the 'Sandhyavandana.I know that.
Panchali is by herselfin the hut, brother Yudhishthir!
King of Sindhu?!I have come to take you away.
Now,how about
wicked man!Let's go!
Let go!My Lord!
Let go...My Lord!
My Lord!Panchali!
It was Dushala's husband,brother Yudhishthir!
to go to the kingdom of Sindhu.We must stop him
uncle.Even the Pandavas have
King of Sindhu is on his way.Do not worry,
Let go!Let go!
none of us can attack him.If we break our promise
Wait until it is sundown.No one shall attack
a finger on DraupadiKing Jayadrath of Sindhu?!
would go unpunished by me?!Here you go!
Attack!Stop!
disappear?!We must find them before dusk!
Where did the threeof them disappear?!
the punishment awardedto a person who tries to
but we must slay you!Then you must
he asked me to.Does a piece of wood
King of Sindhu?!Bheem!
be present in these woods!Soldiers!
looks at a woman with depravityfear should take him over!
Whoever tries to save a scorpionfrom drowning in the water
I hope you know that.This man will hurt you someday!
butwe cannot leave
I have found the crownof the King of Sindhu.
It is almost sundown.Do what you have to
so that even Duryodhanlearns a lesson!
him that even the five Pandavaswill always be present
Brothers.How could they escape
The question is nothow they left.
My darlingbefore a year is over
my darling.Good fortune was on
Fortune!What is fortune,
is merely another termfor our weakness.
only in winning a game of diceand not an empire!
that for the past twelve yearsthe glory of being the Emperor
Treacheryand cheating have
Is Bheem more powerful than me?When compared to
uncle?The individual competence
However,in a battle
but the might of the army.The number of Kings
The love the subjectshave for you
is formed with the affectionand trust of all the Kings.
- You want a war!You want a war?!
if we do not find the Pandavasif you
and if their life of anonymitycannot be rendered
Lord...Don't say anything
Emotions are really peculiar.They flow like water and then
In the same way, myheart kept running
It kept stumbling.The way a dam stops
one's thought processcan be stopped due to
Pandu from the battlefieldmy thought process stopped
I was unfortunateand no one has
I had rejected you, Gandhari.If I realize my mistake
with happiness today.Now that I have shown
When you gift me witha son in the future
He will become the king.He will become the heir to
enthroned, Gandhari.Will you gift me with
To fulfil your wishesI can even go
we will together go tothe God of death, Gandhari.
Stop!Lord, look at that.
Please bring me its skinfor my throne.
If the deer has fawnsthey may turn into orphans.
What's so unusualabout it, Lord?
your wife's simple wish?I'm not asking you
Madri, you should open yourmouth to speak good things
Kshatriyas are usedto killing animals.
the Yadav clan, sister?And the Yadavs are
No!Sage Kindam! Was that you?
What have you done?You shot the arrow
in the form of a deer.Fool!
didn't you realize that it wasan unusual deer?
a grave mistake.It isn't a mistake but a crime!
*Father of Rama who killed a boy, mistaking him to be a deer, and cursed by the boy's blind parents.Did you forget
What kind of a king are you?How will a cruel king like you
suffer a punishment.You have disturbed the intimacy
If you cohabit with a woman...If you establish a conjugal
"Greetings!""I greet the King!"
Bhishma and the ministers!""Greetings!"
"The doubts dance onmy head like spirits."
"Should I?Answer this."
"He rests and also travels.""He is freedom
"Tell me. Who is it?""Come on, tell me.
"Perfect!Well done, sire."
It is always constant.""The experts surrender
"Devotion.""Experience."
" Love . ""Wonderful!
"A forehead like the sun,his shoulders broad enough"
of righteousness.""Tell me."
"My elder brother,prince Dhritarashtra!"
"The one who answers it,will be proven intelligent."
"If you answer the question,I would agree"
"What is the clown saying?""Brother"
The king has arrived ona very auspicious occasion.
Look at the gamesplayed by time.
I curse you!If you establish a conjugal
PanduI hope you have understood
Yes, Queen Mother.Just like grief, happiness
Brother, I amextremely happy.
What kind of a king are you?How will a cruel king like you
something important.I killed sage Kindam
ruling a kingdom, Queen Mother.I have killed sage Kindam!
So, I have decidedthat from this very moment
facing the eight directionsand gave them the responsibility
and the heavens.I hope you know that.
And they are restrictedby the same.
filled with grief and remorse,like you
what would happen?The entire creation would
Lord Vishnu will appoint someother animal to bear the burden
because of one entityand neither would the
and your uncle's peace wouldsurely be destroyed, dear.
longer worthy.I am no longer worthy.
You should fast and abstain.Uncle, that would be deceit.
How would my sinsbe washed away
- Don't stop me, uncle.The one who holds the sceptre
and do justice with everyoneis the duty of a king, uncle.
his punishment, uncle?In order to
this deceptive Krishnahas conspired.
Bhishma be honoured?Then why was Krishna
the extent of stealing girlsfor your Princes.
of your sins?Only 100!
as promised to your mother.And before you came here
You're a lewd manwho marries
stand on one legand play the flute and perform
Radha was marriedto Ayan Yadav.
in your endearinginfatuation.
You are the world's mostimmoral being, Krishna.
this sinful paththat you're unable to keep
I'm doing, Krishna.And I also know why
of your lewdness.Definitely, Draupadi
that you should be giventhe greatest of honours.
rest in peace.What sordid justice is
like thisbe considered appropriate?
is this how you're goingto establish righteousness
Sishupal insulted grandsireVasudeva
He also insulted daughter-in-lawof the Kuru dynasty, Rukmini
The punishment must alwaysbe lesser than the crime.
from committing a crimehe will go on to commit
He loses control over himself.He continues to
The wayan infant is forcefully stopped
it is necessaryto stop a criminal
It's sympathy!Don't unnecessarily worry
from this poisonous cycle.Don't try to fool me,
the name of punishment.You have violated
Vasudeva is right.Be seated.
We had sworn toprotect each other.
then my beinga warrior
I challenge you to a duel.My dear, Vasudeva is right.
Brother Duryodhan,don't degrade the sanctity
I don't forgive anyonewho dares to raise
If this is the beginningof the battle
Before fighting the battle,it is mandatory
is present though!You can indeed call for
or step down fromthe post of Hastinapur's prince.
I request youto put your weapons down.
Don't be foolish.Destiny defeats the one
even before anyone elsedefeats them.
Yes, punish him!Your Highness, punish him!
Yes, punish him!Your Highness,
The sky doesn't forgivebut punishes them.
Prince Duryodhanfor his mistake.
Whereas he had only triedto protect the honour
Duryodhan is my brother.By punishing him, I can't
Destiny paves its own path.Don't worry.
Shall I say something?I don't see any reason
brother-in-law Duryodhan.But Govind is insisting
it's consideredpunishment enough
Order brother-in-law Duryodhanto give up his weapon.
With due respectwe'll send his weapon
punishment for meDraupadi!
brother-in-law.This is a solution to the conflict
the taint that was tossedon your clothes
Brother Duryodhan,it's my order
you're not allowedto hold your weapon.
from brother Duryodhanbrother Dushasan
hand over your weapons.This is my order.
there's blood shedhow does it make a difference,
to death penalty.Come on, hand over
Fall to the feet of Draupadiand beg for forgiveness
Could you do so much, Prince?Pardon me, Krishna!
All these talks are futile.If you indeed wish to avoid
that seems reasonable.But can you make your friend
I cannot order him.When a dog riding an elephant
who is blamedfor supporting the dog
that is the base ofthe Prince's tyranny.
to the Prince.Only that shall make up
to your friend.I have faith in your virtue.
Rather than betraying my friendI would choose to die.
a final effort.No forgiveness,
no wealth.Give the Pandavas free reign
[TENSE MUSIC]Friend!
This is deceit, King of Anga.This is deceit.
freedom to ruleby getting them five towns.
the sons of Panducan challenge us for battle.
under any circumstanceswants to pit the hundred
in the battlefield.Without any help from
King of Gandhar.If the sons of Dhritarashtra
as their shield.I approve of this peace proposal
The Pandavas are giving upauthority for peace.
King Dhritarashtra,the right is yours!
free reign over five towns.Duryodhan, my son.
Liberate the entire clanfrom the gravity
from this pain, son.Five towns!
Shall I acceptthat I fear those Pandavas?
if a stoneis thrown at a dog and a lion
roars at the ones who threw it!Will I ever be afraid
This is a matter ofpersonal rivalry, father!
the entire atmosphereseems to be poisoned
a foul smelling bull.But I cannot grant five towns
the status of a wife.But I cannot grant five towns
*Yama or Yamaraja, the god of death.But I cannot grant five towns
Forget about five townsI won't give the Pandavas
I won't!Think for the last time before
destiny closing in upon youI hope you do not have to run
that the sun has set.You are overlooking the gravity
your abilities, Grandsire?Braver than you
are your rivals.Not just the Pandavas.
Do not forget it, Duryodhan.Master Drona.
What greatness is this?I shall assuage your worry
Soldiers!Soldiers, arrest this shepherd!
Duryodhan, you may diethis very moment.
Brother Bheem is the onewho has sworn to slay him!
Shackle my wrists![CHAIN RATTLING]
Get up!Shackle his wrists!
[THUNDER RUMBLING]Your soldiers cannot bear the
commit this deed.Pick up the shackles!
Flaunt your might![YELLING]
Son!Wait, son!
[DURYODHAN LAUGHS][CONTINUE LAUGHING]
with a messenger of peaceisn't appropriate.
He has a dangerous mind.Is he
Even at Draupadi's 'swayamvarhe had done such a thing.
Yes.Krishna has again made
Subhadra.On behalf of Queen Gandhari
These are items of good fortunefor the bride-to-be, dear.
to Prince Duryodhan, aunt?Dear
this alliancewas approved by your
then it will be an insultto King Dhritarashtra
and Hastinapur.But what about my feelings?
held in the palmsduring a benediction.
does not consume itthen the water
my husband a long time ago.I am the water
What...What are you saying, dear?
Why do you not order your sonto come here and marry me?
and I will be savedfrom my ill-fortune as well.
at the moment.His...
unknown to me, dear.Then...
Despite having two able brothersdo I not have the right
The alliance betweenthe Kurus and the Yadavas
Have faith in him.Krishna will never let
And I believe him as well.Krishna will do
Vasudev Krishna has asked youto go to
at the momentand he has asked you
Vasudev Krishna has saidthat if the holy man comes here
You should go, dear.Krishna must certainly have
Run...Run...
Bless...- Oh!
in Dwarka.Uh!
No, Vasudev.No.
All we know isthat be it man's life
King of Gandhar,we Yadavas only know
the one who buildsa boat of righteousness
This is my son Pradyumna.Dear, go and seek the blessings
May happiness fill your life!Father, the ball.
It is one of the games I adore!Here you go.
happiness from an ascetic?Give me the blessing
With whose orderare you getting married?
If Madhav wantsthe Yadavas to be
Do you know my brother?He must indeed,
can see even the future.Nothing is hidden from them.
I am engagedin a penance, maiden.
that one's penance endsin the Somnath Temple.
Then let's go.Even I wish to see
listen very carefully to me.I love my nephews a lot.
The throne of Hastinapurrightfully belongs
a life of darkness.So, she should at least
That is it!This is my plan.
But how am I interfering in it?Vasudev
the Rajsuya yajnathen it will become independent
and nephews.The entire Kuru kingdom
And it shall indeed be so,King of Gandhar.
and Princess Subhadra marriedand I have even convinced
either, King of Gandhar.An alliance between
The presence of righteousnessincludes my presence too.
Now you must tell mewhere I am interfering.
ordered to travel fromthe North to the South
would be complete.But I assure you,
the Somnath Temple at the momentis not a part of my plans.
the Somnath Temple myself.I warn you
because of a plan of yoursthen Hastinapur and Dwarka
the Somnath Templethen Hastinapur and Dwarka
You are quite the comedian,King of Gandhar!
do not believe meyou may go to the Somnath Temple
or not.Boys!
Subhadra.Greetings, brother.
with your own brother?It looks as though
M-My lord..Son Dhritarashtra.
I have been ready for years,mother.
Today, your wait will end, son.Today, you will become
I too am experiencingsuch great happiness.
are sworn into their rankswe must reach the court.
not to accompany me.While moving towards the throne,
the Kuru Princecannot sit on the throne
Greetings, grandfather.May you live long.
May you prosper.With this 'tilak,
With this 'tilakI inculcate dedication
With this white apparelI acquire righteousness
By acquiring this golden scepterI accept the throne of
and affectionshall be secondary to me.
and steadfast.Like this armour
Like this swordI shall always lead in war.
shall always be held high by me.For the happiness and glory
of undying struggle.For the reputation and
of undying struggle.Long live Chief Minister Vidur!
Long live General Pandu!Long live Chief Minister Vidur!
Long live General Pandu!Greetings, grandfather.
May you prosper, my son.After 25 years,
This is one amongst the happiestmoments of my life.
For all these years,Bheeshma and I
Dhritarashtrato coronate you as the king
Chief Minister Vidurwhat is the reason behind
that I have just taken an oath..As the Chief Minister
the truth, righteousnessthe interest of
shall be secondary to me.That is why, Queen Mother
What unrighteousness,Chief Minister?
This coronation ceremonyis unrighteous.
is unworthyof becoming the king.
Is this some sort of a facade?Neither is this an attempt
of the subjectsrighteousness demands
Chief Minister Vidur?You knew in advance about
not strike you then?Righteousness changes according
I have heard such a thingfor the first time.
but righteousness?Hastinapur is a big kingdom.
Prince Shakuni!You do not have the right
Pardon me, great Bheeshma.Pardon me.
This is an accepted normin the entire region of Arya.
can be answered onlyby the righteous
your question as well.To see absolutely no flaw
of a younger brother.But when the merits and demerits
of an elder brotheris the duty of a Chief Minister.
only then does the eldest sonhave this right, Queen Mother.
but the monsoonare way more important
It is written in the scripturesthat the milk of a lioness
and not in onemade out of copper.
can be carried outonly be a complete person
You call me incomplete!Pardon me,
Quiet.I have been insulted enough,
Stop.Take me to my Lord, Sukta.
Dhritarashtra cannotbecome an able king?
Vision is the first weaponof a king, Queen Mother.
by their facial expressionshe will not be able to identify
he sees the stateof his subjects.
to the king for justiceapart from hearing
at his pain, Queen Mother.How will a blind person
Pardon me, Queen Mother.The Chief Minister,
are aides of the King.It is their duty
Brother Dhritarashtra..Brother, listen to me.
I am incomplete?Me?
the one who gave it his bestto become normal
I am incomplete?I cannot become the king?
As the Chief Minister,perhaps it's his duty.
Do I beg them?Despite being the eldest child
should I plead for my rights?Those courtiers, the council of
and will be my servants..Should I plead to them?
Brother, never have I..I understand everything.
have together conspiredagainst me!
no merit, brother!Never have l even dreamt
the council of ministersand the General
to follow the king.When the king of a state is weak
of the state become impudent.That is why,
fit to become the king.Prince of Gandhar!
The duty of a thorn is toprotect the tree, Queen Mother.
to take the place of a flower.I am one such thorn
kingdom's welfare will ariseI shall assume
that flowers are offered to God.Thorns are the first ones
I shall always fulfill myresponsibility as a thorn.
royal throne of HastinapurI don't doubt Vidur's dedication
But even this thronecannot remain vacant any longer.
crowned as the king.The driver of man's life
a reason to be fearful.The paths we choose in our lives
Think about it.Fear means,
of trouble.But who is the lord of time?
more agonising.But a heart filled with faith
In other wordsthe reason for which man
in complete opposition to it.Is this not true?
the sweetest, brother?Anything achieved with strength
As long as your elder brotherBhim is alive
Go ahead and eat.- And until Duryodhan is alive
Why are you saying so,Duryodhan?
They stole their mangoes.They insulted them.
The way Bhim is my brother,so are you.
Bhim, be quiet....when they become impudent.
Who have come to our kingdomas mere refugees?
Bhim!Duryodhan is your brother.
of a behaviour is this?Release me...
- Stop, Prince Duryodhan!Impudent Prince!
with each passing moment.How dare you behave so within
Pardon us, grandsire!Even Bhim
as Duryodhan.Then both of you
the temple overnightwill be your act of repentance.
Go!Mother, we face a great peril.
the five of you must share it.Are they foolish, uncle?
They are not foolish.They are devious.
of fooling people.When they had arrived
but now...But now, I am afraid of them,
Now you mustcomplete your act of repentance
Before wearing a garlandof flowers
of it, beloved Duryodhan.There are five thorns here.
I will break themand throw them away, uncle.
I shall send himto Death.
Bhim, what hadhappened yesterday?
that grandsire haspunished the five of you.
worshiping the Lord.You told us to share whatever
brother Bhim the whole night.But what had happened?
It was nothing, mother.I just ate a few mangoes.
mother.Yudhishthir, because I might get
But you never lie.Tell me what had happened.
are unhappy with our arrival.They intend to have us removed
- And?What brother-in-law Vidur
In a matter of 15 yearsthis place has
The five of youmust always stay together.
Here, the five of youare your only protectors.
A very bad feeling.This is the poison of Gandhar,
dip their arrows in thisin order to kill
Did you understand?No?
I have come upwith a plan, nephews.
catch that ball.Brother Bhim, you can
to the game.What happened?
Where is she?What is this?
That is a doll.No, she is my friend.
and gently sway her.Then she will be
Yes, brother. You must ridour sister's friend of her pain.
Please take her in your armsand sway her.
namely Dushala, happy thenthere should be no objection.
have some 'laddoos?I don't want any.
Stop!What happened? - My friend
give her some 'laddoos.Be quiet, Dushala!
Return brother Bhim his ball.But, brother Duryodhan,
take you to mother.Brother Bhim, you need not
Return the ball!Brother Bhim, pardon Dushala.
and I wish to apologise to you.No, no.
Give me this opportunity.Let me descend into the well,
will power your own,Radheya?
then why would you have tobear that crown again?
Vrushali, I feel as thoughyou will never experience
will make my heartbleed as well.
I do not wish to bethe reason of your sadness.
then you need not live there.You have absolutely
in your womb, Vrushaliand I am absolutely certain
under the care and protectionof my parents.
even though it isfar away from him.
Every time I have left my homewearing this crown
I must leave withthe Crown Prince soon
I cannot refuse him.I am indebted to him
by freeing myselfof all my struggles
the illusory court?I can only see the woods
Dusshasan.I have heard that Mayasur
Is Lord Indra's courtthis dark?
of us mortals, my darlings.Such dedication to Yudhishthir!
uncle.Let's
Welcome, Crown PrinceDuryodhan of Hastinapur!
W-What is this marvellous sight,brother Duryodhan?!
Your words are likesalt being rubbed
Be patient!All this can be yours
defeat in my life.Let it be,
but none were successful!I have no faith in you.
my darling?!I am telling the truth, uncle.
Not in the future.Henceforth,
In order to be successfulone does not need a plan,
court of Indraprastha!Crown Prince Shishupal
NoI am not
The sons of King Panduare questioning your competence.
to Emperor Yudhishthir's...Oh!
undefeated Emperor Yudhishthirto accept his dominance!
and treacherous cowherdhas made Yudhishthir
throne of Hastinapurhas not yet been able
do you know why?Because you
Crown Prince Duryodhando you know why?
shall indeed endin the battlefield someday
how competent each person is.Are you not the King of Anga?
right there at the arena.Had I been in your place
But you are foolish!Besides, nothing more
Crown Prince Shishupaldo you engage in verbal abuses
left you unhappy as well?Unhappy?
Whenever Krishnasucceeds in something
in this 'yajna' as well?I shall indeed
we saw many Kingsand maids enter through
went through it just now.Where did everyone go?
vanish the moment they reach acertain length from the 'yajna.
but because of the illusionwe are unable to see them.
but inferior in terms of action.You are certainly older than me
Indian Plum treeis used only as firewood,
is a misdeed.I do not fear anyone!
that you would pardon a 100misdeeds of mine, Krishna.
Krishna.Despite knowing
What if, Shishupalwhen the time is right
Just because the limit is 100pushing it to 99
So, Crown Prince Shishupal...The way Vasudev's father
I had forgottenthat at the time of your birth
I had heard of such a thing.I had four arms
Two of my arms andthe third eye.
is that wicked Krishna!And just like me
The truth is, when it comes toVasudev Krishna's treachery
I am not impotent like you,Duryodhan.
I will tarnish the sanctityof this 'yajna' at any cost.
Krishna's plan will fail.This is an illusory forest,
Many years agograndsire had defeated
never to leave their forest.And had also made a promise.
on each other's territories.Since then the ogres turned this
of the King of the ogreshumans can enter this forest
told us all about it.Instead of paying attention to
to teacher's lessonsyou would not have
your arrival, sister.Draupadi, it is almost time
of Panchal thatthis veneration is the first
And Dhrishtadyumna and youhave been born just recently.
I was merely wonderinghow, right after their birth
The child sits on its mother'slap during the veneration.
So, will you perform theveneration with me on your lap?
Alright.I will hold your hand
but I need to goand command the army.
This way.Mother
Even in these difficult timesseeing all of you laugh
Mother, time cannever be difficult.
Let's go!- Bheem
That is why, quit worryingand rest now, brother Bheem.
man-eaters, Bheem.In other words,
a way to your 'laddoosthey are bound to find us.
frightened, brother Bheem.I shall protect you.
not make even a morsel of food.You will not even
That ogre is fated to dieat my hands, Nakul!
And the meat from his bodywill feed us ogres
we ogres will get toconsume human meat.
seems quite strong.What if
you must use yourpower of illusion somehow
they shall not beable to face us ogres
that only thoseenter this forest of mine
During my first venerationwill you
an attack on Drona's city.And it is my duty
not appointed as Generalsbut grandsire Prishat
not like a daughterbut like a son.
as the General.Do you know, Draupadi
I feel as though the ties ofmy previous life are being cut.
nor the accepted norms.I should be here with you
- No, sister.I do not know about traditions
previous life is most apt.I am proud of father
By respecting your wisheshe appointed you as the General.
You shall indeed be successful.And when I see the look
Armyfor the arrival of
be Prepared!All hail Mahadev!
Princess, the royal priestawaits you for the veneration.
You may now consumethe sacrament.
Accepting the sacrament of the veneration of Goddess Annapurna**"The giver of food and nourishment", an avatar (form) of Parvati, the wife of Shiva.
Hence, I am hereto accept the sacrament.
But the joy of lifethat resides within me
I have no time for joy.I have been born
have predicted.Thinking of anything else
is his fatebut to dedicate your entire
is your ill fortune.You are a fool!
What kind of an argumentis that, Dhrishtadyumna?
sister as the General?Father has replaced Shikhandini
with me as the new General!Shikhandini gave father
He dismissed sisteras the General?
and not of someone's dejection.Who will achieve this task?!
who accepted defeatwith the first blow.
of my strength!You are of no use to me.
A father never obtainsanything from his daughter.
Princess, this feastis for family only.
no one else can bea part of this. - Mother Kunti!
who is here to meet you!This is my friend Subhadra.
She is the daughter of Vasudeva.*Kunti's brother, also father of Krishna (Vaasudeva, with long 'a').
of my brother Vasudeva?When starting from Dwaraka,
He said that if Iserved you whole-heartedly
Subhadra!I hope, the health of
of Ugrasena, Devaki, is well.And what about
How are they?All of them are doing well.
always pleases my heart.He is truly divine, Subhadra.
Brother Krishna saysthat when the temperatures soar
If the circumstancescontinue to be so
The meaningof brother Krishna's words
I merely listen to his words.Subhadra, a few musicians
Let's go listen to them.Let's go.
Greetings, mother.Greetings.
brother Bheem feels satiated.Then all of us will be able
I shall go sit over there.I shall be here when
Greetings, brother Yudhishthir!Greetings. - This is my friend
Subhadra.Greetings!
politics of the Aryan region.Brother Krishna says
Yes, brother Yudhishthir.I have learnt
to play any musical instrument.But Subhadra plays the veena* very well.
Greetings.- Greetings.
Even father is not here yet.Go on.
Even Princess Subhadrais eager to hear you play it.
do you playa musical instrument too?
this question, friendI would have considered it
the sound of his bow's stringis real music.
is being tarnished by him.Duryodhan!
had used just one arrowto free me from my bond.
Even a mouse can cleavethrough a bond with its teeth.
the sons of Pandu.Some pluck a bow's string,
on the battlefieldthen his enemies
play musical instrumentsbut also
Arjun!Restrain yourself!
A kingwho is an ally of
he is jeopardizingthat alliance.
the King of Gandhar as well.Attention everyone!
Sanjay.What is happening here?
the very knowledgeableChief Minister Vidur
Prince Arjun has drawn a weaponon the King of Anga Pradesh.
Arjun must be just jesting.But dear Gandhari
is a right he does not have.This is
But uncle...- Be quiet!
with Anga Pradesh?You have given Hastinapur
Pradesh to pardon Hastinapur.Because of just one person
But Arjun ought to bepunished, father.
To be banished fromthe entire kingdom of Kuru!
Lord!Lord!
There's darkness everywhere.Blood chilling screams
is this, Kripacharya?Whenever a human being
The entire universeconveys its reaction
the first child is taking birth.This child has taken birth
my son is a demon and is evil?This is what's written in
to society are bornin this world every day.
persist foreverisn't it, Kripacharya?
It would be catastrophic.Not just for the Kuru clan.
but for the entireArya empire.
the scriptures ordain that sucha cursed child be sacrificed.
He is a threat, but to whom?Is this a bad omen
Is this a disaster forthe one
The child His Highness hadbeen waiting for
Whether Her Highnesshas 100 sons or 99
it would be devastatingfor the entire state
my sister's son, Kripacharya.Bheeshma, what's your opinion?
pains me, Queen mother.If it's in the interest
inappropriate, Sire.I believe
and a father.On the basis of dreams
But by eliminating the troublesof the future, right now
The truth isthe problem and its solution
and for nature as well.Isn't it?
You will realise immediatelywhenever there's trouble
This is how the world works.Thus, a crisis is the reason
gets out of a crisishe has taken a step ahead
not just for himselfbut for the world too.
is the birth of an opportunityto change oneself
and enlighten it with wisdom.The one who is able to do so
to do sois a menace for the world.
as a threat to Hastinapur.The scriptures ordain that such
made by the onewho is a king and a father.
The scriptures ordain that sucha cursed child be sacrificed.
This decision should bemade by the one
a smile on his face.My son...
this world, mother.It would be impossible
On Sage Durvasa's commandI've come to bless you
Lord Indra.The way
to be the greatest human being.Your wish
among humankind.The way I am the basis of
the basis of Earth's potential.He will be
His heart will meltat human misery.
that is, his generositythe whole world
Madri...Why are you shedding tears?
There I saw a familyof monkeys.
with his wife and kids.There were all so happy
hopes of the arrival of spring.When I saw them
seeing them happy, Madri?No, Sister.
away from the entire familysitting on a branch
nor the warmth ofthe family.
and miserable.She would have once been a
Don't you have faithon these three sons, Madri?
preconceived notions.How can I distrust them?
it turns bitter too.Your three sons will definitely
old female monkey.Madri
This occasion might beauspicious for you!
but as winter which willfreeze all my desires.
You have defeated me withthe power of your mantras.
I am not as crafty as you.But remember one thing, Sister...
The gate pyramids,the innermost sanctum
In the same way, a kingdomis also divided into five parts
The citizens are its pyramids.The army its pillars.
And the throne is it's spire.The Lord's idol is placed
lies inits seat of justice.
Yudhishthir.Won't you work hard?
will spread your gloryworldwide.
Yudhishthir's twoyounger brothers.
When Yudhishtir becomesthe king
Humans, cowshorses, elephants
Yes, your highness.But this time
in the familyor accomplishments
If we want to teach thistruth to our children
to accept this truth.I will teach Madri
And the mantrawill definitely bear fruit,
I have arrived with a messagefrom King Dhritarashtra
clan down the path of battleit is necessary that both sides
into the royal courtunnecessarily...
The royal court whereDraupadis drapes were yanked
It symbolised the faithof all women in the world.
incident of the past, Pandavas.Demise and insult
that is, his deathcan affect all the lives
affect his present life!You speak the truth
to an incident.And when a battle is fought
as to whose perspective is true.I approve of your anger,
dire consequences.You know, My Lord
and what is left behindare children and aged ones.
and children,who have no one to guide them.
poisonous, My Lord.If the atrocious ones
is destroyed.The future of the children
The honour of women is violated.Penance, justice, customs
caused by this battleseem greater than that
even without a war, O Pandavas!Put forth a proposal
causes no destruction either.Even King Dhritarasthra's mind
He shall agree to any choiceto gain your approval
of this proposalthen...
open or closedwhen the sun rises
Similarly, one mayfollow his duties or not
Draupadi, attempting for a trucebefore a battle
our obligations.What does Krishna have to say?
to visit Hastinapurwith a peace proposal.
his duties or nothe is always aware
to vanquish the tyrantsand establish justice.
of King Shantanu may perish! [WOMAN SING]The entire family of King Pandu
the sons of King Dhritarashtra![MUSIC STOPS]
a peace proposal, My Lord!How can we forget
must be punished by death!This isn't a war,
And a revolution has no peace,O Arya Princes!
Where is Krishna?[HORSE NEIGHING]
I strengthened my heart.I accepted all pains.
you have decidedagainst all of it?
of the sons of Pandu.They have no rights to make
Therefore only I shall decidewhether to fight a war
The decision for warcannot be made
to others.The decision for war
to demand justice, Krishna.Indeed!
How will you make itculminate into battle?
but also in Duryodhan.There shall indeed be a war!
Why this doubt, my lad?I have heard many tales
Accepting fear as Godis human nature.
riseto another fear.
a mere human.He is far more powerful
But a God...is something he is not.
uncle.I do not fear Krishna at all!
He is unarmed.So what harm could he cause?
than two scholars.Because he can land a blow
It is difficult evento breach close to a clever man
even my deceit cannot help youattain victory.
on your sideare all influenced by Krishna.
That old Bhairavconsiders Krishna to be great.
fear Krishna.If Krishna
the might of all ofyour skilled warriors
capturing Krishnaand imprisoning him
I shall capture him.In front of the entire
Everyone shall knowwhether the greatness of Krishna
His respect will be reducedto mockery
He might overhear us.Will he hear us
overhears everything.Greetings, Your Highness!
from the sons of Pandu.O the supreme Yadava!
the tunes of my flutethe cows of Brindavan
tunes of their own.The importance of tunes
Welcome to Hastinapur, Krishna!The conflicting turn
towards the path of peace.There is only one path
either a path of peaceor that of conflict.
what should bea king's first reaction?
battling against and defeatinghim is the best option.
The enemy can never be strong.Strength isn't just measured
is also stronger.Master, there's no gain in being
considers it a weaknessand doesn't respect
and self-confidence.By being diplomatic with
are benefitted by tradeand others.
Thus, a diplomacy witha weaker person is justified
It's dusk, master.I can't see the target now.
Not my eyes, masterthe darkness is my limit.
is the limiting factorthe hands or the stone?
It must be Arjun.He has been freed of the task
We'd herd cattleand he'd gain knowledge?
shouldn't be called unfair!The sad thing is, we are,
is Arjun being your obstacle?The amount of time Arjun gets
Arjun is anyway our enemyand he's an enemy of
What if I kill him withmy arrow right now?
Guided by sound?What do you mean?
becomes the target for my arrow.Just like King Dashrath's arrow
But without challenging,it's improper to attack.
Ashwatthama isafter all a Brahmin.
I'll remove a thorn inyour side right away.
my bowstring he came to knowthat an arrow was being shot.
before he comes here.Something needs to
He is here. Then who wasthe archer in the forest?
your cows here?Brother Dushashan, this cow
The cow that the master chargedme with will be tied here!
Brother!- Brother!
- Help me, Nakul!Brother, grab my hand!
Brother, grab my hand!Give me your hand!
Brother Bhim!- Brother Bhim! - Bhim!
We'll try to find a way out.Brother Bhim!
Brother Bhim!Brother!
Master!Master...
Brother Duryodhan made brotherBhim fall into this mire.
is a part of education.Brother!
his limits.If one is unable to break
his limits... If one is......the hands or the stone?
Arjun.Wonderful, dear!
You're one in a million.You'll become the best
archer of the world.That's my oath, dear.
Tell Bhim and Duryodhanto have a restraint on
expelled from the seminary.Whose arrow is this?
Your duties are five timesmore difficult
that I hand over......my sons to you
only you have the right toadvise my sons, Draupadi.
Parents have one great quality...Patience.
Every man faces a situationwhen all his dreams and hopes
On the one hand,there's righteousness
When righteousness isbehest with problems.
Think about it.At times, there's a chance
to steal when impoverished.At times the immorality
comes to light.Everyone faces such situations.
to happinessJust the way a bee is attracted
and are not attractedtowards happiness
from meeting God.When a leaf falls from a tree
Whereas the grass that bows tothe breeze remains on land.
choosing the easy pathensures happiness
a blot on character?Does it not darken the soul?
Your Highness!Your Highness...
It will be disastrous.It is pure evil,
brother Shakuni?What is Duryodhan up to?
Your Highness,at Drupad's kingdom...
has hurt his feelings badly.I tried a lot to stop him
Hastinapur insultedin Drupad's kingdom?
seated near the podiumwhereas Hastinapur
My dear sister, even duringthe 'Swayamvar
...no longer powerful.The Kuru kingdom
...isn't worthy of respect.That's it!
Duryodhan is aboutto sacrifice
That's a greater sin thankilling a Brahman, My Lord.
This horse is useless,behead it.
my kingdom's weakness.Soldier!
On whose orders?On the orders of
What is this foolishness?The horse of
prestige of the entire nation.It cannot be killed.
when the reputation of theKuru empire is in tatters?
this nationhas not had the courage to
hearts of our enemies even now.It's just your imagination.
An idol lying outsidethe temple
at the top of a templeThe idol has to be in the
to be proved.By performing
the 'Ashwamedhatomorrow itself.
I will defeat him and provethe greatness
- That's impossible, son.Your father is just
the throne of Hastinapur.He doesn't have the right
A horse that can'tpull a chariot
for the 'Ashwamedha Yagnais useless, mother.
that I am performingthe 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.
And the day after I willannounce to the whole of Aryavat
Duryodhan...calm down, my son.
to quell King Takshak'srebellion.
and definitely take a decision.Consult him!
anyone before it blooms.The evening doesn't consult
before they roar!Why should a nation need to
Father, I have pledged toperform the 'Ashwamedha Yagna
Perform my coronation, father.Perform your coronation!
and become ascetics, son.For the greatness of
to lay down their life.Can't you lay down
I can't live after beingso insulted.
behead this horseor your son.
coronation at dawn tomorrow.Om Namah Shivaya.
Om Namah Shivaya.Om Namah Shivaya.
Greetings, grandsire.Greetings.
You have unfathomableknowledge of correctness.
is a one devoid ofthe grace of the Gods.
from the grace of the Gods?Somewhere in Hastinapur
leading to a drought?Or are humans and cattle dying
Then how can you deemthat we do not have
that Hastinapur isdevoid of a Crown Prince?
has passed awayand I have
the Gods have not kept usaway from their grace.
Even after being abraded,it continues emitting fragrance.
Whether the throne is occupiedby a Crown Prince or not
or not.Does this mean, the Gods
being anointed as one?Then the Kings of the
of Hastinapur.What the Gods know is the truth.
changes every day.And that is why
However, for yourcontentment, if
then who am I to stop you?You have been exceedingly
father about this.Greetings.
Yougave Duryodhan the permission
When a Crown Princeis already present
they do not becomethe Crown Prince.
will returnthis anointment will
found the Pandavas, uncle.Who knows when they will return.
That will not happen.The sons of Pandu
where they are.But how, uncle?
the King of the OgresHidimb was killed?
Bheemyou have become a father!
from the heavens.Hidimba has
and worship your King Vrikodar!Your future King has been born!
You have become a father.Congratulations, brother Bheem!
you cannot get angry.Anoint him with
ogre sons with his bloodthey become adults.
Sonthis is your grandmother
Touch their feetto seek their blessings.
May you be patient.May you be victorious.
your father, King Vrikodaris returning to the realm
and seek his blessings.We can stay here
of our first childI will not ask any of you
your daughter-in-lawbreak her promise,
Hidimba.In the future
derive motivation from you.People will deem you a Goddess
Father, wheneveryou take my name thrice
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
Friend Kamado you know the importance
with the darkness of the nightand unfulfilled dreams.
and all my dreamswill be fulfilled.
Radha.Brij Bihari.*
to Lady Yashoda?Will you never return
how will you engage inplayful interactions over there?
will lose their minds.I am leaving another part
playful interactions henceforth.But playful interactions
this is the city of Mathura.The agony of your lineage
of your fated actions.Let's proceed.
We have wovenour tears into this.
ordered us to kill you.In other words,
no order before killing?You talk just a
I do love talking.This is my brother
You may die at his hands.Before engaging
If we break thatwill the owner of the toy
That is why,everyone calls me Trivakra.
No.I have not come here
I merely heal things.Guard!
and bring Vasudev and Devakito the grappling combat arena.
then that very instantyou need to behead them!
- Stop!Greetings, uncle!
To wish for your gloryis something I would
is also somethingI would never desire.
that people will beleft bewildered
Yes, everyonewill say that
with that, uncle.No one can call dying
So,it is certain
I am asking youto release our parents.
and also his crown and thronewith due respect.
[LAUGHING]Do you want me to beg before you
You need to proveyour competence first.
If you stay alivethen you can think about
uncle.My brother Balaram
if you have no objection to it.Shall we proceed to the
dead in the arena.Chanur, Mushtik!
but they should not stay alive.Mushtik!
Mushtik!Get up!
what have you thoughtabout asking for forgiveness?
If I die in this combatmy guard will slay your parents.
uncle.For a smile from their child,
their own lives.No, uncle.
of my sonsthen I do not want
My son wants this warbut I don't.
your entire life in this manner.And in the end
and gets shredded to pieces.Everyone knows this,
harsh words, uncle.I have not come to you
to seek advice from you.The time to dispense advice
give you now?Make Yudhishthir
give up your position asthe crown prince to Duryodhan...
uncle Pandu's familywill burn to ashes
in Indraprastha...Go ahead
of setting yourself on fire.I do not wish
Do not organisea game of dice...
a game of dice is alsoa part of us Kshatriyas.
has organised a game of dice.Do not let
Your Highness...Maid Draupadi must obey
and live an additional yearin anonymity.
I know that I have committednumerous mistakes, uncle.
uncle.An...
surrounds my heart.Now
then how am I at fault?Being visionless is not
why did you believe that person?No outsider said anything.
When did I saythat you lag behind
uncle.Try to recall the day I was
blind since birthis not worthy
That is the traditionof the entire Aryan region.
The greed you hadwithin you, to rule
has reduced youto your present state.
That is why,the entire Aryan region
My sons will die even then.Will the advice
Dhritarashtra?Will King Shakuni of Gandhar
wish to seek peacethen order
A Garuda formationcan be built only
bombards stones from a hillthen the soldiers might just
are various ways to haveyour army killed.
you are displaying yourweakness, King of Gandhar.
kingdoms in all four directions.I have emerged victorious
and their importanceare not unknown to me.
against Vasudev KrishnaKing of Anga?
a forest may give birth toas much vegetation as it wants
but at the sea-shoreall of them
is a formidable foeand you may not know it,
why does Vasudev Krishnaleave you so fearful?
of unknown objects, my child.However, I know the powers
so intelligentand treacherous
can be destroyedsolely by him
A true battle formationwould be one
My childas long as I am with you
You are...King of Gandhar,
The Minister must havebeen the one
this advice, dear.The King of Gandhar has damaged
for Hastinapurto think about its benefit.
not imply thatof the Pandavas, grandsire?
and your brothers arebeing blessed with life.
cannot be heldin the palms
come to the battlefield, in theensuing battle of righteousness
You will understand this truthwhen the King of Gandhar
The truth isquite the opposite to this
that the angerof my dear Duryodhan
there would have been a war.When dear Dushala's husband
When Hastinapurwas about to be attacked
If you havedecided to banish me
and no one else's,Your Excellency.
You have permission on behalfof His Highness, uncle.
it is an order, Generalto prepare the army
the army of Hastinapur willattack the kingdom of Virat.
attack the kingdom of Virat.Duryodhan!
take place, son.You may stop the army
will attack the kingdomof Virat tomorrow!
Son Duryodhan...- My child...
does not wash away one's insult.However, if one sheds
then shedding one's bloodis foolishness.
about a war.At this moment
hearing you talkabout establishing peace
and delightful.Then you may keep the delight
the astonishmentto the Pandavas.
Your HighnessI promise you
He will certainlymeditate over
then I will notattack this early.
That is enough.As I leave the kingdom, I have
proud of thisYour Excellency.
In spite of you not being a kingmy father sends you
I am sorry to hear that yourfather died in the forest.
the earth is coveredwith darkness.
the son's life is coveredwith darkness.
which is a lamp, theyalways keep it with them.
The dices.They have been made from
my father agreed with memost of the times.
Five.The son of Bharadwaj
Greetings, Sire.We welcome you, Dronacharya.
what progress the princess havemade at your hermitage?
of each prince.May king Dhritarashtra prosper.
would feel proudsuch is the knowledge I have
ancestors would be pleasedsuch is the knowledge
is the best of all.Isn't he?
Your Majesty, I am quietas I wonder whether I should
exhibit the knowledgeI imparted them and thus
The teacher is right.It's a tradition.
before the subjectsof the kingdom
they should exhibittheir skills.
tradition at Gandhar.Hastinapur follows its
King of Gandhar.Thanks to your blessings
I am informing the finetraditions of my kingdom
it is believedthat two people can
can be alike.Thus, your majesty, we hold a
winner is hailedthe entire world learns
Now if the princes of Hastinapurwish to exhibit their skills
- King of Gandhar!Hastinapur... - Has a great
among the princes.Besides
But on hearing the peoplehail my sons
organize a competition thatyou find appropriate.
I would like to knowwhich prince is eligible to be
A competition!Vidur, why are we
is eager to prove that Duryodhanis the most eligible one, Sire.
and the subjectsif there develops an animosity
consequences, Sire.In any situation
I will not let the arrival ofthe princes turn into politics.
Once I had asked youto trust me and you did.
for you to not have faith in me?But Sire, the test
that my sonsdon't take part
their capabilities as ambitionsand be enemies with them.
sister-in-law?Are you scared of Shakuni,
Kunti.The snake whose venom
venom very easily.Because its previous experience
Besideshe can no longer conspire.
He is now the king of a state.The great Bheeshma had made
But my status will alwaysbe less than the great Bheeshma.
I would have to thinka hundred times.
an elephant, Purochan.You are a man of low stature.
Think about it.If you help me in my plans
And if you do not...What are you planning,
The king wishesto hear the people hail Prince
Thus, the entrance door that youwill build for the playground
With just one arrow.The king wishes
and not anyone else.Thus, the entrance door that you
the right time.With just an arrow.
king of Gandhar?For the one
You would have benefited, hadyou befriended Arjun, son.
someone who is more intelligentor more powerful than you.
There is one moreimportant thing.
Thus, he's mercifuland doesn't befriend anyone.
will be appointedbased on eligibility.
somebody's help.To me, this is an opportunity
So that, when I becomea king in the future
Father.I have spent my life considering
I never objected to anything.But today, I ask of you.
let it happen the way it is.Son...
I need your assurancethat you will keep quiet.
Long live king Dhritarashtra!Long live king Dhritarashtra!
Attention!King Dhritarashtra
since the last twelveyears, Your Majesty.
will be the most happiest dayof my life, Shakuni.
If my nephews are hailedby the people
And I never make mistakesfor the sake of my happiness.
next to me.Today, I want to see my
Greetings, aunt Kunti.Bless you, Dushala.
Today many brave Aryan kingsand princes have arrived
new generation of the Kurus.To get introduced to the
to Hastinapur.Today on this playground
And it shall reverberate in allcorners of the earth.
To begin the competitionthe one to arrive on
sage Bharadwajthe disciple of Parshuram
Long live the great teacherDronacharya!
Long live the great teacherDronacharya!
the names of all the princeshave been inscribed.
at the device.The name of the prince that
Dronacharya!Long live the great teacher
for the competition.No prince can make
and no prince has the rightto turn it into war.
Long live the great Bheeshma!Long live the great Bheeshma!
Excuse me,King Shakuni
No, Prince Balaramwe have no spite against you.
It's butthe flower's misfortune.
Prince Balaram.I am innocent.
had to marry the five Pandavasshe had taken a vow
in Indraprastha.High Queen Draupadi.
decide for yourself.Your dear sister Subhadra
he will surely come to meetyour dear sister.
The entire Aryan nationwill mock at you.
of dear Duryodhana.That's why I say so.
King Shakuni said is trueI can't put my sister in
such insult to the Yadavs.You have two options
or else, my sistershall start off for Indraprastha
Prince Arjun is returningafter completing his penance.
to welcome him.For the sake of the welcome
along the veneration platter.New bride?
Princess Subhadra.Prince!
You and your wifedon't have the rights
Panchali!Panchali!
You have hurt Panchali.I was helpless, brother.
that post the weddingeither I take Subhadra
And mother had ordered meto return to Indraprastha
But what is the solution now,brother Yudhisthir?
is as legitimate.Brother Yudhisthir, we must try
And thatwill be Princess Draupadi.
always bide by our vow.Panchali.
rather it's a request, Panchali.Please think on the situation
from entering the townwill be unfair to the town.
Without Arjun,my very life is incomplete.
a penance.We all have.
It was the vowthat you had taken.
forsake Indraprastha forever.If Arjun
be done without Arjun?How can we ever be independent?
Does our penancecause the kingdom
You have to decidewhether if sweetness
Why should we be any different?Bear in mind though.
those rocks tumble downfrom their mountains.
Thus, if Arjun wishes to livewith his second wife
Princewon't sister-in-law come
we might not be ableto even enter the town.
High Queenthis has been sent
to keep them safe.Who sent them?
This has also been sent by her.She said
that it's a request from meto keep this keepsake safe.
Greetings, High Queen.When I had started from Dwarka
All that he had gotfrom Mathura and Vrindavan.
I won't be ableto keep them safe.
best archer!Anything that comes
I beg your pardon, High Queenbut brother Krishna said
are required.Just look at my husband!
these invaluable souvenirs?Subhadra!
a word in his insult.The vow that he'd given me
about it.No, High Queen
He had said thatI'd hold the supreme position
You wish to becomethe High Queen of Indraprastha?
has many responsibilities!She never finds a moment's rest.
He can never teach anyonesuch a grave ploy.
to soothe you as well.Brother had said
love always conquers.He had said that if I remain
the High Queen.That's what brother had said,
to aid us again, Govind?Indeed
to aid all of youwhere you are headed
life of anonymity on your own.The time for your life of
is to remain hiddenbecause in order to remain so
and forget one's competenceone's respect
If family and friendsfuel your arrogance
to the world.You must choose a place
Where can sucha place be, Vasudev?
who you are not acquainted with.In this vast Aryan region, there
alluding to is King Virat.Yes.
be able tosafely lead a life of anonymity.
completing his meditationwe shall proceed
even the most arduousof meditations.
using computer graphics.You seem to be the indigenous tribe of Kirat.*
I am meditating here.Let me take my arrow out.
I was hunting it after all.So, I shall take it away.
by my arrowand not yours.
stronger than you.He is a better archer than you.
that you are the stronger oneand not him!
I am more skilledthan a tribal person.
Can you see that hollowon that tree?
with such lightning speed.You must not have
to be a great archerdoes not reside in you.
but when Lord Shivahimself is one's opponent
no tribal mancan ever withstand
*Vishwakarma.had made the first bow known as Pinak*
the art of archery.Punish me for
in your true form.Bless you!
of Pashupatastra.However, without testing
the Pashupatastra.A person who is worthy
I could not recognize you.I must certainly not be worthy.
acknowledged himselfthat he is not worthy
deems himself worthyis not truly so,
only by the persontaking the test.
I am pleased with you.I shall teach you how to
but knowledge.Falling prey to unrighteousness,
ordinary weapons, son of Kunti.However,
who is also righteous.It is impossible to kill such
a promise to the world.That is why,
walked on the righteous pathto my refuge after death.
before duskwe must find those Pandavas
When will we abductDraupadi, uncle?
But I have a feeling,uncle
I have firm faiththat he will return
is not that considerable.Before Arjun returns
possible, uncle?We cannot attack the Pandavas.
We cannot attack thembut
King of Sindhu, Jayadrath,most certainly can, my darling.
to aid you, Duryodhan.We cannot attack them
have come hereto aid you, Duryodhan.
I have promised your sisterthat I shall
King of Sindhu.Be seated.
but these four Pandavasnever leave their wife Draupadi
is always presentto protect Draupadi.
in one goand abduct Draupadi.
and the son-in-lawof Hastinapur's royal family.
I think the competenceof the Pandavas
Duryodhanyou are my brother-in-law.
not given you a demonstrationof my competence yet
may the Almighty nevergive rise to such a situation
You are not onlyfree to attack them
I have a solutionusing which you will not have to
performsthe 'Sandhyavandana'* every morning
Bheemand Sahadev
to the poor.That leaves Nakul.
he is given the dutyof protecting Draupadi
somehowkeep Nakul
you can abduct Draupadi.He too has a heart.
strive over the years.He knows
isn't just or right.If we succeed in persuading him
No, aunt.No.
we'll be able to persuade him.And
How would I do it?I tried to tell him
I either couldn't findpropitious time
How will Ipersuade him?
You are compassionatetowards everyone.
Ask for forgivenesson my behalf.
him to do what is right.Just once.
I can only remindKarna of what's right, aunt.
Greetings!Greetings!
because of you.I salute you for inculcating
since my son's endorsingthe ones who are unjust.
but he doesn't stay here.He stays in the palace, Krishna.
that he'll certainlycome here today.
to find solaceaway from the Sun.
he'd come here.His family has treasured
is an accumulationof all your decisions.
It can transform the future.Decisions are derived
is a herculean task.The thoughts
influence him.When one's thoughts
can't be altered.Hence, the future remains
could've set things rightfor himself.
It's ones experiencethat influences
injustice all his lifeconsiders everyone around him
My friend deserves the throne.How can you say that?
is crowned as a King.Do you mean one's birth
For I knowone's birth
Then you only havethe right
to be a part of this war?When everyone around me
rewarded it with whatit rightfully deserved.
this war a duty?It's baseless to reason
I don't have the rightto be a King.
If you ask meone who's capable
Self-respect is the optimalform of respect.
is never satedwith the amount
so lostin your quest for respect
between the rightand the wrong.
Because you're lookingat the truth in fragments.
carves out one's destiny.One decision of yours
if Kunti was your mother.How can I assume that?
Duryodhan for eternity.No, Karna.
You owe your capabilitiesto the Sun God.
*The Supreme Light.How do you say that? 
to Adhiratha and Radha.They found you floating
Who was I born to, Krishna?You were born
Lord Suryanarayana.Hence you were born
You may askLord Suryanarayana too.
Where are you, mother?Karna, my son!
Mother...- What is it, son?
He's vicious.Duryodhan was right.
I...I am your son, right?
You definitely are!That evil Krishna has been
things by deceiving me.The King of Gandhar said
But how can onedeceive me this way, mother.
He tried to make me believethat I've been living a lie
to such an extentthat he questioned my existence.
That's what he did, mother.No one can separate us, son.
Who told you that you weren'tborn to me and Adhiratha?
I've always been drawnto the Lord Suryanarayana
I feel at ease at once.My heart's filled with joy,
But that doesn't meanthat I was a boon
But that doesn't meanthat I was a boon
Try to recall.Try to recall, son.
I used to pay attentionto you as you'd cry even
If you weren't my sonhow could I hear you cry.
that you aren't my son?How can he say that?
You certainly are my son.During your childhood,
the chariot.I almost died.
Yes.- And... And come here.
I've served you food.How would I know
I might not have given birthto you.
Did Bheem cometo Praman Koti with you?
Dushala saidthat she had seen him.
and so was Arjun.So, he said that he will
If he was not with Duryodhanthen how would Duryodhan
Your majesty!Your majesty!
I truly deserve death.After delivering
your Majesty.I have no right...
the death of her husbandand now this.
are choking my heart.My heart breaks.
News?What news do you bring?
A hunter had gone to the woodsto hunt for game this morning.
I fearthat these ornaments
Bheem!Bheem... No.
Mother, what happened?Mother? - Mother?
Bheem.Mother!
in store for me?What has it decided?
Perhaps, to teach patienceto ordinary people.
Sire, for the peaceof Bheem's soul
Let us proceed.Enough of this, Kunti.
took place 13 days ago.And you have been shedding
Stopping my tearscannot stop my weeping,
One questionwill keep agonizing me
Why did my Bheemgo so far away from me?
not gone anywhere, mother.He will always be with us.
of Kuru Prince Bheem's souldo consume the food
Uncle.- Yes.
I'm perplexed too, dear.But we have
are satiatedwe must serve them food.
to the 'Brahminswe must go to the courtyard.
Your Highness,we have a problem.
who is not yet satiated.He is asking for more food.
Bheem...My son.
the King of Serpents.My soldiers told me that you
Upon Pawan Dev's* request I had sent my soldiers to you*Other name of Vayu, Pavana (the Purifier).
and in orderto cancel out its effect
Only poison cannullify the effect of poison.
We serpents areof a furious nature.
the serpent woman Marisha.The blood of serpents
for you to get angry.I am not only short-tempered
Here you go.Consume this.
you will be blessed withthe strength of 100 elephants.
based on a simple rule.None of you shall bend
Why do we need tofold arms, Duryodhan?
That's the apt wayto eat, Yudhishtir.
Your Excellency...His Highness
care for each otherit helps the family
the kingdom prosper.All of you must
for you to feed us.I want 'laddoo'.
rudely to a kindgesture of yours
a crude human being attains.One who possesses a rude
stability.Such a human being would
chase after itself forever.Is that happiness?
and the one who possessesa kind demeanour
obstacle to such a human being.Such a man always
That proves that a kind gestureisn't a way to attain
is happiness personified.A bad gesture too
springs forth sorrow.Righteousness doesn't
in itself.Hail Lord Shiva!
suggest you the same.But why would the
Religious texts state that untilthe son does the final rites
I mean to saythe son has to get married
father's soul attain salvation.You mean, the happiness
But the subjects ofa kingdom are
utmost importance to him.Vidur, don't be diplomatic.
religious teachings.That isn't true.
my son's coronationwhy do you speak against it?
for his coronation.Bhil women who belong to the
You must be aware of that.If one's rewarded things
That may make him irresponsibletowards his duties too.
by his nephew.I hope you know of it.
he can't remain a King for long.Do you want Duryodhan
Then you must put hisabilities to test, grandsire.
Vidhur, arrange forthe same at the earliest.
be crowned a King.He needs to be crowned.
shall be crowned the King.That's a promise, dear.
still awake?We are unable
slept before you?I will punish both of them
peace here.That's true, son.
And the attendants inthe kitchen, stay up all night
And brother Bhim is alreadyhungry again, mother.
You are not used tothe lunch here.
What did yourgrandsire say?
still unawarethat brother Bhim is
They served very littleand brother Bhim was
sleep here with me.Mother
Nakulwe will now stay
Mother, what kindof a home is this?
It seems likethat we have refuge here
Everyone here isunfamiliar.
their love will increase.Nakul. Sahadev.
brother Bhim.I have looked in
leading to the kitchen.You are of no use.
Even you had gone.Do you remember?
come yet.Or else he would have
- Greetings. - Greetings.Hey, mister.
Then you must be wellaware of this palace, right?
turn towards the south.Take ten steps south.
After that you can useyour sense of smell
your nose.I can smell raw mangoes.
this is like heaven.The food made by
We have taken possession onall the trees in this orchard.
There are mango trees inKuntibhoj too!
I needn't travel!If I want mangoes
If he wants mangoes he cantake it from our hands too!
What's the big dealin that?
let me go.No, Bhim, we are not
for you.Of course! The city is very big.
father must have taught you!Now they have crossed
to such an extentthat it becomes a sign
to say.You're absolutely right, Arjun.
Listen, everyonemy name is Vrikodar.
Did you hear that, dear?He has challenged
he cankill you too.
The tree that I shake...All its fruits
that even if it be a mango treeor a tree of lineage...
Child!My dear child!
solution, child.The strategy that
strategy for them.Here, master
KarnaI am habitual of taking rest
but it's not a necessity.Give me a chance to serve you.
This...This bug bit me
was disturbed.Forgive me, master.
Such severe pain!Yet you didn't move!
Who are you?Who are you?
- Impossible!Only a Brahman can be
are not a Brahman.Had you been a Brahman
I'm not a Brahman, master.I'm the son of a Suta.
You lied to me?You cheated me!
Had I told youthat I'm not a Brahman
disappointed again.You fool
If you had shared yourpain with me
KarnaI am not
I hadsworn to teach only Brahmans.
taught people of all lineagesthe veneration of Lord Shiva.
If you had takenthe path of truth
with a weak nous?And no form of education
to weaklings, dear.Not at all!
do sway inthe warmth of the sun
Karnain the same manner
the time of a test.It is of no use to him.
The truth of life!Go, Karna!
when it will be the moment ofthe biggest test in your life
your knowledgewill leave your side.
any use to you.Lord Parashuram
God does not differentiateunlike the common man
the common man.It was my mistake.
I accept them as yoursacrament, master.
Your struggleand your mistake
from the seminary.Go tell the king of
Ashwatthama has come.With the message of
Guru Drona's son is here.He wishes to meet you.
Marvellous!You have applied ashes
My past is that of a Brahman,and my future that of a king.
my body and my soul.This means, master Dronacharya
But right now, the questionis not about me
You had promised the throneof Hastinapur, uncle.
and come here.To Hastinapur.
that Guru Drona, whenstarting his seminary
why did he find it appropriateto educate
This complication is nowbeing resolved.
Which means your friendshipis not with Duryodhan
Then I would have hadaffection for Arjun.
Yes.I have heard
the kingdom too.Hence in your heart
Don't you have faith onmy friendship?
dear Duryodhan's friendshipeven more stronger
See, Ashwatthamathe biggest political setup
here at Hastinapur.Hence it is necessary that
begins to have affectionfor the Pandavas
then at that time, it willbe beneficial for you
But for that, we will first haveto make Duryodhan the king.
Duryodhan's enthronementwill definitely take place.
Time had once defeatedme in my life.
ahead of the times.How will I be able to recognise
their faces.Yet I could recognise
would enter the roomI could say whether he is
changed a lot, right?Of course!
Nowhis walk shall have
with prestigethe earth recognises
deserving of him.Shakuni!
Does the earth knowthat the footsteps
emanates the same uponYudhishthir's arrival?
is getting closerI also came here.
the meaningof your question.
getting closer, Your Highness.And in order to prove dear
Don't make the arrival ofprinces a political affair.
I won't, dear sister.But tell the same thing to
Because, definitelyby now
Before the arrivalof the princes
Definitely,His Excellency Bhishm
on capability.What is the solution?
is arriving!Long live King Dhritarashtra!
Welcome to Hastinapur,King of Gandhar.
my heart feels at peaceChief Minister.
exiling me fromHastinapur, Your Excellency?
in his kingdom.And the courage
a woman crying.Brother Bheem's stomach
My stomach's growling does notsound like a woman crying.
Arjun...Arjun!
And what are you doing in thisillusory forest, alone?
or roast you for my meal.Show yourself
a way out of this forest.Come with me.
We shall protect you.Yudhishthir...
We shall find him.I shall go look for him.
anywhere, alone.All of us will go together.
We will find Arjun.Brother Bheem
who is...Mother, this maiden was crying.
She is terrified.That is why, I have
My sons will protect you.Brother Bheem will protect you.
Since it is mother's order,I shall certainly protect her.
How did your family end upin this terrifying forest?
We were on a pilgrimage.We lost our way
And in this forestthe ogres...
No need to be afraid now.We should leave now.
or do you needto rest for a while?
When I saw her,she was sitting and crying.
Arjun!It is not right to laugh
Mother asked if you willbe able to walk or not.
In which direction are weproceeding, brother Yudhishthir?
How will we find our way out?During this season
That is why, we areheaded towards West.
This forest reeksfrom all directions.
it is the meal of the ogres.And some of this smell
I have become familiarwith that smell now.
some fruits to eat?Certainly. There must be
is coming from there.Wonderful!
However, brother Bheem hasnot gone to pluck them yet.
has conquered hunger.Then we need to conquer
that brother Bheemwill go to pluck fruits for us.
Son, go and get the fruits.As you say, mother.
didn't feed him.Many people transform pride
to add a feather totheir existing pride.
about that, King Drupad?No.
a person blinded by pridebegs for respect.
about his glorious past.It implies that he expects others
whatsoever.He lives in fear
It meansthe one filled with pride is
Isn't pride just another namefor fear?
Fear chains your heartand pride is a link
A man drowned in pride cannever appreciate love.
And your children...Your children are no more than
Have they attacked from both theEast and the West?
His Excellency Bhishmahad been awaiting this moment.
Grandsire will annihilate our entirearmy, Madhav.
am your doom!Get acquainted with me!
You will not be able to extinguishus!
The army has no protection there!Charioteer, make haste and move
Arjun, stay with brother Yudhishthir.Ensure that neither grandsire nor
You need to go and protect the army!If Guru Dronacharya is not stopped
Go on!Move forth, charioteer!
Now, Ashwatthama and Guru Dronawill not allow Arjun and Bheem
have the opportunity of battling me.Pick up your bow.
Ensure that your hands do nottremble while doing so.
Then why should I take to armsagainst you?!
I remember, friend Drona!My daughter...
in a court full of people!Did the greatest warrior in the world
a daughter?!That was the gravest crime of my life,
When the time is right I shall willinglyaccept the punishment for it.
my head is at peace.Now, my hands will not tremble
leave Yudhishthir now.Release the orbs of fire!
All the foot soldiersand Atirathis*
of Pandu!Ashwatthama!
or do you truly have the competenceto fight?!
I neither need an opportunity or asummon.
Certainly, Vikarna.If you could survive armed for a
Let the war begin!Prince Duryodhan
As per the traditiononly a King can capture a King.
Hail Lord Mahadev!The Grandsire has created a
and is taking me to Yudhishthir.I told you, my child.
others.Yudhishthir will soon be captured by
and we'd emerge victorious.Victorious!
Prince Uttar.Uncle's life is in danger.
If he is captured we will lose thewar.
Arjun.Charioteer, let's move forward.
I declare him king!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!No, Prince.
for a kingdom in charity.Respect shown towards my art
The entire Kshatriya lineagehas been defamed by you, friend.
Far away in the westthere is a forested region
is called Ang Pradesh.Grandfather Bhishma
But today,it is devoid of a king.
How can this be?No, Prince.
that can crush all our lives.I have no intention
an authority over Hastinapurnor Ang Pradesh.
has that authority.Maybe, his Highness
the honour of the Kuru dynastyYour Majesty.
declare this ladthe King of Ang Pradesh!
by my father todaywill be upheld by me
All hail Kingof Ang Pradesh, Karna!
All hail Kingof Ang Pradesh, Karna!
of His Highnessand with his blessings,
Go on.Fight.
Now, do you doubtyou being a Kshatriya?
that the five of themwere not born with the blood
he will certainlyaccept this challenge.
he will accept death.Sanjay!
a conclusion, your Majesty.Only a few moments
before sundown!The power of the mantra
a fragment of my powerwill stay back with you
Kunti.The entire world will know him
Princess, he is...What happened, Kunti?
- Princess Kunti!Mother Kunti fainted!
The competition has ended,King of Ang Pradesh.
Lord Surya's grace upon you.That is why the Sun God
of your art, Prince?No.
Resorting to unrighteousnesswhile proving one's superiority
Son.Son...
will stay back with youin the form of a boy child.
- Princess, calm down.Calm down, Princess, and
My...He...
My...M-My son Karna.
of yours, Princess.What...
Princess.Even the world knows only
the late Kuru King Pandu.And you have no son.
attached to a peacockact as its adornment.
the seats of saints.Do not talk like a fool,
as an adornment of a crown.He is my son, Priyamvada.
he has come before me...To have his mother's love.
To ask...To ask for his right.
that you are his mother.Man must not feel sad for
Think of their sorrow.If the society finds out
there will be no appreciationin his respect.
Grandsire Bheeshma about this.Why did you have to
Nakul, I'll sharethe food with you.
that's why I woke you up.There's no aroma of food
Everybody will wake up!The guard is supposed
Guard, show my brotherthe way to the kitchen.
You mean, this huge palacedoesn't have a kitchen?
your dinner, late in the night.From tomorrow,
plate full of delicacies.Please step forward!
The maids preparing the foodshould remain outside the palace
that's why, Prince.But it's very inconvenient
the palace.But, Prince Bheem...
And why would thepalace go up in flames?
This is rather astonishing!Such a huge palace
the crown prince in courttomorrow, I will not care
Very soonyou will be rid of
You called for me, father?Why is Purochan at Varnavat?
Indeed!My dear brothers will
that you must have plannedsomething at Varnavat which
Father, there's no moralityin anything immoral.
the milk becomescontaminated, father.
But it didn't trouble youall that much, father.
A powerful man wishesfor more power!
But in old age.In his old age when he knows
glory and honourare what he yearns for.
hope that their name lastsuntil the end of time.
activities which might malignMy image posthumously!
Whenever a choice has tobe made between my happiness
Son!Please listen to me.
Murdering a womanis disgraceful, son.
in the netherworldpast my death, son?
When a flame burns, it'snot just the fuel that burns
cannot obtain light.But you have never lit a lamp
you are unaware of this fact.In Varnavrat, even the memories
Go inform His Highnessthat the prime minister needs to
His Highness Bheeshmais in the playground.
Soldiers, if the enemy surroundsyou from three directions
then retreat backwards,feigning defeat.
Then, seize youropportunity and...
that is importantit's the timing.
It's surprise, Grandsire!Greetings!
*A community associated with singing and dancing to entertain the gods.yet he never sings
every moment.Even you teach me something new
in your childhood, Vidur.Yes you had, Grandsire.
that in battle, timing is moreimportant than strength.
but it's strategic instead.I shall take leave,
Vidur!Were you here for a purpose?
has been served, Grandsire.When one learns what he
Greetings, Sire.Have this sack of grains sent
minister?Yes.
is sowed into the soilit yields many more.
at Varnavratthat you are grooming
maids are present in forests.Not the princesses.
Nakul.- Bheem!
Mother!It's time for the veneration!
Long live the sons of Pandu!Glory to King Pandu!
Princes, the minister hassent you all a present.
Brotherbowing before the wind does not
In fact, it is an honourbrother Yudhishthir.
and military strategiesyou are superior to me.
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
I had soaked these bitter gourdsovernight in a sugar solution,
If you soak themfor a year then maybe
If Duryodhan can change thenbitter gourds stand no chance.
in them, Nakulbecause bitter gourds are
All of you shouldtry to think positively.
where righteousnesscannot dwell.
can dwell within it.Five!
the basis of this world.You cannot resort to
What is it?Righteousness is for
be deemed unrighteous by anyone?No, mother.
about it in the 'gurukulbut pardon me, mother
To have the throneof Hastinapur.
is drawing closer now.Which blessed event
At the time of my birthwhen I had asked the great sage Vashishtha*
of the summer solsticeI leave this
as the Prince today.Today, the royal court
Today...Today, I accomplished
that Duryodhan has curbedhis ambitions?
of someone's life, Bhishma?The purpose
all ties and relationships.But mother
carrying out my duties.Even a duty is a tie, son.
how can I not be free?Mother
but very soonsomeone will arrive
When you willattain that knowledge
Righteousness.Everyone meditates over it.
People keep discussingsomeone else's unrighteousness.
But in true termswhat does righteousness mean?
Righteousnessteaches man how to
the entire creation in peace.This is the reason why
Have you not experienced it?In other words, righteousness
for a man to not haveany struggle with another?
in the presence of love?Your answer to this
about it, you will knowthat when one struggles
And thendesires come to the forefront
No.Love does not
comes to the forefrontall arguments, all struggles
What if such a love developsfor the entire world?
and even a blade of grassif one has love in one's heart
then it is termed as compassion.Compassion, in other words
but love for everyone.To not protest against anyone.
If righteousness is a tree,compassion is its basis
in life when mancompletely forgets
and traditions.But compassion?
permeated with struggleswith jealousies
In other words,with unrighteousness.
to take an avatarto impart the right knowledge
is a tale of a timewhen some people would deem
and were stuck in the vortexof anger, hatred and ambitions
Back then, people loved othersbut they lacked love
and evil-doers!Dharma Sansthapanarthaya!
I, Vasudeva Krishna,am going to arrive
Vrushali!Even we'll accompany you!
- Brother.Even we'll accompany you,
- Even we'll come...A city is not just made
Even my friendsare coming along.
All hail, King Yudhisthir!All hail, King Yudhisthir!
even a gravel of my land, uncle?They are taking all
and settle them here.People will come
establish a city therewe'll benefit by that too!
in the crow's nest.And when they hatch, the cuckoo
but the cuckoo stands to gain!So consider that
If a city is established therewe'll snatch it
has been defeated, my child!Mother!
What sin have the ancestorsof the Kuru clan committed
to eliminate my dilemma?Tell me, mother.
is being slurred today?Who has been defeated?
will be defeated!Who are you?
your might, in the courtroom.Now, I will be wedded
I have vowed to livea life of celibacy.
You will have to beara much graver pain
Whenever you are associatedwith a noble task
You will definitely bethe cause of Bhishma's death.
And when the vagaries of agewould have worn you
As your death!As your death!
His Excellency Bhishmais defeated?
today you had to bisectthat very kingdom!
Bhishma!Had it been so, then I would've
have always stood on thepedestal of righteousness, Amba.
During my last momentsI had told you
will make you struggle,day in and day out!
If you haven't sinned, thenwhy are you being punished?
No, Bhishma!It's the punishment for
Your love for your family madeyou disregard the whole world!
a curse for a queen bee!It cannot free itself
filled with nectar!You will meet the same fate,
just commenced, Bhishma.Your family will punish you!
and tear you apart, Bhishma!You will lie on a bed of arrows
likewise,I shall witness death crushing
I've heard thatthe land of this place
No, friend. It is a result ofLord Indra's fury.
according to which, he won'tcause rainfall on this land.
I hope we haven't madea mistake by coming here.
You all have come here believingthe ability of Pandavas, right?
Takshak's sidethen we have on our side
Kind Pandu was grantedthese sons as boon by Gods.
Son of Kind Pandu, Arjunis Lord Indra's blessing.
out to be fruitful for Pandavas.Is this the state?
Those who love land,are loved back by it.
are going to work hard.What did you just say?
I didn't say anything.Charioteer, please stop.
Come closer.I'm not going to punish you.
so worried and sad?Your Highness, I...
Why weren't you supposed tocome here?
consider me as a friendand tell me everything.
I like Hastinapur a lot,Your Highness.
Everything is over there.Forsaking all that,
It will be Duryodhan's reignin Hastinapur
That empire will be yours.Fame is found
have mere strugglesin their fate, Your Highness.
My husband will always berighteous.
it were our heirloom.All the rulers speak
becomes very stiff.Be it the son of Dhritarashtra
Your Highness.Your Highness,
towards our subjectsbut we'll also honour the right
in food have their own placeall our subjects will have
You've taught me the definitionof an ideal empire.
seeks your permission to enter.Prince Duryodhan?
By seeking my permissionto enter
Get used to it, friend Karna.No.
have to seek your permission.This is the tradition
senior to me by rank now.I will always be junior to you
but when it isjoined to a chariot
it just lies in the courtyardof a potter
I can neverforget the fact, Prince
is being given to meonly because of you.
Only your kingdom?It was never yours.
A warrior does not deemhis life valuable, King of Anga.
Today, for the first timein my life
My mother and fatherhave already
Righteousness has alwaysbeen an obstacle in my life
Renouncing righteousness hasnever benefited anyone, Prince.
from this day forthit will be my duty
lie above it for me.We can declare a war
in the battle.What decision have you made?
King Dhritarashtrais making his entrance!
Brother ArjunI have a really bad feeling
of righteousness.Just think about it.
what will be the duty of a King?You will have to command an army
the son of Ganga.The son of Ganga, who
Now, in this old age,do I need to sacrifice my sons?
while he is aliveis left to face hell
What mistake did I makethat I am to suffer
Only...It is only hope, dear.
get over this pain.To declare you the Crowned
But dearto take a decision that will
If you yourselfgive up your position
perform my dutybut also regain my happiness.
Decide aftermeditating over it, dear.
their suggestions as well.There is no question
is an orderto brother Yudhishthir.
With your permissionI would like to
When the Monsoons beginthe King is the first
Still, I willanswer your question.
of killing many animals.By performing the 'Seet Yajna,
of the farmer.This is the reason why
spends time in hell, Arjun.Then why does a King
Dearif a farmer renounces farming
will go hungry.And it is the duty
not assign another personto the 'Seet Yajna
the Crowned Prince in the court.Here you go, brother.
one among these apparelswill be placed on his shoulder.
belongs to the Queen.But my eyes are covered.
The question is not about rightsbut worthiness.
making you unhappy?Kunti, the victory of your sons
is certainly causing me pain.If you want
No, Kunti.I am the Queen.
required of me.But
will go unfulfilledand I have the right
It is almost time for theanointing of the Crowned Prince.
and I are becoming distant?When we had
Now, you have been blessedwith happiness, Kunti.
makes people distant.Greetings, Your Majesty!
Om Bhur Bhuvah SvahTat Savitur Vareniyam
Om Bhur Bhuvah SvahTat Savitur Vareniyam
Be seated.Duryodhan will indeed
then they are boundto be slain, Your Highness.
at my hands!I will rip open Dusshasan's
gain independenceit will be the end
King Dhritarashtra.There will be a blood bath!
of Mahabharat!The day my sons
of all your happiness!No...
are you alright?My Lord...
Bheem, please do not drinkthe blood from my chest!
Father,please save me!
All your brotherswill die at my hands!
Do not drink my blood...No!
Vidur! Vidur,stop these cries!
Stop these cries, Vidur!- Brother Dhritarashtra!
Those cries are merelya figment of your imagination.
will be heardfrom the battlefield.
save my sons!Save my sons,
when I am asleepand I am tormented
Vidur!It seems as though...
the parts of my bodyone by one, Vidur!
I am in great agony,Vidur!
be in agony, brother.You had derived joy
will indeed be agonizing now.Do remember.
but along with it,one also gets surrounded by fear
the river that gave lifeto various cities
The embankment of treacherymade on the Pandavas' competence
It will drown all your sons.It will drown your sons.
Be quiet,Vidur!
If you utter another wordabout the death of my sons
I will kill you!I am bound to die,
does not denote life.When the heart is robbed of joy
brother.With this war
Millions of young men will die.I have dedicated my entire life
left impoverishedI will be as good as dead,
this terrible ordeal.No, Vidur...
Please show me a wayout of this dreadful situation,
Even if we seek the refugeof the Pandavas
them to death.No, they will not.
their propertyand apologize to them.
when the Pandavas did notforsake righteousness
No matter in what formthe Holy Basil is consumed
The Pandavas will not forsakerighteousness now either.
and apologizebrother.
the punishment as well.One thing is clear,
only by Draupadi now.Sister-in-law!
Do you know?It is a tradition
ties a protection amuleton her son before marriage.
protection amulet for Abhimanyu.These five stones
Where is Abhimanyu?He is in his chamber
for the marriage.Sister-in-law
Me?But why me, Subhadra?
to do so resides in you.Instead of wearing an armour
Madhav was correct.When a warrior goes to battle
King Virat has protected us.By forging familial ties
then I will have todisobey them.
and my brothers will be showingvalour in the battlefield
away from the battlefield.I promise you
However,if either
then even after the deathof the hundred Kauravas
no such promise, mother.I can make only one promise
That would be adequate.All five of your fathers
will now be theirs.May you live long!
of my fathers, Mother Draupadi.Their shoulders have the weight
mother.I will string these stones
the protection of his motherhe cannot be defeated.
I have two mothers.Did you call for me,
do you see these lamps?These hundred lamps
Kunti has lit themand
will be extinguishedin the battlefield.
tormented by injusticecan never be futile.
In order to scare youthose Pandavas have come up
any one of the lampsthis instant
Then here you go,mother.
These lamps will be extinguishedonly in the battlefield, son.
Please save yourselves.- Impossible, mother.
just think once aboutthe situation your father is in.
The uncertainties of the futurekeep him awake all night.
of your mother.A mother who loses her sons
of a hundred serpents.Her life becomes hell.
to be preparedto experience such agony
will be the Pandavas!They will die at my hands.
scare you.I do not believe
extinguishing such lampscould affect the life
who make lamps in this worldwould be made to sit
I will emerge victorious.I shall become the Emperor
from now will beginthe Mahabharat.
will meet their doomin this very battlefield.
will be satiated by drinkingthe blood of my enemies.
the result of a war?I know,
but I have unparalleled mightfighting from my side.
who has been blessedwith the boon to die at will.
My friend Maharathi Karnawhose armour can withstand
three exceptional warriorswho cannot be slain
Crown Prince Duryodhan!The answer to your friend Karna
can certainly withstandthe blow of many weapons
My brother Dhrishtadyumnawas born to slay Guru Drona.
that whenever I confront himin a battlefield
in this battlefieldPrincess Shikhandini?
In other words,on the very first day of the war
will be stripped of his weapons.Am I correct,
Princess Shikhandini.Uncle
resonates of such tales.In other words, on the
refuse to take to arms?So, will we get defeated
My darlingbefore a war begins
with certain plans.This war is not yours,
this waris between me
woven by him.That is why,
I require merely three moments.Only three moments.
Righteousness will aid youwin this war.
You.Three days before the war.
of treachery, My Lords.The ethics of the war
in the discussionand use it to their advantage.
In a war,his mind stops working
in order to protect oneselfeven the mind of cowards
Uncle will certainly weavea web of treachery.
brother Yudhishthir.Even if the question
the other term for liberation.When it comes to righteousness
turns green,yellow
However, gold does notchange its colour.
Let's go.It is time for the discussion.
Greetings,Your Excellency Bhishma.
those rules are merelyrecollected by everyone
these rules before allin this session.
It is a traditionof the Aryan region
However,dusk or sundown
the end of the day.Impossible!
are no longer visible.The argument over
marks the end of a daythen you may stop
I can shoot arrowseven in complete darkness.
Then I suggestthat dawn and dusk
The Maharathisof both the armies
That sounds fair,Your Excellency Bhishma.
My darling...Your Excellency...
A warrior who isinjured, defenseless
People who serveand treat other people
in the battlefieldshall also not be harmed
shall be sentenced to deathby the General of that warrior.
there is no scopefor any argument.
Now, before endingthis session
called this regiona righteous one.
act righteously?Indeed.
In other wordswe have decided
of the same category.A warrior proficient in archery
A Maharathicannot challenge
according to the 'shastrasand traditions
are deemed to be different.If a woman is a mother,
she is dear.If she is a daughter,
she is worthy of respect.Even when one has
is like paving one's waystraight to hell.
had lied down defenselessin the path of the Goddess.
Only a womancan fight against another...
Yudhishthir,son of Pandu
when it comes to righteousness.If you say that in this war
then you would be doingan unrighteous deed.
to strike at a womanthen you would be
What kind of a question is that?When I have given everyone
come into the picture?Righteousness and traditions
Yudhishthir,son of Pandu...
Have you thought of defeating useven without engaging in a war?
So, in order to be victoriouswill you let go
to participate in this war.We accept it.
my darling...The righteousness of Yudhishthir
Your Grace, the ministerhas sent this gift for you.
Did he not send jaggeryand clarified butter along?
If you soak the rice overnight,and fry it in the butter
it makes for an excellentKheer', mother.
Bhima's 'Kheer' becameimpure even before it was made.
Sahadev.Only man can make things impure,
why did uncle sendthis rat as a gift?
The rat must havestumbled into the bag.
Please keep this is mind,Your Grace
it can manifest itself inhundreds, in the future.
Even if one grain ofrice falls to the ground
My child.Are you looking at this moon?
How luminous it was.And now, only a part of
even this, would be lost.For tomorrow, is the
will be a 'Diwalifor us as well.
Uncle,I have complete faith in Karna.
Lakshagraha' on fire.Now, there is no escape,
Greetings, Your Grace.Adhiratha,
Send him in.- Yes, Your Grace.
bow before me now.Leave us!
to bow before you.I'm here to tell you
and Hastinapur.It's the lay of the land,
because of his friendsan adolescent,
for his in-lawsand an old man
which can allay this pain.I'm certain that
Tell me the truth, Adhiratha.What has your son done?
Your Grace, Karna is innocent.If that's true,
How has Karna hurt you?Your Grace,
He hasn't said anything clearly.But something is amiss
at Varnavart.Something will come to
for even Karna.And I will not let
head with his discus.Now he won't try to make
Not worried. I was wonderingwhy uncle sent a rat.
he won't be any beautiful.Leave the mirror alone.
What's there to get tired,brother?
I look at my arms.Yes,
nothing to look at.Arjuna face was worth looking at
saddened to know thatthe strongest man in the world
BhimaBhima, go and see whether
It's nothing like that.It's time to eat,
Brother! Brother!Grand uncle Bhishma has left
come to know of this?The biggest of ships are sunk
Even your plan has a hole.Your friend.
I'm sure the pain in his heartis reflecting on
for alarm.What has to happen tomorrow
are about to be eclipsed.But how will that happen, uncle?
My friend.Will you take a message
because Duryodhana's ill luckand 'Lakshagraha
Write the message.A message from Shakuni?
We have to set themansion on fire tonight.
There is a personat the stables
Go and give this 'laddoo' to him.Go and give it to him.
that Dhamgranthi is a person.Tantripal has sent
I was wonderingwhen the 'laddoo' will arrive.
If I have it,I will gain weight
How would I know that?Your Highness, we have brought
Who had the audacityto send me these sweets?
may I have the 'laddoo'?I am reminded of my childhood
You have made my kingdomprosper so much.
of our kingdom.The basis of our protection.
becauseits shell is its
Your Highnessa wise king does not depend
He divides the responsibilitiesamong several people.
has the same food been sentto the Queen's chamber?
*"Large reed" or "having a reed."I am tired.
How will you grow strongby learning to dance?
will you become strong.Alright, Uttar.
I am a warrior.I don't dance.
Dance in warfare!Definitely.
Then, watch the miraclecalled dancing.
important in timesof struggle and peace.
*Divine dance performed by Shiva.then the terrible 'Tandav
Why do we have these sweetsfor our meals repeatedly?
Princess Uttarawill rest now.
have you finishedadorning my hair?
Your HighnessToday I am observing a fast called 'Yaksh Poojan'.*
containing liquorto my elder brother's house.
But I am an expert maid.My duty is to style your hair.
No one refuses to obey GeneralKeechak's order in Kingdom of Matsya.
And for some reason,the King is very fond of him.
gets angry with youhe will have you burnt alive.
Take this and deliver itto his house.
is there any reasonbehind sending the 'laddoo'?
But, brother Bheemelder brother had told us
very narrow, Brihannala.Eat the food that I prepare
to face a battle.Did Panchali not receive
who is yet to arrive.We had seen the gram flour
the Queen stopped herand gave her some task.
I might stumble in the dark.Let me light up the chamber.
Otherwise, you will get burnt.I have already told you,
and I hear those wordsseveral times.
that you will be punishedseveral times over.
some royal family.Such beauty
bound by any caste or creed.They can be found anywhere.
my beauty at all.I have.
beautiful face.I am enchanted
to marry you.I am already married,
then why do youleave your hair untied?
to finish all the sinnersin this world.
Move out of my way.Foolish maid
then I will force youto surrender to me.
God Himself has grantedthis boon to me.
by touching my clothes.Then call your protectors
that I am under the protectionof five immortal Gandharvas.
Listen to me.While you are under the protection
Keechak.Before the serpents residing
sandalwood trees have to die.You will have to die,
for giving me food and shelter.Hence, I am forgiving you
your secret.And that day
for protection.Yes!
Their powers ought to beduly honoured.
father unknowingly.I shall indeed apologize to him.
on the bottom rung.But you are all alone, Princess.
Pardon me.I could not contain
from your apparels.Did you steal those apparels
because the city of Kampilyaand all its wealth
If you have stolen the apparelsand jewellery from Kampilya
you shall be punished.Who are you?
Me?I am Krishna Vasudev.
and make all its wealth mine.Will
*Vishnu's power to destroy materialistic or demonic tendencies (Anarthas) that prevent people from reaching god.in the battle.
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
where is your son?When I heard that you performed
to bless him.My son has not been born
I know.In order to slay me
But for how long will thisreciprocal tradition of insult
within your heart now, Drupad.Did you get scared,
bearing fear in my heart.I have nothing but true love
After insulting a person,showering love is easy, Drona.
I would have had faithin your love.
You took halfthe kingdom from me!
because even today,I want your friendship
and your son like mine.I bless him that may
your enemy isright in front of you!
I will not drawmy weapon, Drupad.
So, allow himto fulfill the purpose
Dhrishtadyumna.Who are you?!
cannot possibly know it,King Drupad.
All you need to know is that Ishall not let you commit
the right to decide uponwhat is righteous
to decide upon righteousness.There is no requirement
you too would have knownwhat righteousness is.
Guru Drona hasapproached you with amity.
You cannot slay him now,King Drupad.
King Drupadbut only if you give up
Annihilate that arrogant man!Do not be foolish, Drupad.
- Be quiet, Drona!Dhrishtadyumna, attack!
then do attack.Attack!
and that I wouldprotect you then.
Now, I must slay you.Father..
either Drupad at your feetor my severed head
your vow shallindeed be fulfilled
give the orderto launch an attack.
Give the order to launchan attack, Your Majesty!
Drupad.The Region of Arya.
Panchal - City of Kampilya.Where is King Drupad?
What news do you bring,messenger?
has sent the messagethat he is getting ready
only nine miles of my land!And with these hands of mine
the land of Panchaldoes not have the right
go and send Drona the messagethat a stone which is
in the Netherworld!Cover his body with soil.
- Pay attention, friend.While sharpening the swords,
the shaft will lose its weight.Certainly, King of Anga.
of the swords and arrowsare as small as possible.
Go and give it to the Pandavas.The armour of
By agreeing to take partin this war
I was waiting for you.We must go to my uncle now
Let's proceed.- Alright.
built on the shoulders of mine?So, I thought of coming here
I can hold it in my hands.May I have a look?
making the idol, the sculptormust have used arrogance
but are vastly different.Now, pray to the Almighty,
be stronger than your idol.Do remember.
Careful!Do not step on
in the Netherworld.From there.
There.Now, to your left.
Careful.Now, come from that way.
What were you doing?Teaching you how to dance.
I was meditatingon how to create them
What is this?Discus formation.
It will bore you.My brother Krishna says,
but only an able personcan navigate through it.
No. Other people deem himhighly knowledgeable.
of the melody you had playedthe other day.
It is still resonatingin my ears.
It was more like war musicthan a soothing melody.
for a melody to be soothing.Sometimes, the psyche
you are in love with?Is that all?
Brother Krishna hassent this for you.
Brother Krishna said,if you keep this with you
- Yes.Are you going to be
I shall be at the front.At the very front.
while filling a bowlwith a liquid
and that nothing spills over.Mother, we shall ensure that our
Our strengthwill not be used to torture the
Goodbye, mother.May you be victorious!
I could not keep the promiseI made to you.
You fail to grasp the tricksof grandfather and the Minister
Uncle often saysthat a righteous person
I have something more to say.Your grandfather Bhishma
he has to resort tosomething unrighteous.
there was nofeeling of remorse within him.
the King of Kashiand the woeful tale of his
that the elder sisterof your mothers, Amba
And a person who cannot diecannot be defeated.
only to scare people.But you need not be afraid of
the 100 sons of yoursis enough to defeat anyone.
your life ismore precious to me.
to defeat your son.I shall certainly make him bow
place it at your teacher's feet?Dronacharya will be
all the virtues.Chopping the thorns off a tree
Goodbye.- May you be victorious!
other palaces, Durochan!But make sure that from
shouldn't be visible.Don't worry, Your Highness.
Disperse!Duryodhan...
- I'm not dullbut I'm very furious, father!
is an emperor.Had I been born in a normal
I wouldn't have facedthis problem.
to his father.To acquire the livestock
If the businessman's sonis not competent enough
is not competent enoughthen the entire kingdom faces
Well said.Even I was trying to explain
Duryodhanyou've accepted
is the de facto authorityHis Highness can't take any
if I have saidsomething wrong.
that he'll have to provehis potential
becoming reclusescan only be prayed for.
As an emperorof Hastinapur
by your father.The coronation ceremony will be
I'll discuss with grandsireabout this matter.
are obsolete, Gandhari.Before speaking
and if not me, answer itto yourself.
a king of Hastinapur?Certainly
who values righteousness.A golden crown is bejeweled only
When my son will become a kinghe'll prove his competency.
Duryodhanwe'll have
leave Hastinapurand go away forever.
that Kunti is compelledto take them
you're getting my point.But why, uncle?
My dear.You foolish darling!
will stop youfrom being coronated.
is above all.He sides with them.
even thengrandsire will favour them.
All the five of themfollow the path
can bemeted out injustice
of inequityaren't affected
has started onthe path of iniquity.
is going to be really dreadful.There's nothing to be so upset
on what is just and unjustthen even he can, soon
These 105 kids fosteringlove
is mandatory.How will we teach them to love
a sapling is but inevitable.Just the ways
has to be taught.That has to be taught
Brother, for whom is thisgrand dinner organised?
in the palace.For all the attendants, guards,
such food is prepared daily.Do you remember,
You, anyhow, look for an optionto satisfy your hunger, brother.
Say like that.Don't I let you all have food?
the varieties of dishes.Stop!
How can you eatwithout permission?
Behold. These wild men aren'teven aware of royal etiquettes.
with animals for too long.But they are our brothers.
Look who's seated there.Who is he?
Minister, may I eat a 'laddoo'?Seems like the elder brother
Elder brother.Let it be.
Without the minister's consentyou may never be allowed to eat.
I don't want to eat!Dear brother Duryodhan.
So much malice isn't good.Let no one be served
of the food minister.Sugdha.
Queen Gandhari had orderedthat your room be
I'm the wife of a hermit.I and my sons
But the members ofthe royal family
Dushala.Come here.
Greetings. - Stepmother Kunti,where are your sons?
a 105 brothers.105 brothers?
Butbrother Duryodhan
He was sayingthat your sons are here
to be the crown prince.And he says that your sons
His Excellency Bhishma's ordersthere shall be changes in
Prince DushashanPrince Dussahan,
Prince Duryodhan, seats bearranged for the sons of Pandu.
Let the meals be servedto the princes.
Two more.Glutton.
No one will bendtheir elbow
if the weaponscollide then it will be
Mahadev.Stop, Parashuram.
keep fighting each otherthe entire universe
got justice, Mahadev.Then how can you
by his promise, Mahadev.Until my mind is not at rest
My Lord,fulfill this wish of mine.
the cause of his death.As it is a plea to
or noble deedwhen you wish
Expunge your heart of thisbitterness, Princess Amba.
your generosity, Bheeshma.I shall not forgive you.
to kill you.The throne of Hastinapur for
for that very throne.The throne will never allow you
and the throne willmake you run your whole life
I shall come thenas your doom.
25 Years Later.Shakti is finally born
I am quite certainthat Drupada's queen must have
the birth of this girlfor the past 25 years.
Bheeshma's death.I have been praying to the Lord
A daughter is born, father.All hail Goddess Mahakali!
otherwise the whole of Panchalwill burn the way Lanka did!
than revengein this entire world.
of the world to me.And that is why,
Royal Astrologerwhat do the stars say
when this girl child was born.Rahu has a great influence
successful in carrying outall the duties of her life.
of Shikhandini.The wishes and ambitions
enmity and revengebecome the legacy
to give their childrenall the happiness of the world
They intend to give them lovebut end up filling them
What have youtaught your children?
but did you not fill theirhearts with hate as well.
good and bad?Does the struggle of one man
and that of a nationwith another
Do murder, death and bloodshednot arise from these
parents give their childrenlife as well as death.
and darkness may residein the mind of one
is fear.Only fear.
Sindh.Adra.
Kshubbha!Princess Gandhari,
quit staring at meand go and bring
All the lamps will be lit soon.The breeze extinguished them.
get extinguished?Do you not know how scared
Why am I so afraid of the dark?Not just you, Princess Gandhari
our windows to the world.If one has vision,
lost in the dark.The whole world vanishes.
But now, you need not fear it.You should go back to sleep now.
wealthier than Lord Kuberis where my daughter
will be so good lookingthat he will give tough
the God of windand will have more qualities
or the slightest flawthen my Gandhari will not
After all, Lord Shiva has givenher the boon to have 100 sons.
While reading Gandhari's horoscopewhy have you become so grave?
- Your HighnessGeneral Shatashwa requests
But the kingis occupied right now.
but the news is suchthat I must converse
Shatashwa?Whom does the army belong to?
The soldierwho delivered this news
How much time will ittake them to reach here?
Where is Prince Shakuni?- He is on a journey
the kingdom of Gandhar!And to attack without
of warfare, your Majesty.Then I shall punish them
I will annihilate that army!This is Gandhar!
Each one of them is likea brave lion.
and rip their hearts out!Shatashwa.
Tell all the soldiersto bid goodbye to their families.
This will be a terrible battle!Lord Indra is your
The 'Vedas' saythat the might of Lord Indra
And if I am unableto have his love
cannot be destroyed.To chop down a tree
to prey on only the illusionsof Mayasur.
The illusion of Mayasuris very powerful, Arjun.
if we kill the serpentsthen it would be unrighteous.
Go and seek the refugeof the Pandavas.
this instant.And the one I bite
Son of Pandu,Arjun.
Lord Indrayou protect
competent warriorsmake use of the earth.
of biting innocent people!And protecting the culprits
Arjun!Do not preach me
you are only a child.I am your child,
on his father's shouldershas a better vision
Go away from hereotherwise you shall
Lord Indra.I would be blessed
I cannot tarnishyour reputation.
Stop! Consumingrodents as a meal
Stop!Who are you scared of?
It was an exchange of benefits.But this is a mortal trouble.
I am now going to seekthe refuge of the Pandavas.
Lord Indra!I am your son
so easily.I will not be defeated,
It's not a contest to test yoursand Arjuna's potential.
He is not trying to insult you.Please do not show the Vajra
Please accept my greetings.Please show respect
There are five steps here,brother
I can feel the presenceof a lot of people, Pandu.
The entire place has beenadorned with flowers.
garlands of magnolias.You are unparalleled, brother!
the objects around mebut it is futile.
Flowers have been scatteredfrom here to the entrance.
seems impatient to get married.Do not be so restless, prince.
you shall definitely hearthe sound of her anklets.
and blind Yadav.I do not need your help.
only her anklets.Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
I can hear her anklets.You were right, Pandu.
But why did the other soundsdie out, Pandu?
Why isn't anyonesaying anything?
Why have you tied a clothover your eyes?
but she has taken an oathof keeping her eyes covered
for the rest of her life!King of Gandhar,
to break her oath.How dare you mock the
with a marriage proposaland in return,
or insult you, Queen Mother.Then what is all this?
If the girl cannot becomeDhritarashtra's vision
but.. - A woman who mocksmy blindness
I have left my father's homebehind, my lord
then I will have to enterthe holy fire.
then what is the reasonbehind the blindfold?
needs a wifewho can become his vision.
Accept my greetings,grandfather.
That is why, the question ofcompleting him does not arise.
from the rest.And in order to become
this different lifestyle.To me, my lord is not incomplete
And in order to becomehis true mate
My cultureteaches me, grandfather
when my husband cannot..- The task of
is yours, Gandhari.Greetings, Queen Mother.
And how can a marital life becomplete if a husband and wife
We only see a serpentcrawl on the ground
is something that wecannot understand.
our experiences formthe major obstacle.
and as long as my visioncontinues to dictate my life
That is why I have decidedto sacrifice my vision
you should have given thismore thought, my child.
An oath is born from the purefeelings of one's heart.
but never an oath.Pardon my impudence, grandfather
Give me the blessing thatwhenever my husband is hurt
as your daughter-in-lawand to bless me
with 100 illustrious sons.And give me the opportunity
and bestow him with thefruits of my penance.
grandfather?Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
This is a very grim situation,Queen Mother.
with our holy scripturesnor is it traditional.
Fear will loom in this marriagebecause when a husband and wife
turn out well.To have a good progeny
But even Princess Gandharihas taken a terrible oath,
that an oath alwaysgoes against traditions
But it is also true that an oathopens up new horizons
It would be appropriate.This is in favour of Hastinapur
Sukta..This apparel
In the light of these lamps,these look like
They look like?To whom, Sukta?
Princess..And from today, for me as well.
Fragrantand intoxicating.
that seem like music to my lord.What good is all this adornment
Every moment in lifeis a moment of decision.
bring about happinessor sadness in the future,
and the future generations too.When one is faced with a dilemma
The moment of decisionbecomes a battle
We take most decisions not tofind a solution to a problem
No.Then, can a heart
In realitywhen one takes a decision
future for himself.But
This is a request from your grandfather.Go and invite my liberation.
at the earliest.King of Yakshas.
my meditation futile?!You had promised me
complete my meditation.Each time you tried
austere meditation.You will have to help me.
I was born again only to slayHis Excellency Bhishma.
then this life is worthless to me!I shall destroy this body
this life of mine worthwhileor commit sin of being
even this life that you gave mewas futile.
only when he gives uphis weapons, uncle
And because she is a womanuncle had lady Shikhandini
from mahadev, Prince Dusshasanand a boon granted by a God
Friend Karnaas long as Lady Amba's soul
the reason of grandsire's deathin this war.
Do you not say,Govind
Sister too will have to completeher meditation
strategy based on this belief Draupadi.His excellency took a decision
However, the army of the Kauravaswill indeed have his protection.
Even then neither will we attain successnor the sons of Dhritarashtra.
or when all the soldiers fleethe king of that army
[HORSE NEIGHING]You seem to be forgetting brother Sahadev
that when sheaims at a noble deed
Moreover, Mahadev's promisecan never be false.
to go to the King of Yakshas.What do you mean Vasudev?
Lady ShikhandiniI am here because the promise I made you
but neither does one of thema swan a peacock.
blemishes and appellations.I am prepared
Today you must fulfill your promiseKing of the Yakshas.
Now, you must fulfill your promise.I respect your oath.
and give you my manhood.The moment you leave this pyre
and with my blessingsno one will suspect you.
this eveningbut you shall stay a man only
with you to discharge your duty.Only one day.
and after that, I must renouncethis society forever.
After this war. I shall finally have my revengeand the entire world will have justice
My darling that wicked YadavaVasudev Krishna
our spies have brought the newsthat Shikhandini,
with the King of the Yakshasfor a day and has come here
tomorrow in the warthe son of Drupad
His excellency Bhishmawill give up his weapons.
that this transformation lasts only for a day.If his excellency Bhishma is not present
My darling go at once and commandhis excellency Bhishma
[HORSE NEIGHING]Grandsire
has returned as a man to slay you.So Lady Amba is here.
the promise He made.This time. Lady Amba must indeed
That is impossible Grandsire.Then you need to leave this battlefield.
you have reminded me of my dutiesand now, you are advising me
Bless you dear but I cannot obey your order.Vasudev Krishna enlightened me
the orders of someone else.I have been awaiting Lady Amba
Tomorrow, before the sundown,I shall give up my weapons
seems like a cursewhile even a weapon
The right hand of the Almightyalways raised to grant one a boon
While attacking him.It will feel as though
Merely imagining grandsire's deathis driving a stake though our hearts.
and deep peace, Panchali.From tomorrow,
made such grave sacrificefor your victory
but the heart...The heart knows neither
This is the peculiarityof human nature, friend.
it gets pulled towardthe opposite direction
begins to have contrary thoughtsthe moment a task gets completed.
However this very qualityalso keeps him
to this dilemma, Vasudev?The solution to this
You can't become my charioteer.Do you not believe me, Parth?
You are a respected person.I can't let you become a charioteer.
then consider mejust sitting in front of you.
In honesty and deception...Between truth and immorality...
it would be my dutyto bring you to the 
or your life,I am proficient in both, Parth.
Karna.I will wait for you
we will not achieve victory.I also wait for that day, 
but my soulwill accompany you in the battlefield.
All hail Mahadev!- All hail Mahadev!
May your war skillswill make you immortal.
Sire!I assure you that this day
Dear...I hope you win.
No one realizesthat at the end of this war
with memories of the war.People of Kuru along with the Arya clan
and farmers.All will survive, my son.
enemy to society.Have no mercy on them.
Fill the vessel of god Bhairav with blood, my child.
Yudhishtir.Are you already scared?
Dusshasan,time to ask forgiveness 
your soldiers' lifethen surrender yourself
At least your righteousness will live longer than you.
that you had taken oathfor the throne of Hastinapur.
But before this war beginsI will not give up my ethic.
me and my brothershere to ask for your permissions
like birds build their nestson branches in the shade of trees
because of you.Every part of us is indebted 
we have been forced to take up arms against you.
Grandsire,give us permission to war,
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
Emperor, do you engage onlyin verbal grappling-combat
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!Why is this fool
grappling-combat instead?Who is Jarasandha
quite familiar.And those two
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
my darling.I must stop Jarasandha.
Sois this the might
I would have sent my grandsonto engage in a
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Bheem!
had joined the two halvesof a body to create Jarasandha
The earth has been relievedof another burden, brother.
Not only my mightbut also my intelligence
with twigs over there.Upon seeing him,
the halves of Jarasandhain opposite directions
I know that it is a liebut don't you dare try to
How can a personwho slayed Jarasandha
of carrying out mother's orderhas been removed
let me give youa piece of news, My Lord.
Bless you.Subhadra
also be a great warrior.His fame will be immortalized
becomes Kinghis heir will be growing
thinking of an heir, brother.It is time to take the second
Yajna,' brother Yudhishthir.Yes, Nakul.
for the Rajsuya 'Yajna.Pardon me,
independence can never be hadthrough someone's permission.
is the happiness of the subjectsand not the prosperity
are forgetting this key fact.The task of making them
King Yudhishthir.We must conduct
adhere to righteousnessand the ones who refuse
otherwise there willcome a time, Your Highness
one will be unable to do so.Everyone will
Vrushali.It was a question of the
this position againforming an alliance
and a crucial planwould also have fallen through.
Was the plan successful,Radheya?
but the moment I had decidedto become King again
in order to help my friendto be prepared to make
that never changes?During the darkness
not because it is nightbut because
follows eventually.Bearing a crown on the head
But I assure you,Vrushali
Is yourwill power your own, Radheya?
bear that crown again?This is 'Lakshagraha.
And in that 'yajnathat palace will be used
will burn to ashesin that 'yajna!
but also the competenceof this friend of yours
Why are you unhappyon this joyous occasion?
joyous occasion for mewhen my arrows will crush
cut right through my chest.Beheading an enemy
of righteousness, friend.This is the difference between
Righteousness!Do not ramble on about
righteousness in the world...Victory!
And the traditionsmentioned in history
Lie!Righteousness is something
Any task that weakensthe soul of man
a soft corner for the Pandavasnow, King of Anga?
Foolish Dusshasan!Be quiet!
If any task of mineis hurting my friend
informed right away!The plan has been cancelled!
The plan has been cancelled.Friend Karna
If you do not want meto become the Crown Prince
I am not against a battle.Battle? With whom shall
my defeat, friend.In the battle,
Just answer this questionof mine, friend.
friend Karna.They have given rise
resort to unrighteousnessOT
the way a person whosnatches the right of another
to weaknessa person who gives up
King of Angathen do speak up now.
Certainly, sister-in-law.Goodbye, brother-in-law.
Goodbye.Goodbye, uncle.
Yudhishthirone must never impede
at the moment.All of you
will keep me wide awake.Your departure
Goodbye, brother.You need not worry
In other wordswe are worried about you,
the reason of your worrywill come to an end,
May glory be yours.King of Anga
This is the only blessingI can give you.
Dwaraka.In such a short time span
The one who has themental state to grasp things
You will come across theTriveni Confluence on your way.
lies the Lost River Saraswati.While bathing
in that river.But I have not
Goddess Saraswaticould not walk on earth bearing
she began migratinginto the earth.
you will earngood fortune, friend.
battling in this mannerthen he will annihilate
grandsire to a duel.And Guru Dronacharya
General Dhrishtadyumna.Tomorrow,
Arjun should help him.Stopping Guru Drona by oneself
will battle Guru Dronathen who will retaliate
he will annihilateour entire army.
to keep His Excellencyaway from the battlefield.
then Duryodhanwill have no one to protect him.
to keep grandsireaway from the battlefield?
I had saidthat treachery will indeed
treachery, brother Yudhishthir.And if the basis of treachery
is righteous as well.And in order to boost
to gain victory tomorrow.And in order to gain victory
Only five steps.Second Day of the War.
the sons of Panducome up with today,
at the very thought of defeat?Today, the sons of Pandu
battle formation, Your Highness.In order to protect him,
are present, Your Highness.The ones leading
Prince Sahadevand Prince Abhimanyu,
of a battle formationhave the sons of Pandu
is right at the end?Such kind of a formation
It can cut right throughthe enemy army, Your Highness.
total disarray, Your Highness.The 'Krouncha Vyooh.'*
of the Pandavasis advancing towards
But what formation hasgrandsire come up with
Assume the form of a 'Maha Vyooh!'**To block the outflanking move of the enemy.
in the middle of the formation!Guru Drona
launched against us!Dusshasan
King Shalyaand King Susharma, attack the
can be brokenby stifling the neck of this
- Attack!Attack!
has been assembledonly to battle you!
and that is to slay you!Neither does another warrior
of striking at another warrior!Do not employ words
Friendit is time to take
The garland of victoryshall await you, dear!
Today, you shall get the answerto yesterday's treachery
The entire battlefieldis resonating with that answer!
One must not battle wherethere is mist.
in the battlefield, Sanjay?!Why are you not telling
battlefield, Your Highness.The battle formation
hidden by clouds.The miraculous weapon
the second step to our victory.His Excellency and Guru Drona
Brother Yudhishthir,are you prepared?
to do this.I had told you,
ties and his weaknesslie in the fort of Hastinapur.
will leave the battlefieldtrailing you.
only on this battlefield.This region of Samanta Panchaka
the boundaries of this region.We cannot battle beyond
brother Yudhishthir.Think of it as
take the chariot forth.Along with one 'akshauhini
their battle formationand advancing towards
towards Hastinapur!It is time to take
brother Yudhishthiris going to attack Hastinapur.
Certainly, Vasudev.My mace shall deliver
Sanjay, what else is happeningin the battlefield?
leave the battlefield andattack Hastinapur?
sacrificed, Your Highness.Possibly, the defeat
with victory within themYour Highness.
Dusshasanand remind me once again
their strengthwhile ripping your arms out.
brother Yudhishthir outby proceeding
is headed towards Hastinapur,brother Duryodhan!
He is headed towards Hastinapurto indeed attack it, my darling.
Yudhishthir at the earliest.In order to protect Hastinapur...
of a cow, my darlingthen it too can charge at you.
then even Yudhishthircan resort to unrighteousness.
but in the battlefielddisbelief provides one
only in losses.Uncle is correct, grandsire.
If your beliefturns out to be false
In order to protectmy darling Duryodhan
Your Excellency Bhishma.However
and you can slay himin such a situation.
and protect Hastinapurand the moment
Everyone in this world isborn with relevant powers.
But your life could havebeen put at risk.
the chances of successand failure
the chances of failurebecome a certainty.
But to decide againstmaking an attempt
certain kinds of harms.Our soul succumbs
Am I right, my friend?Please continue with
Yadavs become prosperous again.Prince Abhimanyu,
greatest of the Yadavs, Krishna.Because he has taught all
our lives prosperous.Not only with money but
our thoughts and our souls.Vrindavan witnesses music,
the animals seemdelighted in the forests.
and great luck.When everyone's feet
[FLUTE PLAYING]Krishna, haven't you
hermits.That's not acceptable, Nand.
to donate wealth, grains, goldet cetera in good quantity.
The entire society contributesto Lord Indra's yajna.
a less important kingyou were exiled from Gokul
where on earthwill you find refuge?
after an entireyear's struggle, sire.
humans decided to showsupport by worshipping him.
Lord Indra had killedVritasur to protect himself
You are yet to witnessLord Indra's wrath.
But fear takes awayfrom a human's soul.
can the human soulbe prosperous.
Young man, your argumentsare pointless.
and it surely callsfor donation.
of the month of asaadh.**June-July.
along with the entire society.Greetings.
the traditions.The world is not run by
who forms the basis of lifeshould be worshipped.
What would you suggest, Krishna?Father, we should
We will surely hold LordIndra's yajna but only when
Father, fear cannotbe worshipped.
There are ample ghee pots.Yes.
Okay, brother.Prove it then.
has woods to be burnt.Madhumangal, you know what
- Let's go.Ominous!
fire has been spoilt.The yajna has been corrupted.
Go and bringanother pot of ghee.
started all over again.Go.
The children arestealing the offertory.
that could happen.The yajna has been corrupted.
by paying heed to young men.If Lord Indra is upset,
heat is at its warmestand the water on land dries up
Who provides us withvegetables, flowers and wood?
He is alive!Look at this, Nand and tell me.
than the Gods, sire.We will not halt
[YELLING]Khrisna!
I was only tyring to boost my ownand my Yadav clan's self confidence.
If you really wish to bless me.Then suggest me a way of placing this hill down.
that you have chosen,will always be a tough one to tread.
will be left wandering, Khrisna.I bow down to you.
I did not knowthat you would
brother Duryodhan.You most certainly are,
your eyes were closed.And my eyes were closed
where I couldsee him first.
because He has placedthe eyes in front of the head.
to have arrived first.Vasudev
That is not my fault.If friend wanted
Then coming to youwith the hope of justice
Vasudev.Stop,
for something from Madhav.You cannot leave
Madhav's reputation.Then what is the reason
Because friend has comewith a request while you
in his heart while youhave politics in yours.
If one gets the opportunityto engage in charity
No other task in the worldis more important than charity.
No, brother.I certainly am partial
and chooses me.However, I have
Before asking for anythinglisten to my decision.
will not fightfrom the same side.
The Narayani Army of Dwarakais like no other in this world.
is nearlyimpossible.
is more than thatof your Narayani Army.
The strength and powerof my Sudarshan 'Chakra
and Indra's 'Vajra.Its blow
The strength of my knowledgethe might of my character
The moment I usethe Sudarshan 'Chakra
justice-injusticeweak-powerful...
the presenceor the absence of a war
On one hand,there is
while on the otherthere is me.
Now, the decision restswith the two of you.
What do you wish for?Make the choice,
Madhav.However, to save your name from
When I was a child,Mother Yashoda
How can a dark personbe scared of getting tainted?
seems to have chosen.The basis of choice
And brother Duryodhanknows quite well
brother Duryodhan?I most certainly do.
The first one to choosewill be friend.
Forsaking one's rightsis not called bravery.
to one's property, Madhav.Love
have their righton human beings.
For the sake of righteousnessI ask for you,
Madhav.You
or weapons, Arjun?Is this generosity
has been extractedonly the juice is of value.
Narayani Army will have tosuffice me now.
His words did not go in vainfriend had his wish fulfilled
Now,we must see
Kuntiyou must indeed have heard
Duryodhan's side.Only the army of Dwaraka
when the heartbecomes agitated with
of uncertainties.This reminds me of an incident
Even as a child,I could not know
take care of that toy.It fell from my hands and broke.
Then I took the piecesof that broken toy
in my mind, Kunti.After working hard all night
His joy knew no boundsthat day, Kunti.
that belonged to himwould stay safe
had left me feelingexceedingly happy, Kunti.
that belongs to Panduwill not be harmed
That is why,I request you, Kunti
intransigent about a warand dedicate themselves to us.
has come up with a planto keep my sons safe.
Do you not remember,brother-in-law?
in the court.Krishna had left the entire
he did not let Draupadiget disrobed.
is the one that willemerge victorious.
not to take to armsin the battlefield, Kunti.
Krishna does not aid anyone,brother-in-law.
the entire creation itself.In the battlefield,
the 'Brahmastrabecause he will be
like the 'Vajra.The weapons of Yudhishthir,
like lighting burns a tree down.You had once promised
todayI have lit these hundred lamps.
When these lampsalmost get extinguished
are in danger.Krishna being on their side
Permission!Does the King of Hastinapur
Be quiet, King of Gandhar!I, son of Shantanu,
the King of Hastinapur!This is my oath!
I guide and protectthe King of Hastinapur!
my permission is mandatory.But great Bhishma
You have taken an oathof not going against Hastinapur
to make sure thatthe throne of Hastinapur
And if I see an unrighteous Kingon the throne of Hastinapur
And thisdoes not break my oath.
Pardon me, great Bhishmabut if I am ordered
but in order to protect himI am prepared to sacrifice
Before the anointment ceremonyorder the King of Anga
No, uncle!No!
But uncleI wish to transfer the duties
You may certainly do so.You are the Acting King
But you cannot make him King.Why can he not do so,
When he has already beenmade the Crown Prince
Duryodhan's coronationas the Prince holds no value.
You had permitted meto be coronated as the Prince.
is not alivethen I am next in line
is alive.Are
Was it nota difficult competition?
be an ordinary 'Brahmin?That was indeed Arjun.
Do you believe now,Dhritarashtra
Now, ifYudhishthir is alive
Then where are the sonsof Pandu, great Bhishma?
Vidur has gone to Kampilyato bring them here.
has gone to Kampilya?He did not seek the permission
Soon.How many days?
a time limit, uncle.Two days, three days, a week?
or if there is no news of themthen Duryodhan will certainly
you too must acceptthis decision, uncle.
Listen.The welcome ceremony
The Pandavas havereached Hastinapur.
Greetings, His Highness.Bless you, dear.
Dear Yudhishthirif all of you were alive
Then why did youchange your mind now, dear?
the same plant firstgives birth to new leaves
and in the end, to seeds.A plant judiciously follows
follows the path of truth.Greetings, grandsire.
the throne of Hastinapurso that righteousness
Greetings, His Highness.Bless you, dear!
had adopted the lifestyleand mentality of his subjects.
That is why, we decidedthat if brother Yudhishthir
then he too will prove to bea fine King in the future.
I have heard that a competitionwhich could be won only by you,
I could augment the honourof Hastinapur, uncle.
During the exile,brother Bheem
And sister-in-law Hidimbahas also given birth to a son.
married an ogre?Hastinapur, peculiar
Till the time Hidimbaresides in the woods
not deem her son a partof the Kuru dynasty.
my great grandson.Congratulations!
of the next generation?This is the Princess of Panchal
and I am certain of that.Arjun.
is always welcomed together.Her Highness
The five of us have got married.Where are the rest
we five brothershave married Draupadi.
For that,the Empress
daughter of the King of KashiBhanumati in this
servant Yudhishthir.You are yet to play
Sit down.Get up, Your Highness.
while there is still time.No, Vrushali.
And I can give up my lifebut never my honour.
and pray for the protectionof your husband's honour.
Where are you?Impossible!
Brother Yudhishthirdo not let my
servant Yudhishthir.That is an order
Sit down.I cannot bet Panchali
that a husband does not havethe right to his wife.
is something that you haveacknowledged
to the independenceof your wife.
that a husbandhas the right to his wife.
Bet your wifein this round of the game!
This is not righteous.Righteousness does reside
are righteous.Do not play
your hands myself!I give you the order
Play!He will not be able to play
but it is also essentialto take pride in her.
Duryodhan!Duryodhan!
you shall pray for death!Neither will you be able to live
yield results, Duryodhan.Only after pleading for death
will assume the formof pain and suffering
And the Crown Prince is correct.She is like my sister
A woman married to five menand having relationships
ashamed to call my sister!Ashwatthama
As a punishmentfor uttering such words
get infested with insects.It shall indeed be so!
The society will abandon youbut Ashwatthama
Why would yougive him such a curse?
then go and slay your son.Before an entire gathering,
how can she be a woman ofexceptional character?
in your competencethen how can you utter abuses
that you shall lose all yourcompetence and knowledge
will surround you in yourfinal moments, Maharathi Karna
Your entire lifewill seem worthless
Marvellous.So, it has been proved
the right to his wifebut pride
in Panchali's devotionin Panchali's sacrifice
It is said thatat the time of death
fights to live.Every unit of my body
Bring new diceand new pieces.
You are a servant now!An order
brother Duryodhanor sentence me to death
Lady Bhanumatiyou need to bet your wife
servant!Sit down and play,
May servant Yudhishthirhave happiness!
The Princess of Panchalthe Empress of Indraprastha
Do maidsnot have the permission
grandsire?Attendant
Just give the Pandavas whatthey ask for, Your Highness.
even if it is in excess butstop His Excellency Bhishma.
so that in the futuregoing against
All hail His Highness!His Excellency
Your Highness!Greetings,
uncle.You may punish me
Why are you sittingon the floor, dear?
sits on the flooronly during a 'yajna.
The right to be seatedon the throne...
and will stay sofor a long time.
the kingdomneeds to be divided.
Which part of the kingdomwill we get, uncle?
which we can make our capital?I know that,
I have no intentionof being unjust to you.
to Duryodhan.Of that I am sure.
When one upholds justicewith no love in his heart
when he is rewardedor given a present
The truth is,such a situation
It is his failure.I have laboured enough,
to make sure the Kuru kingdomalways houses righteousness
and taken to arms when needed.I require rest now.
with Yudhishthir.You may stay here with your son
What!You will go away,
I am blind.I...
How will I be ableto protect my kingdom?
If I give Yudhishthirhalf the kingdom
of its strength...Then what will I do
You will have to give Yudhishthirhalf the kingdom, Dhritarashtra.
Why should I give himhalf the kingdom, uncle?
But what will I be left with?Weakness?
but mine?Mine will decrease
the kingdom benefit me?It would truly be just, uncle
the strength...The strength would
he could have the strength and...And prosperity
unjust to me, uncle.Possibly, you may get
if doing so can avert a warwithin the Kuru kingdom
whole-heartedly.This is an earnest request
uncle?Is there no region
There is,Panchali.
*It was a forest region (Khandava Vana) on the banks of Yamuna river, in modern day Delhi territory.Then we shall ask
a city in that region.There is not even
I am certain you knowhow to make a hut, My Lord.
Panchali is correct,Nakul.
will be exceedinglydifficult, Draupadi.
troublesome, dear.Troubles?
It is the mother to all three.We shall ask for that region.
and yet preservethe prosperity of Hastinapur.
prosperity, uncle.And you have to admit it.
that Hastinapur shall beprotected by Yudhishthir and me.
shall come to your aid.And Yudhishthir
uncle.But unfortunately, if such a
something unrighteousthen you shall certainly
quite well, uncle.He knows what righteousness is
his unrighteous acts.In the future, you will
I will never let that happen.I will never let it happen...
that I shall not declareYudhishthir King.
He too is like my son.I shall place my head on his lap
relieve uncle of a great burden.Because of such benevolence
That is our good fortune, uncle.This is not only
made for the Kuru kingdomcannot be achieved by a person
is for you to promise methat under no circumstance
Promise me this,uncle.
Only then will Idivide the kingdom.
at his service forever.I have firm faith
no more sacrifices, uncle.Promise me, uncle.
for another sacrifice, dear.So be it.
I can never tire outin making sacrifices.
another sacrifice.A container
But even afterone keeps drawing out
because the water in the wellis obtained from
I have to demonstratethe depth of my soul today.
Hence, I promise youthat until you are
the King of HastinapurI shall serve you and
Today, you mustdivide this kingdom.
just one opportunityto lead a happy life, dear.
uncle.Be seated on your throne.
Maybe it is their way of oustingthe son of Pandu, Yudhishthir
That is why, by givinghim another kingdom
In other words,Hastinapur will now be ruled
and reside in the new city.But how can we leave?
the sons of Pandu are fortunate.We would truly be fortunate
Hear all!Hear all!
I do not see joy on your face.What should I
Yudhishthir Kingand crushed my dreams
to experience joy?But you must pretend,
Son of Pandu,Yudhishthir
If those people are giventhe fertile region near
the peace treatyand attack that region
are the most susceptibleto unrighteous ploys.
be victorious!Your Highness, I,
accept a portionof the Kuru kingdom
the King, Your Highness.You have my permission,
before you are crowned the King,you must tell me
Excluding the city of Hastinapuryou may ask for any other region
Its expanseshould not be more than
Yudhishthir.What do you want?
were made prosperouswith your labour
then it would notdenote my valour.
a father feels overjoyedbut when a son
his father is left ecstatic.You are like my father,
strength and competenceand not property.
we brothers have decidedthat with your permission
grandsire.The Yaduvanshi King
Lord Indra oncecursed that kingdom
It was even robbed of the rains.The buildings of that city
that we willsalvage that region.
of serpent worshippers.But they are venomous beings.
Their leader is an illusoryserpent called Dakshak
gets killed by him for hehas taken such an oath.
You cannot succeedin this endeavour.
be successful.That is a foolish decision,
I have selected a few regionswhich comprise half
those regions would be correctand just as well.
Dear YudhishthirI give you one lakh* gold coins
In the Kuru kingdom,whichever subject
has my permission to do so.What kind of a decision is that?
ruler than themselvesyou will not be deemed
only for the sake of it.Your kingdom will have
in your kingdomwill be taken only in the name
will be in the nameof Hastinapur as well.
ceremony of Yudhishthir.As you say,
your fame,Prestige
valour and all your rights.May it adorn the head of
All hail King Yudhishthir!All hail King Yudhishthir!
All hail King Yudhishthir!- My darling
I came up withto ensure your safety.
independent of Hastinapur.And I have firm faith
In order to multiply theproperty of your kingdom
I promise you,uncle
aunt Gandhariuncle Vidur
This is also the residenceof your mother Kunti, dear.
Kunti is the daughter-in-lawof the Kuru dynasty.
it is my dutyto keep her safe, dear.
and in her security.And this is not an order
Your brother-in-lawand sister-in-law
Come closer...What is the problem, Hidimba?
There is no problem, brother.I am about to lure them.
But you have taken almostten hours to lure them.
so long, Hidimba.These...
Have you fallen in lovewith that tall human?
And in order to appease himI will have to
but even these humanswill not stay alive.
Did you find something?I just saw the
with a humanLord Vrikodar
Look! I can see lightcoming from over there.
We should proceedin that direction.
and bring them to the village.Stop!
of the ogres.We should leave
You brought us herewith so much effort.
You are an ogre?I...
cannot be a human being.You are an ogre?
the King of the OgresHidimba.
My brother had told meto bring all of you here.
You had trusted her,brother Bheem.
All of you should leave.Your lives are in danger here.
Please come.- Be quiet!
Hidimb is the King of the Ogres.He is very strong.
I do not want to hear anything!Brother Yudhishthir,
Whoever kills the King ofthe Ogres becomes the new King.
tried to kill Hidimbbut no one can kill him.
outside this forest.Then will he not punish you?
Please come with me.You need not worry.
safe for all human beings.What are your orders, mother?
And it is the duty of Princesto provide people
Stop!If all of you go there
All hail Princess Draupadi!All hail Vasudev Shri Krishna!
All hail Vasudev Shri Krishna!All hail Vasudev Shri Krishna!
Pardon the crimesof your father, daughter.
must certainly liecrucial lessons of life.
braving those strugglesand even values like
by you, father.And a family that can
for Draupadiyou need to have
in the whole of the Aryan regionto this ceremony.
a new era for the world.You are correct, Vasudev.
He has blessed themwith the armour of rocks.
The Almighty has given an armourto every precious entity.
who can become her armour.One who is the most superior
one such warrior, Vasudev.He has the glow of righteousness
of values on his face.He does not insult an enemy
Him!Your disciple
